It's probably a translation quirk.

The earliest copies of Baruch that we have are Greek, not Hebrew, but there are enough clues in the text to suggest to scholars who know Hebrew (I don't; sorry!) that it was originally written in that language. The various Hebrew=&gt;Greek=&gt;Latin or Hebrew=&gt;Latin translations do fine most of the time, but some really WEIRD things slip through. For example, unicorns. The appearance of "cat" is probably one of those. The original word is lost to time (or until the discovery of a Hebrew Baruch).Sure!

The KJV has a [multitude](https://www.biblegateway.com/quicksearch/?quicksearch=unicorn&amp;qs_version=KJV) of unicorns!

&gt; But my horn shalt thou exalt like the horn of an unicorn (Ps 92:10)

&gt; ~~

&gt; God brought him forth out of Egypt; he hath as it were the strength of an unicorn: he shall eat up the nations his enemies, and shall break their bones, and pierce them through with his arrows (Num 24:8)

The mysterious Hebrew *re'em* (most likely an aurochs or wild ox; that's what you see in most modern translations) becomes Greek monokeros (\u03bc\u03bf\u03bd\u1f79\u03ba\u03b5\u03c1\u03c9\u03c2) in the Septuagint and then Latin monoceros/rinoceros. 

Medieval Latin following Isidore (Etymologies 12.7.12) takes mono-ceros as uni-cornus, "one horn."

The KJV says "Looks good to me!" and dumps in *unicorn*, completely ignoring how by that point, unicorn means something [entirely different](http://www.newyorkcarver.com/wallpaper/wallpaper02.jpg) than [what the ancients meant](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/b/b9/D%C3%BCrer_-_Rhinoceros.jpg) by monokeros/monoceros.

You may now commence viewing the rhinoceros as a great symbol of virginity, purity, and Jesus.
I know we're not supposed to roll this way on AH, but hopefully it's okay here because this is a methodology question...

Google-fu is your friend. 

"Journal archives", "journal collections," and "diary archives" turned up a bunch of academic journals and modern blogs. But a search for "diary collections" was quite fruitful. "Historical diaries" suggested (you know, the "Searches related to" at the bottom of each Google page) I try "historical diaries online" which also worked well.

Google Books is finnicky, but it can be very helpful. In your case, I'd go to GB, search for "diary", and then narrow down the search options to "Free Google eBooks." Why? Because that limits your search results to (a) what you can read online and (b) "historical" diaries (thanks, copyright). You can also narrow it down further by year of publication. I definitely recommended putting on the "Free ebooks" filter, though, to avoid frustration.

Does that sound too frustrating and hit-or-miss? Unfortunately it can be, especially at the beginning. But that's, well, historical research. And as you can imagine from /u/Jan_van_Bergen's post, Google is much more efficient than archival research! (Especially when your archives are across an ocean, hehe.) You get used to it--you learn the rhythms of what to search for (like how I had success with diary and not journal), what kinds of titles university digital archives give to their websites, how to tango with Google Books and archive.org.

Also, if you have a specific time period or geographic area in mind, it never hurts to ask someone who knows the source body for that area. Like, "diaries" as you're envisioning weren't really a genre in medieval Europe, but a medievalist could direct you to some sets of sources--more likely in print, but possibly online--that would let you access at least some of what you're looking for in that type of source.

Finally, if you'd be interested in eavesdropping on a letter collection rich in daily life and emotions details instead of requiring a journal specifically, might I direct you to my new obsession: Elisabeth-Charlotte von der Pfalz, Duchesse d'Orleans at the court of Louis XIV. [One of the volumes of her letters](https://archive.org/details/lettersofmadamec02orluoft) translated into English is online, and it's...fantastic.

&gt; Cardinal de Richelieu, in spite of all his ability, used 
to have violent attacks of madness. Sometimes he would 
imagine that he was a horse, and would gallop round the 
billiard table, striking out at his servants with his feet, 
neighing and making a shocking noise for about an hour, 
after which his people used to put him to bed, and cover 
him up well, when he would go to sleep and sweat profusely. 
When he awoke he would remember nothing of what had 
happened. 

and

&gt; I am sorry to hear that you have become addicted to 
coffee. Nothing in the world is more unhealthy...The Princesse de Hanau, 
daughter of Duke Christian de Birkenfelt, died of it after 
horrible suffering. It was found after her death that the 
coffee had caused hundred of little ulcers in her stomach. 

&gt;Let that be a lesson to you. *Latin soup, comin\u2019 at you like a food fight in an elementary school without recess\u2026*

The university system in the modern West was born in the late 12th/early 13th century. Universities evolved out of what we call \u201ccathedral schools,\u201d primarily as a place to train the preachers and teachers the Church suddenly realized it would need if it wanted to keep a newly-interested laity loyal to its doctrine instead of following heretics. Keep in mind that the primary function of medieval universities was to churn out the equivalent of an MDiv: preachers.

Very early on, the teachers were called magister or doctor or both, depending mostly on where you were in Europe. *Magister* comes from the title used in the universities\u2019 predecessor, cathedral schools, with specific reference to the person who ran the thing. *Doctor* (Latin for \u201cteacher\u201d) comes out of the early Church: the word used for a great theologian, which is to say, a great teacher.

Since the universities had to train their teachers, gradually they became a formal rank that was tested and bestowed after fulfilling certain requirements of study. The ultimate prize, if you wanted to "go career," was being permitted to advance beyond the basics to the specialized disciplines of law, theology or medicine. That idea of more advanced studies is where we get the formal doctorate today. And, incidentally, why medical doctors are technically called "teacher." I've not read a coherent account of how schools universally adopted both master and doctor with near-universal agreement on their hierarchy, so if anyone can fill that in, I'd love to read it!

Bachelor is a little more complex. The word *universitas* in the 12th/13th century still referred to a legal entity, a group of people\u2014the archetype is a trade guild. The *universitas* of a *studium generale* (place of general studies) was its teachers and students. The label gave them the legal rights to control their profession: to determine what was taught, how to advance through the ranks, what made someone qualified to practice that profession. The profession in this case being preaching, the creation of Christians instead of Cathars.

*Baccalarius* (which will become baccalaurius, as in \u201cbaccalaureate degree\u201d) seems to derive from a term used in contemporary *universitates* for the apprentices. That\u2019s what our university bachelors were. Students all began with a liberal arts curriculum, finished that, and then spent some time learning what they\u2019d be preaching and how to go about that. It was hands-on learning: they were required to teach the newer students while they continued their own studies. They were apprentices in a guild\u2014baccalarii in a universitas.

And thus, the T.A. was born.&gt; Also, why is there a desire to map "Middle Ages" onto other societies?

Medievalists have been growing more and more interested in the reality of the medieval *world*: we're exploring connections among societies that show you really can't understand the prototypical "medieval Western Europe" in isolation. First we shifted to a Mediterranean focus, looking at Europe-Islamic world. But very quickly, connections down to the empires of West Africa and east to India from there down to the Swahili coast are all very much in play. On the flip side, if we can't understand western Europe without understanding its connections, that should logically apply to other societies as well. Additionally, we have a rather firm endpoint of European *global* exploration/colonization, which drastically affects many world civilizations.

So if all this is "medieval", how do we talk about "medieval Africa"? *Can* we talk about the medieval Americas (and Oceania, although that doesn't come up so often)?

&gt;  Doesn't this risk applying the historical construct of "the Middle Ages" that may be valid in a European context to other places where the generalizations of "Middle Ages" might not be applicable?

Well, yes. A lot of attempts to paint a "medieval world" have focused on political and religious history. It would be one thing to start from each individual society and then compare. The problem is, we're mostly coming from training as Europeanists, with even our *language* of scholarship and thus patterns of thought and recognition rooted in the European base. So these attempts at a broad global medieval narrative like KINGSHIP! can be seen as shaky and, I suppose, "colonizing." You can see why this is a problem.

But we're still left with the fact that civilizations rise, fluctuate and fall apparently in patterns--look to recent work on the impact of the Black Death across Eurasia for a hot area of scholarship on this right now. Scholars have been paying a lot more attention to the role of climate in those ebbs and flows. North America isn't really my specialty, but since I visited Mesa Verde as a kid, at least the popular narrative on the Anasazi has completely shifted from "Why'd they disintegrate" (actually, at the time it was "vanish", eeks) to looking at environmental patterns. We reconstruct *global* climate changes like the medieval warm period and subsequent little ice age--patterns that did affect every society, by their nature as global. It's providing a framework less rooted in our Europe-centric vocabularies and ways of conceiving the past.

Anyway, that's my understanding as a Europeanist who does Africana as a hobby. :)Gratias tibi!Any recommendations for a clip-on LED light? I'm looking for something I can clip to the hem of my jacket, ideally. (Yes, it's jacket/long-sleeved tech tee weather here.) I picked up a generic one at my LRS, but it's too loose--it keeps sliding off the slippery thin material.

I strongly prefer a clip-on as opposed to an armband (which I have) or lighted vest. Although I want a [Tracer360](https://www.noxgear.com/tracer360) so hard.

Thanks!/u/NerdEnPose's comment is right on--the more hair you have, the more sweat it will hold. I combine that with a baseball cap for even more surface area, on the brim.To alert others! I do have a terrific headlamp (Black Diamond Storm) that I've even used on nighttime trail races and recommend heartily. In this case I'm looking more for a red or white blinker that will be instantly visible from the side as well as the front (for crossing streets at corners).Yup, take a break! At some point you'll want it again...or you won't, because you'll have found your next thing that's the right thing for you to be doing at this point in your life.

Depending on where you live, it might be the wrong time of year for this, but consider picking up endurance road cycling or even bike touring. It's similar to running in the whole "head out on the highway" open road sensation, but I cannot describe how *cool* it is to start your day in one place and finish it in a completely different town, all under your own power. It might also fit better with your family life and work--a lot of people do shorter rides during the week and then a weekend long haul. You can even mix in running if that starts to sound appealing again.

Good luck at MCM!&gt; Due to lots of schoolwork I can't prepare for several months

No, due to lots of schoolwork you *don't want to* prepare, or you are too impatient to wait until you *can* prepare.

Do you really think every runner in a marathon has the luxury to do nothing but run for 20 weeks before the race? If you really want it, you make it work.You're four weeks out. Just do a long taper, i.e. REST IT.

If you keep running on it, no matter how fast/slow you go, you're going to keep stressing the bone--you won't give it any chance to heal. It's going to keep hurting. If you give it the chance to knit itself back together, you might just be able to run *twenty six point two miles* on it in 4 weeks without hating yourself. You might still pay for it afterwards, but your chances of DNFing will be lower.

Source: Had a foot stress reaction 3 weeks out from my first marathon. Like you say: I could handle barefoot, but so much as a sock... Dropped to running 2x/week. Basically just enough time after each run for it to stop hurting, only to REALLY REALLY FEEL IT by the end of the run. Marathon day, ran 20 awesome miles and then limp-walked 6 (ran down the finishing chute with tears streaming down my face, it hurt so bad). In between the 20 and the 6, I spent 10 minutes sitting on the curb while a couple of sympathetic other runners' pacers ran ahead and behind looking for medical support so I could DNF. Medical support did not exist.

If I had just accepted that by the time I got hurt, my fitness was "in the bank," and RESTED IT, I'm fairly confident I could've run the whole thing. :(&gt; how the concept of witchcraft emerged in the first place, likely preceding the middle ages. Was it really, as I said earlier, an amalgam of negative perceptions toward informal pagan habits that had been culturally absorbed over the centuries? To that end, what are some good sources for confirmed evidence of these habits?

Might I suggest posting this as a new question? There are a couple of flaired users here who specialize in medieval heresy and witchcraft. I could word-vomit, but they can offer a much more concise and focused explanation. Human beings today have fantastic memories.

Let me sing you Bruce Springsteen's entire discography. Give me a blank globe; I can name all the countries and their capitals. What do you want to know about dog behavior? And so forth. You surely have your own topics, but you just as surely know them as well as I know Star Wars trivia.

What is True, however, is that some cultures place a much higher value on the *training* of memory.

The European Middle Ages, for example, always had a literate elite, and the role of bureaucracies and written documentation increased significantly in its last centuries. However, the astronomical price of books even for university masters as well as the ultimately oral *purpose* of education (preaching) and means of instruction (spoken disputations) placed a high premium on memory even for those who could read. For example, sitting in your cell to comment on Peter Lombard's *Sententiae*--a quite basic academic exercise--you had to bring to bear everything you could from Augustine, the Bible, Aristotle, your teacher. But you couldn't type "biblegateway 1 cor 13" or "bible talks abouts pistachios what verse" into Google. You couldn't go to the library and walk out with City of God and Confessions and Against the Manichees. You had to *know* them. This is very evident reading medieval texts--there are some interesting mis-quotations from monks and nuns who didn't quite remember the source, or remembered the words but missed where it came from.

As a result, medieval writers were deeply invested in getting their memories into top form in the areas they needed them to be. They turned first of all to classical authors on rhetoric and oration, the art of arguing well.

In Quintilian, for example, they read of the importance of *place*: picturing the words on the page in your mind as you read them, and then recalling that visual image as you spoke or thought them later. *Ad Herennium*, which they thought was Cicero, recommended associating points you wanted to remember with a striking image, and then mentally "placing" them in a mental construction of your house so you would know where to find them again.

And so we have Hugh of St. Victor in the 12th century, instructing his readers to "paint" Noah's Ark in their minds in a very specific manner. A golden cross lies at the ark's center with an X on its right arm and an S on the left arm. X (chi) is the first letter in Christ's name and also the Roman numeral for 10 as in the Commandments; S is the last letter in Christ's name and represents 100 as in the perfection of grace. This image, Hugh says, will fix in the reader's mind that Christ is the beginning and the end, the bridge between the old law and the new.

You know how easy it is to memorize song lyrics? Medieval preachers understood! Fifteenth century French preacher Michel Menot used the notes of the musical scale to preach the horrors of hell:

&gt; [**Ut**inam consumptus essem, ne oculus me rideret](https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=Job+10%3A+18&amp;version=NIV)

&gt; [**Re**pleta est malis anima mea](https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=psalm+88%3A3&amp;version=NIV)

&gt; [**Mi**serabiliores sumus omnibus hominibus](https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=1+corinthians+15%3A19&amp;version=NIV)

The damned, he proclaimed, sang these notes in eternity. Sing it back to me, he exhorted his listeners. Remember these notes.

How about lists? I can name the U.S. presidents easily--but only in order, because that's how I learned them. I struggle to do it backwards; alphabetically is impossible. The late Middle Ages *loved* its lists. A 1475 handbook on how to confess your sins properly outlined its mission thus:

&gt; From the nine estranging sins

&gt; To the eight ways of holiness

&gt; From the seven deadly sins

&gt; To the seven sacraments

&gt; To the seven gifts of the Holy Spirit

&gt; From the six sins against the Holy Spirit

&gt; To the six works of mercy, corporal and spiritual

&gt; From the five inner sins

&gt; From the five outer signs

&gt; From the four stirring sins

&gt; To the four angelic virtues

&gt; To the three godly virtues:

&gt; Through these, confession will go well.

Our medieval theorists on memory bridged the literate plane of the educated elite and their surrounding world of people who might recognize the letters in their own name, maybe. This position made them not just *need* strong memories in the areas they needed strong memories; it made them incredibly conscious of that need. Their sacred mission, in the end, was not to write books of obscure theology: it was to save the souls of medieval Europe. For that, they had to get people to learn and remember the tenets of Christian belief. And for that, they needed to know how to get people to learn and remember them.

We have amazing memories today, but in a lot of ways they aren't focused. I gave examples of things I've memorized quite by accident: through music, through lists, through experience. Medieval writers, with a classical heritage (that they'd memorized...) knew these *explicitly*, and used them *purposefully*.

So. Inherently better memories? Not precisely. More trained and purposefully-focused memories? I think Hugh and Michel would agree.

~~

ETA Sources: Mary Carruthers, *The Book of Memory* and *The Craft of Thought* are foundational. Kimberly Rivers, *Preaching the Memory of Virtue and Vice* shows how the theoretical and monastic practice was applied to teaching lay people by late medieval preachers. The Bible mentions pistachios in Genesis 43:11, but you probably already Googled that.[Exsurge Domine](http://www.papalencyclicals.net/Leo10/l10exdom.htm) - the papal bull ordering Luther to recant (spoiler alert: he didn't)

Mark Edwards, *Printing, Propaganda, and Martin Luther* has a chapter on Luther's earliest Catholic critics in print

David Bagchi, *Luther's Earliest Opponents: Catholic Controversialists 1518-1525*

*Luther and Erasmus: Free Will and Salvation*, ed. Rupp and Watson - the amazing letter exchange between the two, in which theologies are explained very well on both sides, one party to the exchange is endlessly gracious, and one party to the exchange lets the snark flow freely

If you read Latin and/or early modern German, there are a few treatises and sermons on Google Books and archive.org I could point you to.

The Catholics actually had a lot of trouble mounting a literary response to Luther early on, which Edwards and Bagchi discuss.I think the question is: are you only wanting, specifically, housewives who picked up art or music as a hobby? Or would you also be interested in someone like the medieval nun Hildegard of Bingen, one of the earliest if not *the* earliest named composer in the western canon? What about Sofonisba Anguissola (1535-1625), who spent a decade as an official court painter to the King of Spain? When Marie Antoinette needed a PR campaign to improve her image, *stat*, she called upon one of the most famous and popular portrait painters in France, even in Europe--\u00c9lisabeth-Louise Vig\u00e9e Le Brun, who was already a professional artist as a teenager. In medieval al-Andalus (Islamic Iberia), there was an entire world of trained and quite skilled female musician-poets, mainly slaves but also some upper class free women, like Nazhun al-Garnatiya bint al-Qulai\u2019iya and \u1e24af\u1e63a bint al-\u1e24\u0101jj al-Rak\u016bniyya.

But again, I'm not sure if that's what you're looking for.What makes you think these women were not upper class? You don't get to be Philip II's official painter by being born to a scullery maid. These are all upper class women (well, I guess you could dispute al-Qulai'iya's case, perhaps) who displayed "noteworthy artistic merit" that was quite recognized in their own time and in ours. And on the other note, I'm not sure you could accurately say composing music was Hildegard's *hobby*, exactly--it seems to have been A Thing for monastic houses of the High Middle Ages to compose their own melodies or even hymns, as a sort of communal identity/community pride--but it surely wasn't required for her central tasks of founding a monastery, guiding its spiritual life, and keeping it open and as free of male ecclesiastical interference as possible. Not to mention her side jobs of traveling preacher, medieval Dear Abby, theologian, and apocalyptic prophet.&gt; I've been operating on the theory that a woman who was a professional-anything would have been considered a step down from the elite classes.

Yes, this is too simplistic, and if you take your theory out of the passive voice, you'll start to see why.Sure!

You said "they would have been considered a step down." I'm asking you to think about *who* is doing that considering. For example: professional women painters in the Dutch Republic typically had quite elite training from a young age, sponsored by their fathers. What aspiring gentryman, rich enough to afford a private tutor for his daughter, will make choices that he *knows* will hurt her future *no matter what*? Don't get me wrong, women painters climbed mountains male painters never had to know existed. Those fathers must have been verrrry confident in their daughters' skills, potential, and demonstrated aptitude. But they wouldn't have pushed/helped them in a direction that had *no* chance of success.

Al-Andalus is an interesting case for you. Music and poetry were indeed considered the province of slave women ("girls"); the ideal for a free woman was pious seclusion. Yet al-Rakuniyya was eventually chosen by the caliph (!) to educate his daughters--teaching being an extremely revered profession in medieval Islamic culture.

If you want to investigate your theory, you'd probably do best to focus on a specific context (i.e. eighteenth-century Netherlands) and research what other 18th-century people wrote about the artists in question. You could look into sermons to see what preachers were teaching about sins like vanity, greed, pride, curiosity for the *prescriptive* rather than descriptive angle. Just be sure not to zero in on one woman or one negative commenter who proves your point. History doesn't work that way. :)Anyone have a race this weekend that is *not* Chicago? My "Yes, I'm Tapering for a Race; No, It's Not Chicago" support group welcomes all runners, all distances!Yeah, I pushed it too hard, too. Taper has been more of a cliff dive than a downhill glide.I kind of think that weekend is going to need its own "Not Running MCM" support group!

But you're welcome to join my Taperworm Network this week! Taper tantrums our specialty! :)tl;dr - Very occasionally we can point to a concrete difference, but in general it sucked to be a peasant under an ecclesiastical *or* a secular lord--despite the Church purporting to stand for the safety of the peasants and denouncing the violence of lay lords.

~~

Although the line between "consecrated cleric" and "previous lord's son" seems obvious, the realities of medieval power and nobility blurred the line almost before it was drawn. Abbots and bishops of prestigious, politically important houses and dioceses--the ones who would be ecclesiastical lords--were drawn from the upper echelons of the nobility themselves, raised and steeped in the same lordly culture. These are not your St. Francis or even your Otto von Freising--they're the sons (or daughters, often ruling through a male proxy) of the same lords as their lay counterparts, ambitious and educated and using the Church as a vehicle for power. Ecclesiastical lords moved in the same social and cultural circles as their lay counterparts, exchanging manuscripts of profane and sacred literature alike. 

The Church did try to ban its lords from engaging in certain practices (for example, capital punishment), so bishop-lords created a "lay advocacy" position--with the Church and the bishop-lord having free reign to get rid of any lay advocate they disliked, of course.

And in some cases, secular lords could usurp the privileges usually reserved for ecclesiastical figures: Roger of Sicily got himself elected as a papal legate in the 11th century, for example, giving him the right to deal directly with the churches and bishop-lords of Sicily without needing approval from the pope for each ruling.

Ecclesiastical lords typically had all the powers of lay lords, including legal jurisdiction. For example, there are a few places in twelfth-century France where a women's monastery held huge...tracts of land, and chronicles note that the *abbess* presided over suits brought by disgruntled peasants. In the Holy Roman Empire, bishop-lords and lay lords ruled their territories the same way, with the cathedral chapter (group of clerics) serving in the Church districts the same advisory-type function as the Landst\u00e4nde/Estates of under-lords in lay lands.

Sometimes, though, a prince or king found it advantageous to endow ecclesiastical lords over lay lords. Roger maneuvered to get the papal legateship, for example, as part of a strategy to maintain control over his newly-conquered island. He partitioned Sicily among more ecclesiastical lords instead of lay lords, then used his legate status to impose much stricter conditions on the bishops and abbots than he would have been able to place on lay lords in fortified castles. In return, of course, the Norman rulers richly patronized the [cathedrals](http://www.solo-mosaico.org/wp-content/uploads/2012/10/monreale5b-940x522.jpg) and [monasteries](http://farbspiel-photo.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/07/The-Cloister-HDR-1030x709.jpg) of Sicily.

Life for peasants? Well, it can be a challenge to tease out the behavior of ecclesiastical lords for most of the Middle Ages, since the bulk of protests against violent lordship come from Church synods (councils). They were, shall we say, much more enthusiastic about condemning wayward secular lords than their own brethren when it came to violence. (Much sharper on the condemnations for financial abuse and sexual transgressions, naturally--because ecclesiastical lords makin' bank for themselves hurt the Church and its image, and makin' offspring for themselves opening the door to future nepotism).

There are, however, a few high medieval cases of ecclesiastical lords being sharply sanctioned for violence. In 1049, the Synod of Rheims deposed and excommunicated Bishop Hugh of Langres (today, in northeastern France) for vicious armed actions, homicides against his peasants, working with nearby lords and vassals to be even more violent, and tyranny in general (*tyrannus* is the big buzz word in 11th/12th century discussions of bad lords). 

By the time you get to the brink of the Reformation in the late 15th/early 16th century, peasants are equally unhappy with ecclesiastical and secular lords. They complain about the same types of things, from violent raids to restrictions on water use and hunting rights. I've often read that ecclesiastical lords were seen as worse, but this rarely comes with documentation so I can't confirm that firsthand.

~~

I'm sorry, this is not my best-organized answer...let's just say it recapitulates power politics in the medieval Holy Roman Empire. :)

A surprisingly readable source on this topic that *actually* addresses bishop-lords and lay-lords is Benjamin Arnold, *Princes and Territories in Medieval Germany*. If you want to talk about lordly violence, Thomas Bisson is your guy, but...okay, reviews of TB's books are your target. Those are some *bricks*. And TB--following the sources--is generally more concerned with the Church as speaking out against lordly violence rather than perpetrating it (although I got the Hugh of Langres bit from him).&gt; If you want a good idea of what this would be like, there are certain anthropological parallels that can be found today, a particularly well studied example being the Akyns of Kyrgstan

So first of all, this is awesome and thanks so much for the links. Second--do you have any idea how "anthropological parallels" like this are determined by scholars, where there is no concrete heritage-relationship? (Reconstruction of non-notated music in general is fascinating to me, so even if all you've got is a reference to sources that would be great!)I am not sure I understand this concept. ;)Being a monk, the Venerable Bede would have felt like taking a break from music to go and do some writing!

The primary duty of medieval monks (a gender-neutral term in Bede's day!) was to pray in community the Divine Office, a set of prayers prescribed for specific times of the day and night. (Fancy a 3 AM-til-sunrise plainchant marathon?) The central text for the lyrics was the Book of Psalms, with supplements from hymns and other miscellaneous religious texts. The monks would gather in the chapel to chant the service, be it Vespers or Matins. In other words, to sing.

It's tough to say what it sounded like, unfortunately. Bede lived before the standardization of Gregorian chant (which was even slower to take hold in the British Isles), and early insular plainchant had been overtaken by the Gregorian style by the time medieval scribes started using musical notation in the high Middle Ages.&gt; I and Pangur B\u00e1n, my cat 

&gt; 'Tis a like task we are at; 

&gt; Hunting mice is his delight 

&gt; Hunting words I sit all night.

The ninth century Irish missionary monk who penned [an ode to his cat](http://www.sky-net.org.uk/canals/pangurban/name/), Pangur B\u00e1n, was hardly alone. Medieval monks, nuns, and others who took religious vows absolutely kept animals around. And just as absolutely, this practice was met with some disapproval as well as loving approval.

The famous association between nuns and cats actually comes from the *Ancrenne Wisse*, a text prescribing a way of life for anchoresses: women who committed to being "buried" in a single cell that they may not leave, typically attached to a church, to spend their lives in prayer. The AW allows the anchoress to keep no other animal besides a cat. 

But, it is very clear, this is not supposed to be a pet for company but simply a utilitarian allowance for pest control. It's not an accident that when the AW warns its readers not to let worldly cares and connections distract them from Christ, the text exhorts not to let "the cat of hell" drag them out of the anchorhold!

It's also evident from the AW that whatever the ideal, anchoresses did in fact keep other animals around:

&gt; It is a hateful thing, Christ knows, when people in town complain about an anchoresses' animals.

And 11th century monk Goscelin of Canterbury, writing a letter purportedly to an anchoress named Eva, advised her not to keep *any* animals (not a cat, nor a bird, nor any little animal) around to pull her away from the pursuit of God.

That hasn't stopped the association of cats and anchoresses being firmly, um, anchored in the public imagination. The iconographic tradition for Julian of Norwich, medieval theologian and the most famous anchorite, is [replete](http://www.britsattheirbest.com/cr_julian.jpg) with [cats](https://c1.staticflickr.com/5/4003/4601434603_936cc482bb.jpg)--despite the fact that she herself never mentions one.

As for our poet-monk and his Pangur B\u00e1n? The Irish monk sent to evangelize Germany, far from his home and lonely, chose his native Old Irish language--not official Latin--to commemorate his pet. This speaks on one hand to *official* consternation over pets, as a distraction from the sacred duties of religious life. On the other, it points to his finding a salve for homesickness in his dear cat.&gt; What he discovered is that bards practiced a hybrid of recitation and composition, in which they had the basic outline of what they wanted to say and filled it in while telling, using archetypal scenes and set phrases (rosy fingered dawn, swift footed Achilles) as metrical tools.

Oh wow, *that's* where this idea was discovered/laid out! I've certainly taught it, but I never knew why. How very cool.

Thanks!I'm not familiar with the specific case, but:

Sin against nature or unnatural act is canon law speak for sodomy--a sex act that will never lead to reproduction. Note that in the medieval sources in which the foundations of canon (Church) law were hashed out, this is not just male-male homosexuality, although it frequently does refer to that.

Technically there were other sins against nature, but...right.

James Brundage, *Law, Sex and Christian Society in Medieval Europe*; Vern Bullough and John Boswell, eds., *Sexual Practices and the Medieval Church*I've not come across that term before (in medieval/Reformation sources). But--and this is my opinion, to be clear--it is unlikely to be a medieval expression or to have medieval roots (*unser krumpstap ist gut czu leben* or something), because there was no reason for it. Serfs could not choose to move from one lord's dominion to another (in the Holy Roman Empire and its descendants, serfdom is legally abolished *after* ecclesiastical lands are secularized), so it wouldn't be a propaganda proverb designed to get people to move or stay. At least in the Middle Ages, the escalating history of peasant revolts suggests they were not in the business of convincing each other that things were better than they actually were, either, which is the other use I could see for such a term becoming truly popular. (As opposed to, say, a bishop-lord writing it down to flatter himself.)

The secondary sources I've found associate it with the 1803 abolition of the geistliche Landherrschaften--I guess people after the fact reminiscing about how things used to be better.*Oh, yessss. Well, this is probably the opposite of petty, but I'm not letting that get in the way of my story.*

Augsburg at the turn of the 16th century was the epicenter of the German Renaissance; Augsburg was building a grand new cathedral in honor of its miraculous bleeding Eucharist wafer; Augsburg was convinced God\u2019s looming wrath would fall and end the world any day now. And Augsburg was looking for its civic patron saint, its symbolic feminine mark of distinction: a learned lady to match Cassandra Fedele of Venice; a holy woman like Domenica of Florence.

When 20-year-old Anna Laminit parked herself in an Augsburg group home for poor and indigent women in 1497, she had no intention of spending her days in their menial labor. She made herself into a saint instead. The late Middle Ages had a very specific idea of female holiness: virginity, severe asceticism, claims of divine revelation. By 1500, hairshirts and spurning meat weren\u2019t enough. You had to drink the pus from lepers\u2019 boils. You had to fast for real during Lent.

Laminit told everyone she hadn\u2019t eaten anything but the Eucharist for *fourteen years*.

By 1503, \u201cour Holy Anna\u201d had Augsburg eating out of her hand\u2014while doing her own eating in secret. She won a place of honor in the town\u2019s finest church, and served as a sort of town therapist in exchange for donations \u201cfor the poor.\u201d The semi-monastic women who ran the group home she lived in moved out, so she could have more space.

And when the Holy Roman Emperor came to town, she received a private audience with him and with his new wife. Laminit so terrified the Empress with her prophecies of God\u2019s wrath, that the queen organized a massive penitential procession through the town. Thousands of people paraded through the Augsburg streets, the empress among them\u2014barefoot, robed in mourning black, carrying burning candles, repenting each and every sin of their lives with every step of the way. And at the head of the procession walked Anna Laminit.

The Emperor also had a sister named Kunigunde, of late the Duchess of Bavaria, now residing in a Munich monastery, who was deeply pious and deeply protective of her brother. Laminit was understandably thrilled by the invitation to come live at the convent favored by the Bavarian ruling family. 

But Kunigunde had a plan. She and the abbess set Laminit up in a room of honor\u2014that Kunigunde had secretly prepared by boring knotholes in the wall, so she could see if Holy Anna was sneaking food somehow. Laminit arrived, went to bed that night, no food appeared, all was well. But all was not well.

Medieval theologians had wrestled with the dual nature of the Eucharist as actual food and as the Body of Christ. Food becomes excrement, they knew; Christ cannot be excrement. Inconceivable. So, the scholastics had ruled, and everyone accepted as *obvious*, the Eucharist is simply and entirely absorbed by the body.

But Laminit pooped.

Confronted with the evidence, she was made to eat peppercakes in front of the sisters, and then trucked back to Augsburg in disgrace. Laminit spent the next decade or so bumming around the southern Empire, occasionally re-establishing herself as a \u201chunger martyr,\u201d always tracked down by Kunigunde\u2019s gossip network and exposed by the duchess at a distance. Still, it beat menial labor.

Until the full extent of Laminit\u2019s *not* model holiness caught up with her. Of the several actual and many many more rumored scandals of her days as Augsburg\u2019s pride, her union with rich burger Anton Welser produced a son. To preserve Welser\u2019s social standing, Laminit had apparently agreed to keep the secret and raise the boy\u2014for a paltry annual sum that would have made her just about the richest independent woman in Augsburg. In 1518, Welser tracked her down in Freiburg for the best of reasons: he wanted to claim his offspring and pay for his education.

The boy was long since dead, of course.

Laminit was promptly arrested for all of her theft and fraud. On the basis of her confession and on the obvious suspicion of infanticide, she was drowned in the Saane in May.

During her life, she was called holy, martyr, and thief; today, scholars have dubbed her mentally ill, a victim, a con artist, a fraud. But it is perhaps Martin Luther, reviling Laminit as the culmination of the evils of medieval Catholicism, who paid the best tribute to the accuracy of the historical record and the cleverness of a certain duchess. He described Laminit\u2019s crime as *Beschei\u00dferey*\u2014her bullshit.Modern-day Pfefferkuchen are basically gingerbread cookies. :) However, this is the food that gets mentioned *all over* the sources on Laminit (okay, like two or three times, but in different places), so I'm guessing it had some kind of symbolic importance back then that I don't know about. The sources are chroniclers summing up bits and pieces of the situation, generally after the fact, based on what they've heard from others.

It's really interesting to me that Laminit *doesn't* get punished immediately for the fraud. Parallel cases of late medieval holy fraud generally end up restricted to a single convent for the rest of their lives. There is zero (I mean zero) critical scholarship on AL, and a lot of places to dig deeper--little hints of times she was shown mercy when I honestly would NOT expect it of the era, like that. I've wondered if it was lingering fondness for her or some leniency based on perceived insanity? The tolerance was connected to AL specifically--the beguines who had housed her were forced into a period of official public shame after she was unveiled as a fake. You wouldn't see that, I don't think, if people had had a sense that "well, even if you were lying about being God's trumpet, at least you did good for us."Honestly, "gingerbread cookies" might have been a better translation; I just don't know for sure. The Middle Ages sure loved their spices, though. Eating a spice-rich food wasn't punishment in the sense of taste, but probably in the sense of "holy women wouldn't eat something so rich; you are even *more* of a fake, you are even *farther* from holiness." (Although pepper specifically was sometimes seen as a peasant's food.) Actually, now that I type that, I bet that's the symbolism.Also, the Middle Ages are the best ages.Olivia Remie Constable, *Trade and Traders in Muslim Spain*

Michelle Hamilton, *Representing Others in Medieval Iberian Literature* (this is a great book, but probably not affordable unless you have access to a university library)

Thomas Glick, *Islamic and Christian Spain in the Early Middle Ages*

Kathryn Miller, *Guardians of Islam* - Muslim populations under Christian rule after the Reconquista, from Islamic sources

David Nirenberg, *Communities of Violence* - looks at case studies in Spain and France

Brian Catlos, *The Victors and the Vanquished: Christians and Muslims of Catalonia and Aragon, 1050-1300*

Stephen Haliczer, *Between Exaltation and Infamy: Female Mystics in the Golden Age of Spain*

ETA: Olivia Remie Constable, ed., *Medieval Iberia: Readings from Christian, Muslim and Jewish Sources* - a massive, wonderful collection of primary sources in translation

My favorites from this list would be Constable (both of them) and Miller.Yes! Imperial princess, married the duke of Bavaria. Thanks for the tip. I'll go back and edit, too. :)Ooh, it's possible--16C Augsburg had very strong ties to the imperial court, particularly to then-emperor Maximilian I. But if the city were trying to cover something up, I'm not sure they would have forced the beguine community into a period of public shame (wearing black, penitential practices, etc). I'm also not sure it woudl explain the leniency shown her later in Freiburg.

Another thought I had was simply that AL had very powerful allies in Augsburg civic life--her onetime hookup Welser, for example. (She is said to have left the city with him at least one of the times she was exiled). Again, that doesn't explain Freiburg, but that could have a thousand other factors that aren't as visible historically. It's more than plausible for Augsburg.

It's also possible that exile from the city was simply the standard punishment for basic fraud--crime is not at all my specialty, but there's one ca1400 case in Nuremberg (not a holy fraud, just a cheating merchant) I know about where exile from city limits was the entire punishment. Technically the ruling gave a certain diameter around the city he had to avoid, but we know he settled in basically the closest suburb, so.My source on this is Paul Freedman, [*Out of the East: Spices in the European Imagination*] (http://yalepress.yale.edu/book.asp?isbn=9780300111996) (Yale 2008). Unfortunately I don't have the book, but my notes say:

&gt; spices very linked to upper classiness. gentry not just royals. pepper came to be more affordable and thus lost prestige (eating pepper by 15C was a sign of rusticity)

"Rustic" is medieval for, well, redneck.

I think it's worth keeping in mind, though, that a pound of pepper is a metaphorical *metric ton* of pepper. And you can see throughout the article you linked that pepper was the ubiquitous spice in any case, which could have contributed to it gaining a sort of lower-class crinkle.Maybe she's waiting for *you* to get her story right! :)1500 words for a book review is a beautiful number!

Honestly, your question is one I'd ask the professor. It's a matter, I think, of whether you're supposed to engage in the broader scholarly discussion of the book's topic, or more narrowly with this particular entry.

When I write capsule summaries (basically book reviews) based on my notes from a book, for my own benefit, I fill up about that many words with:

+ thesis
+ position in historiography
+ VIP source material
+ methodology
+ brief summary of each chapter
+ one or two anecdotes I found particularly compelling and want to remember
+ whether I think the argument works or not; maybe a place with room for more research if it's a topic that interests meI propose an alternate sub: r/AskHistoricals. "Suppose I am" questions are its lifeblood, but responses must *also* come in contemporary character. So "Suppose I am a rich woman in Renaissance Italy..." receives, "Well, you almost certainly got married at a young age, and left your house for your husband's extended family. If your father had a certain civic sensibility and recognized some innate talent of yours, you might have gotten a humanist education first, bu--WHY does your VEIL have DECORATIONS? THOSE ARE SATAN'S DECORATIONS! BURN THEM BEFORE YOU BURN *FOR* THEM!"

No? Oh, well.By the middle of the 11th century, the powerful Umayyad Caliphate of Cordoba had splintered under the weight of assassinations, coups d'etat, civil war--the usual. And the taifas (independent kingdoms) that arose in its wake faced a new problem: the newly aggressive, proto-crusading Christians to its north. They called for aid, and the powerful Almoravid dynasty answered--the dynasty based in modern-day Morocco. Yusuf ibn Tashfin came storming across the Strait of Gibraltar and defeated the Christians handily.

And then he proceeded to defeat the taifas handily, too, adding southern Iberia to the Almoravid empire. Yusuf personally kept his court in Marrakesh, so you wouldn't quite say there was an African king in Europe. However, he did install various African Almoravids as governors and other delegated ruling positions in Iberia.

The Almoravids were Berbers. "Race" as such didn't really exist at the time and it's important not to essentialize skin color as "African-ness," but it's interesting to see that from the Christian European perspective at least, skin color was *not* the defining characteristic of this group. The "Book of Games" from the 13th century presents us with [pale-skinned Muslim women](http://i.imgur.com/i6kgy0h.jpg), for example, and almost sub-Saharan African-looking [Almoravid men.] (http://i.imgur.com/mtzp8xD.png) (It's not a question of gender norms--there are some lighter-skinned male scholars elsewhere in the manuscript).

The case of Alessandro de Medici that you refer to, OP, is parallel--John Brackett has argued based primarily on [artistic depictions](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/a/ac/Allessandro-the-moor.jpg) that the duke's mother was a Berber slave in Italy. (And, I have to say, in the book itself, the black-and-white reproduction of that image makes his skin seem *much* darker, which strikes me as a very modern, politicized choice. I would be very curious to see this painting in person.)

The Almohad Caliphate, also Berber, replaced the Almoravids in the late twelfth century and ruled Islamic Iberia for a short time. But they maintained their capital/central court in Marrakesh as well.

As far as definitely sub-Saharan African? There is a fair amount of contact starting in the fifteenth century, with the Portuguese increasingly involved in the Kongo, traveling to the Swahili coast, and diplomatic connections forged between the Kingdom of Ethiopia and the Church in Rome. There was even an Ethiopian Orthodox church in the holy city! For a brief time, it almost seemed like European and Christian African kingdoms could merge and work in the same political-social system as within Europe! 

In 1428, ambassadors between King Alfonso V of Aragon and Emperor Ishaq of Ethiopia actually worked to set up a double marriage alliance: Ishaq would marry the king's sister, and the Spanish prince would wed an Ethiopian princess. Nothing came of this, however. In the sixteenth century, the Ethiopians made a half-hearted attempt to revive the hope of a ruling marriage alliance, but they never got around to proposing specifics and the Portuguese weren't the least bit interested, anyway. By that point, the trans-Atlantic slave trade was picking up and Europeans were starting to theorize about patterns that had been developing silently with the growing presence of African slaves in European courts. Literature and legal sources began to delineate hierarchies of skin color, and the (white, Roman) Church pondered questions of skin color, conversion, and the ethics of enslavement.

~~

Sources: If you have access to an academic library, I highly recommend the anthology of essays *Black Africans in Renaissance Europe*, ed. T.F. Earle and K.J.P. Lowe (2005). It includes the Brackett essay I mentioned above. While the overwhelming focus on Iberia and Italy is less than ideal, that has the advantage of bringing the highlights of the Spanish and Italian-language historiography on the topic of Africans in pre/early modern Europe into English.

As for Iberia under the Almoravids, /u/alfonsoelsabio and I recently double-teamed on [a thread of recommendations](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3nqqme/hello_historians_can_i_get_some_book/), and you will find solid background in almost any of them except (unsurprisingly) the one about Christian women mystics. Great follow-up! Unfortunately I can't answer it, because the sources don't exist. We know that the 1428 embassay the Aragonese sent to Ethiopia never arrived--the next we hear of the exchange, a 1450 letter from Aragon to Ethiopia tells us that the trip didn't work out, but not why. (Fun fact: the 1450 trip didn't work out, either!)

Peter Garretson, who brought the proposed alliance to scholars' attention, suggests that maybe neither side really wanted a *marriage* alliance. He thinks the Ethiopians were more interested in getting advice from the Iberian irrigation/water management experts (and using marriage proposals to keep relations open), and that the difference between Catholic/Latin Christianity and Ethiopian Orthodox Christianity would have been seen as a deal-breaker by both sides.

Peter Garretson, "A Note on Relations between Ethiopia and the Kingdom of Aragon in the Fifteenth Century," *Rassegna di studi etiopici* 37 (1993): 37-44.&gt; ndexing appeared after the printing press and the process worked exactly as you would imagine it. A galley proof was produced, somebody read through it, noted what belonged where in the index and then the end product was printed.

Nope!

The oldest surviving datable index is from a 1299 manuscript from England. The invention reflects a change in how books were used. Instead of reading through the whole thing, generally meditatively for religious benefit, people would turn to a book with the idea of *looking up a piece of information*. Earlier you would generally have memorized all those massive piles of reading and "looked up stuff" in your memory. The table of contents, sometimes with chapter titles listed, starts to appear a little earlier as part of the same process.

The 1299 example isn't the first case of someone going through a text and making a list of keywords with references to where you could find them, but it was the first example that could apply to more than one copy of the text: the scribe/author indexed by section, not folio leaf, so the index could be copied by hand and travel with other manuscript copies of the text, Gregory I's *Moralia in Iob*.

~~

Malcolm Parkes, "Layout and Presentation of The Text," in *The Cambridge History of the Book in Britain*, 2:55-74

O. Weijers, "Les index au moyen age sont-ils un genre litteraire?\u201d in Leonardi, Morelli and Sancti, *Fabula in tabula: una storia degli indici dal manoscritto al testo elettronico* (Spoleto 1995), 11-22.THE major source on Joan is the Latin translation of her trial, which was completed almost immediately after the fact. It's widely available in a great modern English translation: Daniel Hobbins, trans. and ed., *The Trial of Joan of Arc*. He works from the Latin; however, we do have two surviving French versions, just they are later copies. Hobbins compared the contemporary Latin with the later French and thinks they're pretty much identical (but notes where there are minor differences in his translation's endnotes).

The next set of sources is from Joan's rehabilitation or Noneification trial, after her death. It includes testimony from her supporters during her life. So there is thirty years' worth of "saint-making" and legend-building going on, but it still contains valuable details. It's never been translated into English, but I found [a summary of it online] (http://faculty.smu.edu/bwheeler/ijas/pinzino.html) if you're interested.

Educated (and definitely sympathetic) commentary from during and shortly after Joan's life comes from Christine de Pizan and Jean Gerson, but that won't give you the kind of biographical details you're seeking.

If you're interested, I recently [fielded a question](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3mi0tk/a_lot_of_pictures_depict_joan_of_arc_clad_in/) about Joan's military role where I drew pretty heavily on the trial record and rehabilitation trial testimonies.

I *highly* recommend picking up Hobbins' edition of the trial record."Fake Joan of Arc"--Joan had a couple of female contemporaries operating as mystics/visionaries in France, or at least trying to, and quite a few imitators. Would Catherine de Rochelle, Claude des Armoises, or Jeanne de Sermaize sound right?

Catherine comes up in Joan's trial--Joan describes revealing Catherine as a False visionary, for which Catherine later turned on Joan and testified against her. On Claude des Armoises--who I think is who you probably mean--I believe the primary source is Pierre Sala, a Parisian courtier, recounting the story rather after the fact (he wasn't born until 1457). Dude wrote a *lot* of books, though. I'm not sure where in his corpus you can find the story. Recently, scholars have proposed it is just that--a story, a "novel," rather than an actual occurrence. But this is not my wheelhouse, so to speak; I haven't read any of it firsthand so I can't judge, sorry!

ETA: Pierre tells a more lavish version of the story, but he's not the only one! (a.k.a ETA I was wrong). There's an earlier French source, and then Johannes Nider (yeah, that Johannes Nider--[this is NOT an impartial source](https://www.google.com/search?q=johannes+nider+witchcraft&amp;oq=johannes+nider+witchcraft&amp;aqs=chrome..69i57.3287j0j4&amp;sourceid=chrome&amp;es_sm=122&amp;ie=UTF-8)) talks about her in the *Formicarius*. I'm not aware of an English translation, though. I can talk about the medieval Europe case.

The explicit reference I suspect the linked article is citing (my uni doesn't subscribe to that journal, sorry) is the fifteenth-century Malleus Malificarum, a manual for hunting witches. The text actually devotes quite a bit of space to the discussion of whether witches *actually* steal penises, or only make it *seem* like they did. Being the Malleus Malificarum, it also includes a few rather sensational exempla. Such as, for example, the witches who steal 20-30 penises kind of as pets, and keep them alive in birds' nests, where they "appear to" move around, "eating oats and grass." BUT, Kramer stresses, it really is just an illusion! When a local man went looking for the penis he thought he'd lost, Kramer and Sprenger write, the witch told him he couldn't take the biggest one, because it belonged to the local priest. "Really and truly," they right, he had been deceived, and only *felt* the smoothness where something in fact was.

The MM (and potentially folk tales on which it's building) are hardly the birth of this tradition. Textually--who knows about the oral tradition--there is a looooong medieval discussion of the relationship between magic and impotence. Again, this is not a phenomenon unique to the Middle Ages (Robert Biggs finds it in ancient Mesopotamian incantations), but it has a very specific cultural context.

The medieval Church became very concerned with regulating marriage and reproduction. Since impotence--True impotence--was grounds for the unthinkable, divorce, they were very, *very* concerned with situations of impotence. Canon (Church) law is developed in the Middle Ages through specific cases that came before an ecclesiastical court (and a bunch of other things), so whatever you want to say about "actual" belief in sorcery, you can see how a couple wanting a divorce might claim impotence--and people who did not want to grant the divorce would go hunting for the magical cure, such as finding a lockbox and throwing it into a river (that's a thirteenth-century example).

By 1400 or so, though, the situation in the legal texts at least had pretty much played out. The guidelines for recognizing sorcery-caused impotence and various cures had been drawn up, laid out, and accepted. But the situation on the ground was changing. Instead of individual sorcerers working harmful magic for their own benefit, people started to fear witches: Satan's minions, attacking whatever was central to life and Christianity. No surprise that fertility was a big component, right? References to witches causing impotence start to appear earlier in the fifteenth century, and then the 1486 MM goes all in.

There is, of course, an undershade of misogyny and specifically beliefs about women's sexuality underlying the European situation as well. Whether or not women's situations grew worse in the late Middle Ages/Reformation is a HUGE scholarly debate. I will say that around this time, there is a very big explosion in *texts discussing misogyny on both sides* (well, within a medieval framework--this is not Feminism 101, just to be clear). So whether or not things were actually getting worse, some people (women and men!) were starting to raise the idea that women being discriminated against was not always a good thing--and there was quite a literary backlash. (Of course our sources are educated people, but that's also who was writing the MM). Hence "Malleus Malific**A**rum" is the Hammer of Exclusively-Female Witches.

This kind of investigation is cool--taking a look at something that is "trans-historical" and showing how it makes sense within a particular context. Hopefully some people with interests in other times and places can chime in, too.

~~

Catherine Rider, *Magic and Impotence in the Middle Ages* (2006)

Moira Smith, "The Flying Phallus and the Laughing Inquisitor: Penis Theft in the Malleus Malificarum," *Journal of Folklore Research* 39 (2002)

Robert Biggs, *Mesopotamian Potency Incantations* (1967)

*totally crediting Rider for the Biggs citation*

As usual...I can talk a little about the European end, at least the west.

During the early Middle Ages, let's say until roughly 1000, Jews don't have much of a presence in Christian Europe. There were some Jewish traders in Islamic Iberia, however, forming part of the larger trans-Mediterranean Jewish community. Generally, the Jews of al-Andalus enjoyed the dhimmi status previous posters have mentioned *while al-Andalus was prospering*. Once the Christians began to take an interest, the combination of their Reconquista attacks and political unrest in Islamic territory had a negative impact on the Jewish community. Records of their trading levels starts to taper in the 11th century, right as the Christians are getting going, and then falls off a cliff in the 12th. Outbreaks of violent persecution follow a similar timeframe: 1066 and 1090 saw problems in (Islamic) Granada, and then in 1135 the Jewish quarter of Cordoba was sacked. By that point, al-Andalus was under the control of the North African dynasties, the Almoravids and then Almohads. While the situation for Jews in Iberia remained tolerable with outbursts of violence, apparently things were getting bad in North Africa.

Intriguingly, right about the time the Jews' situation under Islamic rule in Iberia starts to devolve, Jewish merchant activity in *Christian* Spain picks up. (Right in line with Christian Spain suddenly having an economy again, hehe.)

As far as Jews in Latin Christendom, really not much of a *significant* presence until 1000ish. Jewish communities operate under significant legal restrictions: the biggest, and most in/famous, being they couldn't own land. That's why Jewish populations are urban, and where you get the stereotype-based-in-reality of the merchants and financiers (more infamously "moneylenders").

*In general, most of the time*, Jews and Christians treated each other with a mixture of respect, fear, and hey these are our neighbors let's do a thing. Of course the specifics varied by time and place. But Jews in medieval England had their court cases heard by juries of Christians *and* Jews; they were allowed their own religious courts for internal matters; Jewish and Christian women traded clothing and breast-feeding duties.

But just like in Islamic Iberia, the general "we do what we have to do" attitude is splattered with occasional pogroms, massacres, and expulsions. The slaughter of the entire Jewish communities of Worms, Speyer, Mainz, Trier, and other German cities with the aborted first attempt at a First Crusade is the most infamous, and the first *major* outbreak of extreme violence, but it's hardly alone. Gradually, Jewish communities were kicked out of cities and entire countries, often but not always in the wake of massive violence, often but not always sparked by rumors and fears among Christians of Jews somehow killing Christians and specifically Christian children.

Now. Something like the expulsion from England is rather unambiguous. But expulsion from a city could just as frequently mean they had to leave the city limits, but settled right outside the city and continued operating. Obviously that's still horrible, but it helps explain why there is still such a significant Jewish presence in western Europe well through the Reformation, despite what looks like a fairly comprehensive list of expulsions.

But during the later Middle Ages, say 12th-15th century, there was also a growing let's call it cultural attack on Jews. Illustrations of devils in manuscripts and church sculptures startd to use the same facial features with which Christian art stereotyped Jews. Jewish scholars were called on to debate their Christian counterparts with the express goal being Jewish humiliation. Christian sermons used Jews as the go-to demonic bad guys.

Christian Iberia in the later Middle Ages is a different case. As the Christians conquered more and more of the peninsula, they wanted settlers, and they offered really attractive terms to Jews as well as Christians. In some instances Jews *were* permitted to own land, with special status as "servants of the royal chamber" and so tied into the networks of land ownership and tenantship. Despite laws funneling Jewish legal cases into Jewish courts, Jews could and absolutely did take their disputes to Christian courts instead when they thought they could get a better result! They owned Muslim slaves (and fought Christian efforts to convert them--in one case winning a concession from the king of Mallorca that they'd be compensated for any slaves lost to conversion, since, yup, laws prohibited Jews from owning Christian slaves).

So while Iberian Jews were tied into the local economy in significantly more ways than their French, German, English counterparts--this also made them a more attractive target. The Christians developed a few choice ways to go after the Jews: blasphemy charges sometimes worked, inciting public riots over killing Christians was always popular, etc. The biggest expressed fear in Spain, though, was actually that the still-Jewish community would convert back any Jews who had converted to Christianity. This fear of "Judaizing" and "crypto-Judaism" will dog *conversos* throughout the Inquisition, even after Isabella and Ferdinand expel all the Jews from Iberia in 1492.

So even medieval Europe, considered the incubator of modern anti-Semitism with some good reason, is a complex case. It takes no stretch of the imagination or the sources to see that an urban Christian housewife who breastfed her Jewish neighbor's baby boy on the Sabbath would bar her door--even if only for her own safety--when Jews came seeking refuge against the invading troops they had heard had massacred Jews in Worms and Speyer. But you can also see parallel literary developments, religious rituals, and folk tales in Christian and Jewish literature. People lived their lives most of the time, but sometimes things got really, really bad.Ooh, interesting thought, especially for Iberia. I've never read about a specific case, but it's not quite entirely out the question. We know at least some Jews in 11/12th century Germany owned armor and weapons, and had some training.

On the other hand, THE reason Jewish communities were attractive to kings was their taxation potential--in terms of the economic revenue they specifically produced, and (paralleling the situation in the Islamic world) extra taxes levied specifically on Jews. If I were a king, I would totally let this small group of people out of military service "in exchange" for charging them higher taxes for the privilege of that exemption. (Also, in a lot of places, if Jews were not happy with the provisions of the king/city council/baron, they could simply move to another area. So it was in the ruler's benefit to make the restrictions manageable.)1. Where in the back of your leg? Calf? Hamstring? Achilles tendon?

2. Do you sit all day?

3. How is your hip and glute strength? Do you do myrtl exercises (hip drops, clamshells, donkey kicks etc) or squats/deadlifts/Pilates/etc?Neither do I--so I loved it!Ah ah, *I'm* the one running! I was hired to make my own sign, though. ;) I remember a group who did this on my first marathon, though.Them's fighting words!But I bet everyone loved the sign and idea!/u/_buch, /u/CaptainNarwhal, /u/THWTNS, /u/spartygw, /u/KneeCo, /u/SahirPatel, /u/LivingInTheVoid, /u/RainbowRoadMushroom, /u/Kwegihera, /u/werqout, /u/kimblem, everyone I commented on - These are all so awesome! Thanks for the ideas! I hope whichever ones I don't use, get eavesdropped by someone else. I'd sure be inspired. :)This is...this is something Mr. Sunagainstgold would *actually do*.Well, I'm not sure whether you mean ancient like the classical world, or just "pre-Page Six" as your Henry VIII example suggests. Hopefully some of the classicists will be along to talk about gladiators--[the popular ones even had stage names, and posters advertising them](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/1dsa7m/how_would_a_woman_come_to_be_a_gladiatrix_female/c9tipb6)--but I can tell you that the European Middle Ages absolutely had celebrities!

I'd call it more of a "*fama* culture" (fama is public fame or reputation) than straight-up celebrity, though--the Middle Ages really put it to use, in part because *so* much communication and social operation was based on oral culture and personal relationships.

For example, fama had *legal status*. Good fama and bad fama (infama) were legally admissible evidence in court cases!

Also, a big way that princes communicated with their advisors and ambassadors was letters. We have massive letter collections from key players like Hans von Planitz (lawyer and advisor to Frederick the Wise--you know, the dude who basically controlled who got chosen Holy Roman Emperor, the dude who stood up to the pope and that emperor and sheltered Martin Luther) that are about eighty percent "Here is what is happening at the Reichstag, here is how the Reformation is tearing apart the Hungarian royal family" and twenty percent, "Everyone knows the duchess of Marburg is the best dancer at court." In other words, making sure the elector was able to function in the social environment of politics as well as the political one.

As far as particular celebrities for the Middle Ages, you'd do very well to look to "living saints"--this is the mode that [Anna Laminit](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3npfuh/tuesday_trivia_cheats_and_liars/cvq82nn) was working in when she made herself the (very wealthy) pride and joy of 1500 Augsburg, albeit as a con artist leeching money for herself rather than someone actually trying to be pious. In fifteenth century France, Joan of Arc spurred imitators after her death who wined and dined with people who threw open their homes and hearts to them because the people thought they were dealing with the real Joan. In twelfth century Germany, monks and bishops wrote to the nun Hildegard of Bingen for advice and spiritual consolation, either because they'd heard about her visions of God or because they'd heard her music being performed in Paris.

I don't know as much about outside Europe. However, in much of the Islamic world, Sufi saints absolutely attracted admirers and visitors similarly to European ones. The Kashmiri poet-mystic Lalla or Lal Ded (d. 1350s) was so popular that she was claimed by Hindus *and* Muslims, who each built their own shrines to her.

Caring about people's weight...the example I have for that is later, it's Elisabeth-Charlotte von der Pfalz, Duchesse d'Orleans at the court of Louis XIV, writing the most insanely gossipy letters to the nobility of Europe and her kids. She has quite a bit to say about other people's weight...and her own...and the prince of France throwing his wig at people when he loses chess games.

And again, the important thing to remember is--this isn't "trivial" stuff. (Maybe in 20 years, there will be a /r/AskHistorians thread about how celebrity culture in 2015 had Deep Meaning, too...) Knowing these little details actually gave people power then, gave them the ability to operate in the political-social enviroment that still functioned so much on relationships and reputation.&gt; At mile 2 you could have a sign saying "Almost 10% Done!"

And then the next person is holding a sign that says, "Run like you get to punch that guy --&gt; in 24.2 miles" :)tl;dr - Overall, very rare.

The most important factor to keep in mind is *reason to learn*. For the vast, vast majority of medieval Christians, there was simply no reason to learn Arabic. They might know "pagan" Saracens existed, but that would be about it.

As you mention, OP, there were a few cases where Latin Christians would indeed have exposure to the Arabic-speaking world. The biggest group is probably not diplomats but *merchants*. There were European (mainly Italian) expat merchant communities in quite a few Mediterranean ports--Tunis, Cairo and Alexandria have been the focus of important scholarly work in the last few years. Merchants would likely (almost certainly) not have had formal instruction in Arabic, but it's reasonable to assume they learned enough to get along.

One case I'm *not* familiar with is the Crusader states in the Near East of the high Middle Ages. There is not a ton of evidence for mixing among the very small Latin populations with the original residents. But again, practicality may have dictated that people learn a few phrases of each other's language. Robert of Ketton was an English scholar who traveled *extensively* through the Near East, learning Arabic quite well along the way. He would eventually settle in Spain and translate the Qur'an into Latin around 1143.

As for formal instruction, there *were* a couple instances! You mention the Muslim communities on Sicily. It's True that some did remain after the Norman conquest, and indeed, the Normans enjoyed the extra taxes they could levy and didn't try to convert the Muslim population en masse. However, on one level they practiced a policy that led to the gradual isolation of the Muslim community, its eventual mass deportation to a colony on the Italian mainland, and their eventual wholesale expulsion. Alex Metcalfe, probably the foremost scholar on Islamic Sicily, speculates that there were a few bilingual Arabic-Romance communities, but (a) says the evidence is inconclusive and (b) says there is no evidence for what *kind* of bilingualism--meaning, people used one language daily but knew a few phrases in another; people moved in between languages regularly; etc.

The formal opportunity, though, came at the Norman royal court.

In the 12th century, the Norman administration in Sicily actually adopted Arabic as a prestige language! They were *very* plugged into the trans-Mediterranean world, drawing a lot more of their influence on governance/bureaucracy from Fatamid Egypt than from their Latin counterparts (twelfth century Europe is juuuust figuring out the business of governing instead of violent marauding). The Norman administration issued bilingual charters, with Arabic used as a show of power locally and also for practical purposes in diplomatic communications. Along with governance, the Norman court was also the site of major scholarly efforts at translating Arabic original and ancient Greek survival texts into Latin. Yes, there were Muslim scholars as well as Christians working at court, fluent in Latin as well as Arabic and probably a handful of vernaculars. /u/caffarelli - many of these "palace Saracens" were eunuchs!

At the same time the Normans were encouraging scholarly efforts at translation in Sicily, the courts of Iberia were fostering the same intellectual life. So you had Latin Christians learning Arabic formally there, too. There are a few hints of formal *studia arabica* (Arabic schools) established. The traditional modern understanding is that these were intended to teach future missionaries Arabic for conversion efforts, but more recent work has sort of undermined that idea--the Dominican and some Franciscan friars in North Africa, for example, were mainly there to minister to the expat European populations, not to convert the local Muslim residents. So if the studia arabica were just meant for people who would be working on translating texts, they'd have even more limited access.

Overall, there were a few formal opportunities for a very few, very educated, very elite Latin Christians to learn Latin. In the Mediterranean zone, exposure to Muslim communities may well have allowed more people the chance to pick up anywhere from a few phrases to practical bilingualism, maybe the equivalent of an English-speaking American with a telenovela addiction. International merchants and dedicated travelers (...mainly merchants, a few missionaries), still a pretty insignificant number overall, would likely have known enough Arabic to get by. But for the average European Christian, especially outside the Mediterranean zone, there was neither the opportunity nor the reason to learn Arabic.

Sources of Note: Alex Metcalfe, *The Muslims of Medieval Italy*; Jeremy Johns, *Arabic Administration in Norman Sicily: The Royal Diwan*; Georg Christ, *Trading Conflicts. Venetian Merchants and Mamluk Officials in Late Medieval Alexandria*; Robin Vose, *Dominicans, Muslims, and Jews in the Medieval Crown of Aragon*Thanks for the shout-out. The story of Anna Laminit's rise and fall is absolutely one of my favorite from the Middle Ages. And to anyone reading this, I'd like to second the recommendation for /u/shlin28's answer about the [initial Arab Muslim expansion towards Byzantium/Persia](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3nvv8g/how_much_forewarning_did_the_byzantine_and/cvrtbni?context=3). That was absolutely my personal highlight of the week here.By "service language," do you mean the use of Latin during Mass (church service)? What do you mean by "how was it abused"?Any strategies on making your legs feel better, faster, after a marathon? I have to teach and be moving around the classroom like a normal human being by tomorrow...So, not so much with the seven hours cramped in a car seat, huh? Maybe I'll try walking around the rest areas. I honestly cannot fathom running a single step. You're a hero.Do you have a B race? I missed the last two peak weeks before taper for my original marathon, and DNSed it for a backup three weeks later. So my race ended up being little and local instead of one that frequently makes race bucket lists, but I'm positive that re-doing those two weeks and getting a full taper helped the result.RICH: Rest Ice Compression Heavy painkillers...Thanks!Yeah, get on runningintheusa.com or your non-US equivalent and see what you can find. Good luck either way!Latin!

Classical rhetoric, which forms one of the bases of modern academic work, recognizes a variety of verb tense known as the historic present or historical present. You see it all over the place--in discussing the events of a book or movie, talking about past events, or reading news headlines.

Its enduring popularity seems to stem from two roots. One, it keeps the reader or listener more engaged--the headline news example is particularly telling here. BREAKING NEWS is happening NOW and affects YOU. Versus something that happened and is over. Even though, well, the event probably did happen and may well be over, and might not actually affect your life at all. It's a rhetorical strategy (hence its roots in classical rhetoric).

Second, and most evident from the literature example, it reflects the ongoing process of experiencing a story--or a set of historical sources. The book *was* written, but we *are* reading it and can keep reading it. The *past* is past, but *history* is an evaluation of that past that we are constantly reevaluating.General advice is to do your last long run (16+ miles) 14-21 days out. A lot of plans have you do 8-10 the weekend before and 12-15 the weekend before that. The third week out is often your last 20 miler, if your plan goes that high.

I would not lift at all the week before a marathon--just rest those days. It takes 10 days to see an increase in fitness from a given workout, so *you cannot help yourself* doing extra in that time. Run just enough to keep yourself mentally sane and your legs loose.&gt; shin splints

1. Reduce mileage/number of runs per week. When I dealt with crazy shin splints coming back too fast from a calf strain this spring, I had to drop to 2x/week. It sucked, but I didn't stress fracture out.

2. Like the FAQ says, read [this comment](https://www.reddit.com/r/running/comments/y7l3f/the_ultimate_guide_to_shin_splints/c769a4d). Combined with reduced running, following this advice (daily) got me to the point where I *could* run more frequently.

3. I've never had success with compression sleeves one way or another.1548 - Whereas Henry's statutes had sought to limit the veneration of images (religious statues and painting) by, for example, prohibiting lighting candles in front of them or other signs of reverence, Edward (actually the Duke of Somerset as regent) ordered them removed from churches entirely

1549 - official replacement of Latin in church services with English (in practice there was some fluidity on both sides)

1552 - Act of Unity attempts again to implement liturgical reform a la the Book of Prayer, including completely revamping the structure of a church service

As for /u/ctesibius' comment--great observation! Thirty-eight of the Thirty-Nine Articles are 90.4% of the Forty-Two Articles passed under Edward. My understanding is that the sermons in the (First) Book of Homilies were different, shorter, and fewer than the ones in the Second. But it's the same basic idea of standarized sermons on specific topics to teach right (Anglican--not Catholic, not Anabaptist) doctrine.

Yes, Mary's ascension to the throne prevented the Forty-Two Articles from ever being enforced. Restoration of images was ordered, of course, but it could happen more slowly or quickly depending on whether a particular parish had sold their statues or just hidden them in the basement (really). Church services used the liturgy and structure of Mass again. The big change that Mary's rule did *not* reverse, of course, was the dissolution of monasteries and the abolition of chantries (the practice of paying a priest, er, donating money to the Church in exchange for a priest to say prayers for the donor's sould/donor's family members' souls). Well, a couple places attempted to revive monastic life, but even the Catholic government was not willing to fund their efforts. For example, the crown was happy to restore to the Church land that the government had seized earlier--but only if the Church paid for it.The European Middle Ages are jam-packed with attributing supernatural causes to events or just straight-up supernatural events--visions, miracles, devils. Medievalists tend to focus on why people might have been saying that and what the impact of that belief was. For example, we'll talk about Hildegard's visions not as though they factually, beyond a doubt *were* divine revelations, but from the standpoint that: at the time, they were just as good as divine revelations *regardless* of what they "actually" were, because *everyone then believed her*. And *that's* what influenced contemporary and future events.Go to a physio. I "couldn't run" for a decade because of knee issues that cranked up every time I got over a certain speed or distance. Started doing hip/core strength and flexibility work...finished my second marathon on Sunday.

Good luck!Woohoo, medieval versus Renaissance cagematch!

ETA tl;dr - Medieval universities and 'Renaissance' humanism within/growing out of them are both based in most of the same liberal arts, but with different interpretations and emphases.

~~

There is absolutely a distinction between what we think of as "medieval" and "Renaissance" higher education, but it's not quite liberal arts versus humanism. The key background points are: (1) Medieval and Renaissance approaches are rooted in overlapping classical sources (2) Renaissance humanism develops within the context of medieval education, and grows dominant within the structures of education established in medieval Europe.

In Western tradition, formal education in *liberalia studia* stretches back to ancient Rome (and of course the idea of a well-rounded education to ancient Greece). It's not until late antiquity, though, that the seven liberal *artes* get canonized: the trivium (grammar, logic,  rhetoric) and quadrivium (music, geometry, arithmetic, astronomy/astrology). These form the basis of education throughout the Middle Ages. 

Medieval education--including the birth of the modern university--is inseparable from the Church. The precursors to universities are called "cathedral schools" for a reason; *the* purpose of the first universities is to churn out licensed preachers, with just a bare handful of students staying on for further learning. The Church, and hence the clerics in its universities, are in the business of *making Christians*, including figuring out just what a Christian is and what he (always he) believes. This orientation shapes how the medieval trivium in particular develops over time.

The need to hammer out the specifics of doctrine, the desire to understand *why* Christians believed what they did, and the related goal of saying what was actually going on in all those rituals, lead to a reliance on logic--increasingly speculative over time, as the issues to focus on got more and more detail-oriented. The twelfth century figured out how it could resolve disagreements between key theologians of the early Church; the thirteenth century hashed out how the Eucharist could actually be the body and blood of Christ...the fourteenth century debated in what ways the Eucharist wafer after consecration resembled an actual human body and in what ways it didn't.

It's really with rhetoric, the third corner of the trivium, where we can see the medieval/Renaissance split. Classical rhetoric is the art of arguing well, yes but it's the art of arguing well *to build a virtuous society*. With the orientation of medieval education towards making good Christians, and a general belief that good Christians meant Christians who behaved, it's little surprise that medieval rhetorical education turned its focus towards sermons and religious instruction in practicing virtues and avoiding vices.

"The Renaissance" is less a distinct era, than a development within intellectual and artistic-literary culture that blossoms in different parts of Europe at different times. Without a descriptor, though, it usually refers to 14th-15th century Italy into laaate 15th-16th century Holy Roman Empire. (Sorry, France and England. Get your own AH shiller.) We tend to have this idea of the "Renaissance man" as the humanist writing and art-ing in his study and workshop, but it's important to remember that these scholars are coming out of the medieval education system--including the universities. They all have a background in the medieval liberal arts.

But they also all have a more classicizing orientation than "late medieval" thought (and I stick that in quotes because the Renaissance is itself a late medieval development, that takes classicizing in a different direction than parallel developments within medieval scholasticism and practical application a.k.a. preaching). They go back to sources like [Seneca](https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Moral_letters_to_Lucilius/Letter_88) and read that the liberal arts are supposed to have *practical* purpose in *creating virtue*, not endless speculation on "subtle" topics of little use. And for these Renaissance humanists in *urban* Italy and eventually Germany, that means *civic* virtue as much as religious.

So speculative logic for its own sake sees a dramatic drop in popularity, in favor of its use towards rhetoric, with an eye towards making better civic bodies as well as individuals. In conjunction with that movement, the Renaissance humanists revive the study of history (accompanying the general increased attention to the past, along with a newly critical attitude towards the authenticity of sources) ideally for the purpose, again, of building better *Christian citizens*, not just Christians.

And a central hallmark of Renaissance humanism, of course, is the revival of what they think is "pure" Latin and Greek, against the corrupting influences of medieval Latin whose sentence structure tended to evolve ("devolve," said the Renaissance men) along with the developing vernaculars. This is even reflected in formal handwriting: what we call ["humanist miniscule"](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/0/0d/Book_of_Hours_Bentivoglio.jpg/300px-Book_of_Hours_Bentivoglio.jpg) imitates what they believed to be the writing style of Roman times (which was actually the Carolingian interpretation of it, since Renaissance scholars were referring to 'Carolingian Renaissance'-era manuscripts), versus what they saw as the [ornate, decadent, obscuring medieval scripts.](http://isites.harvard.edu/fs/docs/icb.topic453618.files/Central/editions/images/anglicana.jpg) (I do have to add that casual-quick and political/secretary medieval and 'Renaissance' handwriting are equally terrible).

The insistence on re-doing Latin grammar and "ancient" handwriting leads to the final point. If our Renaissance humanists were trained in the same liberal arts and coming out of the same universities as the last of the scholastics, why the hostility? That comes from the humanists themselves. Like good classical rhetoricians, in order to implement the sweeping and gradual changes in education they wanted, they went over the top in denouncing the previous era as the "Middle" Ages, the "dark" time *in the middle* of shining Antiquity and shining Renaissance--rebirth. 

They absolutely knew they were drawing on the same subjects as their scholastic counterparts, but they were deeply insistent that the classics were superior to their immediate forerunners. And thus Lauro Quirini instructs Isotta Nogarola (who, as a woman, had no access to the university):

&gt; I absolutely insist, and I place the weight of my authority behind this, that you avoid and shun the new [medieval] philosophers and new dialecticians as men minimally schooled in True philosophy and True dialectic...They obscure the clear and lucid path of this study with goodness know what childish quibbles. They are unable to aspire to the True philosophy. Now, let me instruct you which authors you *should* follow...Wow, what a terrific demonstration of the impact of "clickbait culture." Thanks for the reference to Paoletti's work!Stress injuries are a continuum, from varying severity of stress reaction/bone marrow edema all the way to the point where the pressure from the interior swelling is so great the bone actually cracks from the inside out (stress fracture).

Because they scan everything, MRIs are great at picking up various stages of bone marrow edema. They aren't as sensitive as a CT scan at picking up the finest of hairline fractures, though.

Personal experience: I've had shin splints that I've run through with drastically reduced mileage/frequency--while monitoring them VERY VERY CLOSELY to make sure the pain was still diffuse, not coalescing into a small pointed area. I've also had a stress reaction in my foot that never fractured out, somehow. I could run through that in the beginning stages, but when it popped up at mile 21 of my first marathon, it got bad enough by 25 that I walked most of the rest of the way, and ran down the finishing chute (because cameras and crowd, of course) *bawling* from the pain. Walking was not pleasant for at least two weeks after that. I started running again without pain 3 weeks afterwards, *right* on the schedule my sports doc had told me for a metatarsal stress reaction. I never used a boot as I found the pressure from it on the top of my foot was far too painful to tolerate.

So basically, it sounds to me like you are pretty far along the stress injury spectrum, regardless of whether or not it's actually fractured out. Baby the crap out of that leg, and build back up *slowly.*The standard starter reference is probably Robert Bartlett, *The Making of Europe*. Unfortunately I don't think it's been translated into German. You will almost certainly find some German in his bibliography, though!

Lisa Wolverton and Jan Piskowski are two other important scholars who have discussed this topic, also in English.&gt; based off of the information in the book "Before European Hegemony,"

What other resources have you consulted? You've run against the main reason it's not a great idea to use only one source when researching a question: you depend *entirely* on what that one author thinks is important about the subject, and how that author has interpreted the primary sources and earlier scholarship. Might I suggest picking up a book more focused on Timurlane or Central Asia, for some new information and an additional perspective to Abu-Lughod's particular version of a world historical view?Cool!

Unfortunately I'm going to be just as West-centric...

+ Queen Elizabeth I's [Spanish Armada speech](http://www.historylearningsite.co.uk/tudor-england/queen-elizabeths-tilbury-speech/) (at Tilbury) is famous

+ Hildegard of Bingen (d 1179) was a nun, visionary, author, and public preacher (!) who excorciated the clergy and nobility of her day for wars surrounding a schism in the Church. From her we mostly have full texts, but a few of her letters note that they were originally delivered as sermons. In the translations by Baird and Ehrman, it's 15r (vol 1), 149r (Vol 2), and 223r (Vol 3).

+ Emma Goldman's 1917 [address to the jury](http://www.lib.berkeley.edu/goldman/Features/unitedstatesvsemmagoldman.html) from her trial for opposing military conscriptionWait, *I'm* confused. You are supposed to write a paper on a question the book *doesn't* answer, using only that book as a source?

I mean, if that's really the assignment, then asking us here for further information is also consulting outside sources. You'd have to work with the evidence in Abu-Lughod and Panorama, and just align it differently. Like, you said you're only seeing massacres and wholesale destruction from Timurlane's *direct* actions. So what long-term consequences might that destruction have? Like, he wiped out nearly the whole Church of the East. (That *must* be in your notes somewhere.) What immediate and future impact would that have on the religious slant of the region? How has *that* affected world history going forward? He wiped out huge swathes of population. How might that affect a region in the medium and long term?Did you do speedwork during this training cycle?

You are talking about doubling your weekly mileage, increasing the frequency of your runs, AND adding speedwork (increasing intensity), *all at the same time*. That's a recipe for injury.

Honestly, at this point you will see huge benefits from simply increasing easy mileage. Why take the risk of speedwork?Happy Wednesday, Runnit!

Uncle Pete has the first post-marathon shakeout run Wednesday for a Sunday race (i.e. today). My quads are sore but manageable; my RHR this morning was 2-3 bpm above normal. Do I jog the easy 5K? Jog/walk it? Or wait to do anything until morning heart rate is baseline again?

(I am not good at "listen to your body," hencing needing to keep track of RHR to monitor for overtraining).I mean...technically, yes. You'll be a little off balance and might hurt your shoulder from keeping your arm at a weird angle, but it's possible.

Two things.

One, tripping and falling runs the risk of breaking it again, *worse*, with an even longer recovery.

Two, sweating under a cast is terrible. First, it will reek to high heaven. Second, it will ITCH LIKE CRAZY.

When I broke my wrist, I walked 4-5 miles a day outdoors in the winter, slowly, because that's all I could handle without sweating. I had been in decent shape beforehand; I'd say it took probably 1-2 months to get it back once the cast came off. Not terrible. Of course the better shape he's in, the farther he has to fall. But--it's not permanent. I promise.TEMPORARY setback. It's TEMPORARY.

One thing he might *try* (and likely fail--I understand, trust me) to keep in mind: long-term, endurance athletes do better taking a month-ish off every year. The downtime lets your heart truly recover from all the stress.

I did get by without weight gain, because I was *really* careful about what I ate (and also I was not hungry, without exercise). It sucked not to dive into comfort food, but it was worth it afterwards. Not much to be done about the loss of muscle tone, though. Especially arms for swimming. :(

Does he have the full-blown plaster cast yet, or just the temporary splint while the swelling goes down? Is one of those [nifty plasticy 3D printed ones] (http://cdni.wired.co.uk/620x413/a_c/cast1.jpg) so sweating stops being a problem, an option at his ortho?Yeah, that's the kind I had, 'cept purple.

One thing I forgot to mention. After *scouring* the Internet and failing to find any resources for "how to cope with a sports injury without losing my bananas," I dragged myself to therapy for just those six weeks. It helped a little--I was falling into a real funk of "if I can't run, I can't do anything and the whole world is worthless and I want to be depressed and *not being depressed will mean I'm not a runner."* Which is, of course, terrific depression logic. Therapy helped a little with that.*tl;dr We don't know for sure because historical epidemiology is hard, but there are some good guesses.*

"Decline" is the right word. Outbreaks of pestilence after the initial 1346-1351 continued to be catastrophic for centuries, but never quite reached the apocalyptic proportions of what we call the Black Death.

The first time around, the outbreak burned itself out as it killed off the people most susceptible, and (probably) the pest carriers of the germ. Paleoclimatologists have recently been arguing that the waves of plague arising in Asia, then travelling to Europe and the Near East, were the result of swelling gerbil populations in the wake of a wet spring plus warm summer. The usual thought from the European perspective is that these subsequent waves of pestilence from outside would coincide with times of increased vulnerability in the population.

Within Europe, particular outbreaks often seem to coincide with periods of notable increased vulnerability: a new generation without immunity from exposure; wars and temporarily swelling urban populations (like a German city when the Reichstag met in town--lots of localized plague outbreaks surrounding these) bringing people into closer contact and hurting sanitation; periods of famine and reduced access to food weakening people's resilience.

We can't say for sure why it started to taper off even before the widespread use of antibiotics, but good guesses track along the same lines. Better ideas of nutrition and fewer famines. More systematic approaches to sanitation and quarantine. (They had no real concept of germ theory, but knew that being near infected people often went poorly). The U.S. in particular got pretty good at turning away possibly plague-ridden ships, although we had our outbreaks and a few scary near misses.I have to say I opted for the "binge watch TV shows where people are very definitely having a much worse time than me, like apocalypse-bad" strategy. But if comedy floats your boat, DO IT.

I am so, so sorry for your injury. I *swear* time will pass, and you will get back to where you were quickly, and then get even better. :)Think I'll take my Garmin to record how slow I go, for posterity. :)So first, you might need more than 2-3 weeks off to give your bones time to heal for *real*. All you're doing right now is giving the edema time to reduce to a level that's not painful. So you don't have that much breathing room to re-stress the bones once you start running again.

Probably try the toe walks/heel walks in that time.

I actually ran through *wicked* shin splints (coming off a major injury too fast). I reduced frequency to 2x/week and did toe/heel walks daily. It took I guess 1.5-2 months before I started adding in days of running.

Now, shin twingies are generally the first sign that I need to replace my shoes--I overpronate wildly.It's convenience.

One thing, though--depending on run length, you don't want to run your longest runs back-to-back or even within just a couple days of each other. (Unless you're far enough into Pfitz 18/70 and he's built you up to the point of running 15-5-20 or whatever that week is). Make sure to give your body time to recover in between the hard/long workouts.I modified Higdon Novice 2 for my first half. The key that made the race go so well for me was that I increased the length of one of the midweek runs, building up to 9 miles (I have a great 3 mile loop). That made a big difference in my endurance on race day.

Indy is *such* a terrific city to run in. You're going to have a blast!Yes, because what "pestilence" actually was is sometimes still debated (but we're pretty sure it was Y. pestis, probably with bubonic and pneumonic variants), I wanted to keep that out of my answer.

The long-term genetic or epigenetic immunity factor is really intriguing!

&gt; As hygiene, nutrition, and quarantine improved, the disease spread more to the vermin. 

Isn't the point here more, as sanitation improves, there are fewer rodents around to transmit it to people?That--unlike the way we usually talk about every other subject in school--having a bad history teacher doesn't mean you had a bad teacher, it means history is boring.That doesn't make sense to me. If the germ is limited to rodents, wouldn't becoming more deadly to the rodents be an evolutionary (literal) dead end? It might become more *infectious* (I think that's the word for "easily transmitted"), but not more severe in impact, right?

I mean, I sort of see that you're going down the line of "pestilence has less reason to maintain its infectious nature WRT humans," but I didn't think evolution worked that way...?I am explicitly referring to [this article](http://foxtrotalpha.jalopnik.com/the-secret-story-of-how-bubonic-plague-nearly-broke-out-1689284222) from that most scholarly of sources, Gawker Media (haters to the left--I read io9 sometimes). It's got a great account of how the author tracked down and verified his first source. Its link to [an article about the 1900 San Francisco outbreak](http://www.sfgate.com/bayarea/article/S-F-leaders-denied-concealed-major-plague-5768180.php) is also well worth reading.

ETA: All right, y'all don't like investigative journalism in lieu of peer-reviewed historiography (which is fair, given my source), try this on for size:

Caten and Kartman, "Human Plague in the United States 1900-1966," *JAMA* 205 no. 6 (Aug. 1968):

&gt; Humans with plague were found on incoming ships in New York and San Francisco in 1899, Port Townsend, Wash in 1900; and New Orleans in 1924 and 1926.In that letter, Quirini specifically recommends Boethius, Aristotle, Cicero, various Roman histories, and medieval Muslim commentators (in Latin translation) on ancient Greek texts.

More generally: Cicero is, of course, the Renaissance saint par excellence. Neoplatonic authors like Porphyry, Plotinus, and Lactantius got a lot of airtime, too. Aristotle was rather divisive, due to how heavily the later Middle Ages were seen to rely on him. A lot of humanists wanted nothing to do with that, baby/bathwater-style. And a lot of humanist attention focused on religious sources. Starting in the late fourteenth into the fifteenth centuries, theologians relied more and more on patristic authors, especially Jerome and Augustine. They took a really intense interest in revisiting the Bible, debating the validity of new (better?) translations. But it's not a unified "curriculum" by any means--individual humanists are reading the authors that they're interested in on topics they're interested in.

In my experience, "humanist" as a personal label usually refers to one's ideological orientation. One of the things I'm interested in as a historian is "popular humanism"--ways in which formal humanist/classical ideas seeped out of elite circles into the populace. So you have authors like 15th century barber-surgeon Hans Folz, who had no university education, managing to obtain copies of the medical texts being read by university students training as doctors of medicine. "Jerome" (Hieronymus) skyrockets in popularity to become one of the most popular names for boys in 16th century Nuremberg. Those parents sure aren't reading Cicero in the original Latin or wrangling over the particular process Jerome used to translate the Vulgate with opinions on how to improve it, but they're absorbing something of a Renaissance-y ethos.You're welcome! It was a great question. How we talk about history is really important.Thanks for this explanation, and your patience in this thread. I'm going to do some further reading and get a handle on this (I obviously think it's interesting and just as obviously don't know what I'm talking about, hehe); I think the SIV/HIV case will be a great place to start.But that's just referring to genetic mutation, right? I was thinking more of epigenetics, the factors that influence whether a particular existing gene is expressed or not. Like how nutrition news keeps talking about how today's humans eat less and gain more weight than our pre-Depression/Dust Bowl ancestors, or even our 1980s peers.

I cannot stress enough how little I know what I am talking about here. ;)In late medieval/early modern Germany, aliases are frequently (thought not always) associated with the, shall we say, shadier end of society. Is there any trace of this in the records? I would assume not or you'd have mentioned it, but I thought it was worth asking anyway. :)Um, this is a great (and enormous) question, but it definitely merits its own question-thread! I think comparison within a thread is inevitable, and here the best partner to my top-level answer would really be what medieval Muslim scholars thought of the *Bible*. On that I unfortunately have no clue. (batsignal /u/shlin28 or /u/yodatsracist, perhaps?) (And psst, if you do ask, specify time period. We like that here. :D)Wow, uh, thanks, this means a lot. I'm thrilled that people are interested in *historical* answers to historical questions, not just ones from a modern polemical angle--/r/AskHistorians is the best.I'm talking about two different sources! The *Doctrina Iacobi* recognizes the prophetic, religious, apocalyptic, whatever you want to call it from that mention angle of the rising movement. Bede's *Historia Ecclesiastica*, a century later, doesn't.&gt; but I think it is worth mentioning that it is pretty hard to identify a general pattern for the earlier period, a problem made all the more annoying when our sources are pretty terrible for the seventh century as a whole.

Oh yeah, absolutely! The brief but tantalizing connection with religion is why IMHO the Doctrina Iacobi is so interesting.Your question actually needs to be flipped around: when did other countries *stop* insisting upon a liberal arts foundation.

The modern university system was born in the Latin (European) Middle Ages, in Paris and Bologna. The medieval curriculum was founded on the liberal arts: the *trivium* of grammar, rhetoric, logic; and the *quadrivium* of arithmetic, geometry, astronomy/astrology, and music. Only upon completion of those would a student advance to study the higher faculties: law, theology, or medicine.

For their part, the tradition of founding one's studies in the liberal arts goes back to ancient Greece.

You might be find these answers helpful:

* [How did the descriptors Bachelor and Doctor come to signify a person's completed level of education?] (https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3n27cn/how_did_the_descriptors_such_as_bachelor_and/cvkf9de)

* [Humanist vs. liberal arts education: were they different in the Renaissance?] (https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3olhdz/humanistic_vs_liberal_arts_education_were_the_two/cvyc3yk)I actually asked this exact question a couple months ago! Consensus seemed to be that the [Oxford World Classics edition](https://global.oup.com/academic/product/the-quran-9780199535958?cc=us&amp;lang=en&amp;) by M.A.S. Abdel Haleem is becoming the standard accepted English translation for general use. Muslims scholars in the 12th century participated in the translation of scholarly texts from Arabic to Latin (both Arabic originals, and translations from ancient Greek), but they never translated the Quran.

In Islamic tradition, the Quran as a holy text can only be read in Arabic: it is the verbally-revealed actual words of God. To use the text for prayer or to study the text for religious-scholarly purposes, therefore, *must* be done in Arabic.

Christian scholars, they knew, had no interest in reading the Quran for devotional or theological purposes. So why would Muslim scholars translate it into Latin for the Christians to use as source for anti-Islamic polemic? As the Muslims saw it, if Christians' interest in the holy text was genuine, they would willingly learn Arabic so as to read God's actual words.

This is a pattern: Muslims are supposed to learn Arabic to read the Quran; it is not to be translated. In Islam, "God speaks Arabic, period." Well, almost. One interesting exception comes out of the Middle Ages. There's a rich medieval tradition of translating the Quran into Persian.

During the early spread of Islam, scholars often talk about Arabization preceding Islamization: that is, in conquered lands, Arabic language and culture was adopted by the public much more quickly than Islam. Persia was always a special case. It didn't just retain more of its original culture and *especially* literary traditions, those native traditions actually influenced Islam in its region. So medieval Persian manuscripts, for example, will depict human beings including Muhammad (!), which is typically *strictly* forbidden in Islam. Persia nurtured its own strong and in fact very influential literary tradition. Some of the most famous texts from the medieval Islamic world, to today, come out of Persia originally: the Shahnameh, Layla &amp; Majnun, etc. Tied in with this is a preservation or elevation of the Persian language even with the general domination of Arabic. And so you get Persian translations of a text that is not supposed to be translated.Wow, what a terrific question. So there is actually a lot going on here; I'll try to simplify it but I apologize in advance if I make a muddle instead. ;)

Denouncing Islam/the Quran as pagan (which you're right, they did) delegitimizes the Quran as a *holy* text, a source of religious truth. Done and done. But there are two more things to consider.

First, the 12th century witnesses a massive effort to translate *scholarly* texts from Arabic into Latin--these include both the ancient Greek works that had been preserved by early medieval Muslim scholars in Arabic, and Arabic original works. So medieval Latin Christians were actually quite used to reading works by Muslim scholars as having *scholarly* or academic authority. (They were skeptical and critical, and Christian scholars seen to rely too heavily on Muslim philosophers like Averroes received some pushback, but Muslim scholars were treated as important authorities nevertheless).

One of the things Burman argues in *Reading the Quran in Latin Christendom*, in fact, is that the Latin translations of the Quran treat the book mostly like "just" another scholarly text from the Islamic world. Therefore, sure, Christians are going to poke around at all the things that are wrong with it. Which brings us to...

Second, we are talking about medieval scholastic tradition here. And scholasticism is *infamous* for being exhaustive. They ask ALL THE QUESTIONS. So pointing out trends in the text is exactly what we'd expect. But, you say, why highlight the bad trends and not the good ones? Which leads to...

Third, Christians are not merely concerned with denouncing Islam's holy text. They are at war with Muslims; they are concerned with denouncing Muslims. How do you denounce your enemy in the Middle Ages? You portray them as (a) religiously misguided (pagan or heretical) (b) barbarian and violent (c) immoral. This is bog-standard. Elsewhere in this thread, /u/freeogy mentions that Crusade-era Arabic sources portray the *Franj* (Franks--Latin Christians) the same way: idolators, barbaric (brutal in battle with terrible strategy--just, damn that very nice armor), and immoral (your upper-class women are shameless! your men have no beards!). Idolatry is certain enough to delegitimize the *religion* of the Franks, but that's only one part of the agenda. It's not just about the religion, it's about its followers.But "general education classes" are the parallel to the trivium and quadrivium: you can think of it as your humanities (literature, history, philosophy) and freshman writing requirement, your math requirement, your arts requirement, your science requirement. The difference is, in many American schools, you take your core classes alongside your major classes. In the medieval/Renaissance system, you take the core classes first, for your bachelor's, and only then go on to your "major" in law, medicine, theology. (By the 17th century, the doctoral faculties are expanding. The first female PhD was literally a doctor *of philosophy*--she had to study in the faculty of philosophy because, as a woman, she was denied a place in theology.)Ah, but this is why I spent so much time explaining what I meant by "monasticism" *in Christianity* in a post on pseudo-monasticism in Islam. :)

By the later Middle Ages, new religious orders and quasi-religious orders (ones without formal papal approval, but that enjoy local support from bishops and secular nobles in some cases) spring up all over Latin Christendom. With the mendicant orders--which is the umbrella term for any Franciscan or Dominican friars--the big innovation is actually the breaking of cloister. Although in the Middle Ages mendicant *women* are still cloistered like regular nuns, that is, they are not supposed to leave their convent's boundaries, mendicant *men* are active "in the world." They preach in local churches, teach in universities, travel around Europe preaching and teaching the public. But at that point, we are beyond "monasticism." It's still a religious order, but it's not formally *monastic*: a term that implies lifelong vows and claustration.Both traditions definitely exist. I'm not aware of scholarship that tries to demarcate boundaries for the use of each term (it's probably out there, though). Tolan in *Saracens* seems to imply that people with more knowledge of Islam, either through personal contact or through reading/study, were more likely to portray it as a heresy.

This is supported, as you note, by the wild suppositions that track with calling Islam "paganism," such as the Song of Roland stating that Saracens worship Mahumet, Termagant, and...Apollo. Even minor exposure to Islam tells you that that's incorrect.

Tolan also suggests that perhaps some authors used heresy or paganism to really talk about *Christianity* in contrast, so that could be a factor. (But in popular literature, this probably had its limits. We can talk about the "theology of *Roland*" today, sure, but its medieval readers were not reading it like Civitate Dei.)

They didn't fight over what Islam was, but they sure battled it out over what to do about it.Well, I'll step up and recommend the general corpus of **Bart Ehrman**. His introduction to the New Testament is the go-to textbook for undergrad intro classes (and is on the AH booklist). But in addition to his actual scholarship (he is at UNC), he's published a variety of eminently readable books on Jesus, the Bible, and early Christianity.

My interest runs more towards the biblical and early Church end of things, so my favorites are *Misquoting Jesus* and *Lost Christianities*. [Here's his Goodreads page](http://www.goodreads.com/author/show/643.Bart_D_Ehrman) so you can click through the different books he's written and see what interests you!Does it have to be Nike? Zazzle.com has "Activewear" options for women and men from New Balance, Champion, and a generic. For men they have a couple of adidas items, too.This is a really interesting question.

My personal favorite primary source (on everything), Hans Folz in 15th century Nuremberg, just rants about *der geistlich stant predigt*--so, clergy in general preaching.

A lot of the indirect evidence for lay people getting bored with sermons comes of course from traveling preachers talking about outdoor sermons, so that body of evidence is strongly biased in that direction.

Contracts between 15th century German villages and priests suggest the peasants were concerned about simply getting regular sermons in the first place, which would imply the traditional liturgical context. (In Germany, sermons were more likely preached after Mass rather than during, however.)Accepted--certainly not, on account of clerical celibacy. But it definitely happened. Ruth Mazo Karras' study of prostitution in late medieval England notes that there were even prostitutes who *specialized* in servicing monks and friars. In places where prostitution was legal, she turns up several cases of clergics or groups of clerics who owned houses that leased rooms to individual prostitutes, flat-out owned a brothel, or--in one case--seems to have run a brothel out of the parish refectory. (Those owners would be non-monastic clergy, to be fair.)Mental illnesses are very culturally conditioned and constructed, and it's sometimes possible to identify, in medieval sources, patterns of symptoms that we today would recognize as similar to what we call a distinct disorder. This can be a dangerous path, though--looking for symptoms from a checklist is an imposition of modern ideas onto a past. It's much more helpful to investigate how medieval people understood the world. If you're interested in reading more about this topic in general, try looking up Caroline Walker Bynum's *Holy Feast and Holy Fast* versus Rudolph Bell's *Holy Anorexia*.

In this specific case of magically-induced learning, for example, it's pretty clear from the texts that being tormented by demons is a didactic (instructional) device. John of Morigny is writing *against* the existing *ars notoria* and variant traditions of using prayer-magic for learning (while promoting his own version). So he uses the example of someone whom he taught to read via prayer incantations, and describes how she (his sister) suffered for it. Reports of and *by* medieval people having visions of demons are all over medieval literature, including by and about some of our greatest writers from the era; little anecdotes involving demons appearing to people are commonly used to illustrate sermons. Medieval people reading John's *Flowers of Heavenly Teaching*--and, to the extent the story is real, Bridget and John themselves--would have understood her experience as a real thing that happened.As far as official contracts, people could go to an educated notary to draft legal documents. There are a lot of dox signed with a hash or an X. (But that doesn't necessarily indicate illiteracy, since reading and writing were different skills.)

However, Clanchy asserts that in England, merchants weren't really keeping records for themselves until the 14th century. It happens a little earlier in cities in Italy and the Low Countries. Overall, the evidence of both acts by notaries *and* early merchant records suggests people were much more concerned with having an account of individual transactions, rather than overall sums. People did use tally sticks to keep track of amounts, though.&gt; If your local parish priest was literate, and had at some point happened upon a opy of one of the ancient Roman histories, Tacitus or something, you could assume he'd be able to tell people about Ancient Rome.

Ugh, this is bothering me, sorry. Reading Tacitus or Suetonius directly, in Latin, is *not* how people who could read knew about Rome in the Middle Ages. (Yes, I'm well aware that our surviving classical texts are medieval copies, and yes, obviously there are exceptions). They're getting the remix version: excerpts and interpretations in world chronicles like Otto or the Nuremberg *Weltchronik*, in whatever pieces of Vincent de Beauvais they have access to, through apocryphal details in hagiography of early Church saints, as filled-in details from narrative retellings of the Bible (*Historienbibel* and Gospel harmonies). They're getting the bits of classical mythology they pick up in Chaucer and the Ovid moralis\u00e9.

In fact, the medieval tradition of history writing like the *Weltchronik* suggests that medieval interest in history mostly had to do with finding the contemporary world's place in it. Valuing history as *history* really comes along with humanism in the fifteenth-sixteenth centuries.

People who went on pilgrimage to Rome certainly saw the ruins for themselves, but I have no idea what they would have learned about them from "tour guides." Please tell me where exactly in a post that says:

&gt; But that only concerns the Eucharist. As to church services themselves...

I mixed up reception of sacraments and attendance at church.

/u/idjet covers the important distinction between prescription and description in our sources very nicely.In the early Middle Ages, very few women *or* men learned to read, and even fewer to write. The ones who did were associated with the Church: priests, monks, nuns, and for the most part we are talking about Latin.

In the high Middle Ages, an interesting development occurs. On one hand, formal education through the Church to train clergy to preach in public excludes women, who cannot preach in the Middle Ages. Women are shut out of the developing cathedral schools and eventually universities. This is a Latin education that they cannot receive.

However, at the same time the groundwork for the university system is being laid, noblewomen in particular are learning to read, and sometimes write, *in their vernacular* (Middle English, Middle Low German, Anglo-Norman, etc). Some of our most important early vernacular authors are women! Even in vernacular texts attributed to men, we can often see that they were written primarily for a female audience, or that copies were owned by women/women's religious communities.

By the late Middle Ages, mothers were socially assigned the responsibility of teaching their children the basics of religious doctrine and, if they could, rudimentary reading (vernacular, again). Men still had access to formal education that women did not. A few convents did run schools that girls who did not intend to become nuns could attend, but these are pretty rare until the 16th century.

So it's not a systematic exclusion of women from *reading*; in fact, in some ways medieval women were more literate than men. However, by the *medieval* benchmark of *Latin* literacy, a few very privileged men from privileged (noble, moneyed) backgrounds received a Latin education as preparation for a career preaching and teaching religion, which women were not allowed to do.The Nike Structure is a "stability" (sometimes "support") shoe that is designed to help keep your foot from striking the ground and then rolling inward (overpronating). The Asics Cumulus is a "neutral" shoe that does not have the same built-in support.

Everyone has their own opinion on what type of shoe *you* (yes, you) should be wearing, generally based on their own experience. The best thing to do is wear shoes that work for you. Good running stores--including online ones like Running Warehouse--allow you a grace period to test out new shoes (30-60 days, usually) to see if they work. If they don't--it seems like the Cumulus aren't working--you should be able to exchange them for a different pair.

I, personally, find that what types of shoe work for me is much more dependent on the individual shoe than on any label of stability or neutral.

The Nike Zoom Structure is a fine running shoe! If you're still interested in trying similar models from other brands, check out the Brooks Ravenna, Saucony Guide, New Balance 870, Asics GT-2000, Mizuno Wave Inspire.

To illustrate how individual this is, though, I gave myself bad bad shin splints in the Brooks Ravenna and healed them with the Asics GT-2000 (and lots of toe walking and heel walking)--even though everyone will tell you those are nearly interchangeable shoes.&gt; I can't prove this about medieval period, but based upon the complaints of ministers and priest in the 1400s and later

Hey now, them's fighting words. :) 15th century is still medieval, especially concerning the end of your comment, on the relationship between profane and ecclesiastical authority. But yes, even Bernard of Clairvaux in the 12th century complains about nonattention to his (typically wildly popular) crusade sermons. I talked earlier in this thread about the sermon and literary use of the demon Titivillus and his predecessors who punish people gossiping during religious events elsewhere in this thread--that tradition also stretches back to the high Middle Ages.

&gt; The church also stood somewhat as a buffer between peasantry and the aristocracy.

Ehhh...the word "somewhat" is carrying a lot of weight in that sentence. The Church often sought to portray itself as concerned with the common people, but you can't get away from the fact that the Church often *was* the aristocracy, sometimes even with the bishop-lord or abbot-lord (in the high Middle Ages, perhaps an abbess-lord) as the local ruler. There are a *lot* of complaints from peasants--Iberia has been studied the most closely here, I think--about local priests as well as religious orders abusing their authority, cheating people, committing crimes and getting away with it. When Church synods address the violence of lords against peasants, they come down much more harshly on non-clerical princes than on ecclesiastical ones.

That's not to say religious orders and quasi-orders didn't run the medieval equivalent of homeless shelters, and "pre-Reformation" scholarship is quite clear that the vast, vast majority of the laity were deeply "ecclesiastically pious" [right up until they suddenly weren't](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3m0bej/if_i_was_active_in_church_life_in_the_hre_around/cvazi8f)--but medieval people's relationship with "the Church" is as multifaceted as the medieval Church itself.&gt;  Most notably, I would point out St. Francis and the entire Franciscan order. 

The Franciscans were subject to exactly the same "for every P, a Q" as the rest of the medieval Church (which I think you know perfectly well ;) ). Apostolic poverty and sometimes "poverty" did not always translate to a *practical* concern for the actual poor, although sometimes they did.

The point is simply that the medieval Church was a diverse creature, and it's hard to talk about a "peasants' relationship with the Church" instead of people's experiences with specific parts of it in different times and places.Fortunately, in my experience the medievalists of /r/AskHistorians have been quite skilled at presenting the medieval Church in its vices *and* virtues, as good historians ought. :)A second vote for /u/idjet's [epic 4-comment answer](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qyw8y/how_exactly_did_the_papalmedieval_inquisition/cwjh6b6) on inquisition in medieval Europe, which unites knowledge of secondary scholarship with original research. It's one of if not *the* best descriptions of medieval inquisition and its genesis that I've ever read. Please don't miss that one this week.

/u/XenophonTheAthenthian is a philosopher-king among mortals for describing the [political, legal, and social aspects of exile in ancient Rome]
(https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qyb9e/how_exactly_did_exile_work_in_the_ancient_world/cwjirig) and then giving me a crash course in Roman private law.

/u/alricofgar puts medieval archaeology to possibly its best use ever to answer ["Didst thou even hoist, fra?"](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qs3at/how_fit_was_the_average_person_in_the_middle_ages/cwi86uv)

And in case you missed it, I thought our special guest /u/Kathryn_Gin_Lum did an amazing job fielding some really fascinating questions [in her AMA](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qo1tm/ama_damned_nation_hell_in_america_from_the/) this week.Thank you and /u/The_Alaskan for the shoutout! :) I'm honored to be mentioned in such fine company.tl;dr - No.

Medieval lords had nothing to gain and a lot to lose from a smaller peasant population. They were not responsible for feeding and sheltering their serfs. They *did* collect taxes from them, and likewise many serfs also owed their lord a certain number of days of direct service (fixing up the castle or something) per year.

The best comparison I can think of is the situation after the Black Death of 1346-1351. The population of Europe dropped so dramatically that labor was at a premium. Wages *skyrocketed* between 1350 and 1400. And when lords tried to push back, most famously in England circa 1381, the result could be massive, violent peasant revolt.No, why would I? ;)

Ruth Mazo Karras, *Common Women: Prostitution and Sexuality in Medieval England*

To you, I would also strongly recommend her *Sexuality in Medieval Europe: Doing Unto Others* and perhaps *Unmarriages: Women, Men, and Sexual Unions in the Middle Ages*I BQed. Plenty of room to spare. I ain't afraid of no offset...The ecumenical status of the synod you have cited elsewhere is disputed. If you have a citation to Gratian I would appreciate it.

In the later Middle Ages, local synods issue decree after decree regulating how often people receive the sacrament. They are not as concerned from *legal* (canon law) standpoing about Sunday Mass. That is not to say they didn't try to get people into churches. The theatrics surrounding consecration and the efforts to make liturgical sermons more interesting (cf central and northern Italy in the 15th century) are strong evidence that people were "supposed" to be in church on Sunday. But required? The *medieval* evidence that I've seen is very ambiguous.

If people *were* "legally required" to attend more frequently, they may or may not have known it. They *definitely* knew about sacramental reception.I agree it was common for people to attend Church every Sunday and feast day. I have never said otherwise.  The guidelines for confession that are *everywhere* in the fifteenth century, and tell us *the things priests teach people about religion*, seem to imply that overall it was strongly recommended ("skipping without a good excuse is a sin").Quick clarification:

&gt; To my knowledge, there was no cross-over between being a barber and being a doctor in Roman times. That was an 18th century thing.

It's actually medieval. Barbers were in charge of basic surgical practices, including leeching and amputations, and they were legally obligated to stick around and treat people during outbreaks of plague. (Physicians were not).

Really interesting answer!How much should you let cooler weather affect training paces? At what increase in speed or min/mile are your legs not ready to keep up with the easier time your heart and lungs are having?

Bit too sore after my long run yesterday, and I'm not sure whether it was the faster pace or it being the first time I've done a long run on rolling hills in six weeks (taper + marathon recovery).Yes, this. All of the other things listed are wonderful, but they are things I would save up for, for myself. Sports massage for most runners is a True luxury--the thing you want, but you always need or "need" something else.Yup, Dominik Gro\u00df has written quite a bit about barber-surgeons well into the 19th century in Germany! And at least in the Middle Ages, some of them traveled with armies, so it would make sense to me that they'd be with navies, too. I just meant, they existed during the Middle Ages, too. :)In a historiography paper, your goal is to look at what previous scholars have written on a specific subject. You identify what are considered the most important books and articles on the topic. Ideally, you will be able to identify specific sub-topics that scholars have focused on. You might look at how what scholars have said or what they are interested in changes over time.

John Van Engen's 1986 article "The Christian Middle Ages as an Historiographical Problem" (*American Historical Review* 91, no. 3) is considered a seminal work of medieval historiography. You might look at it as a guideline.

Your own focus for your paper will be *much* more specific than "the entire Middle Ages." I've written historiography papers on topics like "women in the German Reformation" and "Hildegard of Bingen."

[This webpage](https://www.trentu.ca/history/workbook/historiography.php) includes excerpts from two historiography papers explaining what the elements are.This is terrific; thank you and /u/grantimatter so much! I'd never thought about the impact of mosquitos on clothing before.

You even inadvertently answered my immediate follow-up question, did colonial fashion influence European trends at all, with the Marie Antoinette example.Celsus, [*De Medicina*](http://penelope.uchicago.edu/Thayer/E/Roman/Texts/Celsus/home.html), Latin and LCL English translation (public domain)Like /u/ecatt alluded, I'd highly recommend getting some *actual lights*. You can get slap bracelet-like arm and ankle banks with flashing LEDs, or clip-on lights that you can attach to your jacket pockets, headband/hat, or a running belt of some sort.

With reflective gear, your visibility is passive. You depend on cars, cyclists, and other runners to have their own lights that will light you up. However, headlights go out. Cyclists' headlights can be narrow-beam. Runners are frequently more concerned with their own visibility (wearing blinkies) than lighting a path--I know my headlamp is perfect for even trail running in pitch black conditions, but it doesn't add all that much to streetlights, so I don't wear it if all I'm running is neighborhood road. If all you have is reflective striping, to me on the sidewalk you might as well be in flat gray, i.e. black.Paradoxically, people can only ask questions about what they know. This can happen through knowledge of past persons or events, such as asking why Rome fell; or it can come by extrapolating from their own life, such as asking how homosexuality was viewed in a specific time and place.

If it seems like most people have the same questions about Jesus, American slavery, and Hitler, it means historians need to get better at letting the world in on the awesome "secrets" that we shouldn't be keeping!...Unless it's your take-home essay question and no one answered it when you posted it 4 hours earlier. ;)

The worst is when I *know* it's a straight-up school assignment, but it's a really juicy question and I want to answer it anyway for everyone else's benefit.In all seriousness--if someone's flair strikes your fancy, it's a terrific idea to first of all see if they have a [user profile](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/wiki/profiles) with links to some questions they've answered. Some flairs have more FAQ-type stuff listed, but others also choose the questions and answers they have liked the most, which can lead to some really cool, in-depth things I *never* would have thought to ask about.

The other thing to do is PM! If, say, you're interested in 20th century Middle Eastern history but all you know is vaguely "didn't Israel happen", PM someone flaired in Islamic Studies or Modern Middle East or something (or PM someone without flair who you've seen answer questions in that field, of course!). Ask them if they can help you think of a question on a subtopic you're interested in. For example, they can help you get from "Tell me something about women in Islam" to a good, post-able AH question like "how did Ataturk's reforms affect women's lives outside the home?"

And finally, whatever the actual *subject* of the posts linked in the Sunday Digests and under the "gilded" tab, the answers that people tend to really really like are usually (though not always) ones that throw in delicious examples or details as illustration of whatever question. So even a question that seems at first to unite everything someone might roll their eyes at like ["How fit was Hitler"](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qat0p/how_fit_was_hitler/cwduf3x?context=3) gets an answer from in this case /u/Astrogator, who ends up teaching you by implication a *ton* about personal medicine, perceptions of disease and disability, and prescription drug abuse in the mid-20th century--not just about Hitler.I don't know when book titles shifted. However, long titles in the early modern era were a marketing device! They informed the reader of the contents of the text. Sort of how today we might read the publisher's blurb on the back of the book or as the description on Amazon or Google Books.

This was helpful in cases where a book or pamphlet was *one* text by one author, but even more useful when a printer published an edition that combined several texts or excerpts from them.It's a variation on the Templar flag, the red cross on a white field. (And specifically, the variation used by the Portuguese Order of Christ, subsequently adopted by the Kongolese nobility). I had noticed it on banners depicted in a painting (which I can't find on the Internet). [Here's a modern illustration](http://api.ning.com/files/xuMwKMTkGS1TNsU7aN6prOhLUWSsyxPySJ4xPbTmpZXMv9Hwwk9LmIac85dxSi5PijdLSJLqIo1ppQyonBJ62MjlwYY7uXLE/CapuchinMissionaryandhisEntouragebeingGreetedinFrontofVillageSognoKingdomofKongo1740sPaolaColloandSilviaBensoSognoBambaPembaOvandoMilan1986.jpg?width=750). In her book, Fromont discusses finding the cross [on Kongolese gravestones](https://books.google.com/books?id=Ax8VBQAAQBAJ&amp;pg=PA80&amp;lpg=PA80&amp;dq=templar+cecile+fromont&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=nkW8e1RlYO&amp;sig=4Rq66W1Z4t9rlE1qbHLbazZ9bPM&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CEUQ6AEwCWoVChMI9M7Dnf30yAIVAd9jCh3l-giZ#v=onepage&amp;q&amp;f=False) as well.&gt; One from a few years ago that I particularly cherish began "What was High School like in ancient Greece?" and included sub-questions about how lockers were secured before the invention of padlocks, and how teachers co-ordinated lesson times without clocks.

The best part of this is that [the ancient Greeks actually did have locks](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qubs9/since_mechanical_locks_werent_perfected_until_the/cwippe6).

Which we can all agree they used to secure their lockers in their high schools.I'm not sure how this is supposed to be a robot or relate to magnetic philosophy or science. In medieval and early modern Christianity, the lobster is a symbol of resurrection. Pliny the Elder observes that the lobster molts every year--sheds its shell and acquires a new one. In Christianity, this symbolizes resurrection, especially of Jesus.

This particular image is *very* clearly Eucharistic, hence the chalice. You see lobsters and grapes--another Eucharistic symbol--with some frequency in early modern Low Countries art. If the image features a decapitated (?) lobster bleeding, it is instructional. The lobster's blood is the blood of Jesus is the consecrated Communion wine.

On the other hand, if the lobster is not bleeding but actually vomiting, the image is satirical: the lobster came to *satirize* the Jesuits by the later early modern period. The image would then mean that the Jesuits desecrate Communion wine somehow, probably by being Jesuits. They were not always so popular in early modern times.

Being unable to tell the difference is why I am not an art historian.

Do you have a source for the image?WAIT! I think I was wrong before. I mean, I'm right about the lobster being a symbol of resurrection, and I still think the impact of that particular image is Eucharistic because of the chalice (unless that's just what cups looked like then?), but I tracked down the fascination with--yes--vomiting lobster. It's not that the lobster itself is a robot; it's that the lobster is *acting like* a basic machine: a siphon.

A cooked lobster, laid with its tail in a vat of liquid but the majority of the lobster hanging over the side, will siphon up the liquid through capillary action and "vomit" it into a second dish--the lobster acts as a straw or siphon. [Here you can see](https://books.google.com/books?id=8LtPeLH3iHYC&amp;pg=PA200&amp;lpg=PA200&amp;dq=lobster+resurrection+symbolism&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=dYnfjiiBK4&amp;sig=OzWUTq86WweaMY6qsDHhGMezQdE&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CDQQ6AEwBGoVChMIzqrV1d_1yAIVCNgeCh1o-QoD#v=onepage&amp;q=lobster%20resurrection%20symbolism&amp;f=False) the lobster, symbolizing the resurrection next to Eucharistic symbols (the grapes), but positioned to act like a siphon as well.

Are you perhaps at Princeton? Because based on what you said, your professor's lecture tracked very closely with [this lecture](http://www.sil.si.edu/silpublications/dibner-library-lectures/2002-Grafton/Grafton_2002.pdf) (ETA: PDF warning) Anthony Grafton (of Princeton) presented in 2002.Does it have to be Nike? Zazzle.com has "Activewear" options for women and men from New Balance, Champion, and a generic. For men they have a couple of adidas items, too.This is a really interesting question.

My personal favorite primary source (on everything), Hans Folz in 15th century Nuremberg, just rants about *der geistlich stant predigt*--so, clergy in general preaching.

A lot of the indirect evidence for lay people getting bored with sermons comes of course from traveling preachers talking about outdoor sermons, so that body of evidence is strongly biased in that direction.

Contracts between 15th century German villages and priests suggest the peasants were concerned about simply getting regular sermons in the first place, which would imply the traditional liturgical context. (In Germany, sermons were more likely preached after Mass rather than during, however.)Accepted--certainly not, on account of clerical celibacy. But it definitely happened. Ruth Mazo Karras' study of prostitution in late medieval England notes that there were even prostitutes who *specialized* in servicing monks and friars. In places where prostitution was legal, she turns up several cases of clergics or groups of clerics who owned houses that leased rooms to individual prostitutes, flat-out owned a brothel, or--in one case--seems to have run a brothel out of the parish refectory. (Those owners would be non-monastic clergy, to be fair.)Mental illnesses are very culturally conditioned and constructed, and it's sometimes possible to identify, in medieval sources, patterns of symptoms that we today would recognize as similar to what we call a distinct disorder. This can be a dangerous path, though--looking for symptoms from a checklist is an imposition of modern ideas onto a past. It's much more helpful to investigate how medieval people understood the world. If you're interested in reading more about this topic in general, try looking up Caroline Walker Bynum's *Holy Feast and Holy Fast* versus Rudolph Bell's *Holy Anorexia*.

In this specific case of magically-induced learning, for example, it's pretty clear from the texts that being tormented by demons is a didactic (instructional) device. John of Morigny is writing *against* the existing *ars notoria* and variant traditions of using prayer-magic for learning (while promoting his own version). So he uses the example of someone whom he taught to read via prayer incantations, and describes how she (his sister) suffered for it. Reports of and *by* medieval people having visions of demons are all over medieval literature, including by and about some of our greatest writers from the era; little anecdotes involving demons appearing to people are commonly used to illustrate sermons. Medieval people reading John's *Flowers of Heavenly Teaching*--and, to the extent the story is real, Bridget and John themselves--would have understood her experience as a real thing that happened.As far as official contracts, people could go to an educated notary to draft legal documents. There are a lot of dox signed with a hash or an X. (But that doesn't necessarily indicate illiteracy, since reading and writing were different skills.)

However, Clanchy asserts that in England, merchants weren't really keeping records for themselves until the 14th century. It happens a little earlier in cities in Italy and the Low Countries. Overall, the evidence of both acts by notaries *and* early merchant records suggests people were much more concerned with having an account of individual transactions, rather than overall sums. People did use tally sticks to keep track of amounts, though.&gt; If your local parish priest was literate, and had at some point happened upon a opy of one of the ancient Roman histories, Tacitus or something, you could assume he'd be able to tell people about Ancient Rome.

Ugh, this is bothering me, sorry. Reading Tacitus or Suetonius directly, in Latin, is *not* how people who could read knew about Rome in the Middle Ages. (Yes, I'm well aware that our surviving classical texts are medieval copies, and yes, obviously there are exceptions). They're getting the remix version: excerpts and interpretations in world chronicles like Otto or the Nuremberg *Weltchronik*, in whatever pieces of Vincent de Beauvais they have access to, through apocryphal details in hagiography of early Church saints, as filled-in details from narrative retellings of the Bible (*Historienbibel* and Gospel harmonies). They're getting the bits of classical mythology they pick up in Chaucer and the Ovid moralis\u00e9.

In fact, the medieval tradition of history writing like the *Weltchronik* suggests that medieval interest in history mostly had to do with finding the contemporary world's place in it. Valuing history as *history* really comes along with humanism in the fifteenth-sixteenth centuries.

People who went on pilgrimage to Rome certainly saw the ruins for themselves, but I have no idea what they would have learned about them from "tour guides." Please tell me where exactly in a post that says:

&gt; But that only concerns the Eucharist. As to church services themselves...

I mixed up reception of sacraments and attendance at church.

/u/idjet covers the important distinction between prescription and description in our sources very nicely.In the early Middle Ages, very few women *or* men learned to read, and even fewer to write. The ones who did were associated with the Church: priests, monks, nuns, and for the most part we are talking about Latin.

In the high Middle Ages, an interesting development occurs. On one hand, formal education through the Church to train clergy to preach in public excludes women, who cannot preach in the Middle Ages. Women are shut out of the developing cathedral schools and eventually universities. This is a Latin education that they cannot receive.

However, at the same time the groundwork for the university system is being laid, noblewomen in particular are learning to read, and sometimes write, *in their vernacular* (Middle English, Middle Low German, Anglo-Norman, etc). Some of our most important early vernacular authors are women! Even in vernacular texts attributed to men, we can often see that they were written primarily for a female audience, or that copies were owned by women/women's religious communities.

By the late Middle Ages, mothers were socially assigned the responsibility of teaching their children the basics of religious doctrine and, if they could, rudimentary reading (vernacular, again). Men still had access to formal education that women did not. A few convents did run schools that girls who did not intend to become nuns could attend, but these are pretty rare until the 16th century.

So it's not a systematic exclusion of women from *reading*; in fact, in some ways medieval women were more literate than men. However, by the *medieval* benchmark of *Latin* literacy, a few very privileged men from privileged (noble, moneyed) backgrounds received a Latin education as preparation for a career preaching and teaching religion, which women were not allowed to do.The Nike Structure is a "stability" (sometimes "support") shoe that is designed to help keep your foot from striking the ground and then rolling inward (overpronating). The Asics Cumulus is a "neutral" shoe that does not have the same built-in support.

Everyone has their own opinion on what type of shoe *you* (yes, you) should be wearing, generally based on their own experience. The best thing to do is wear shoes that work for you. Good running stores--including online ones like Running Warehouse--allow you a grace period to test out new shoes (30-60 days, usually) to see if they work. If they don't--it seems like the Cumulus aren't working--you should be able to exchange them for a different pair.

I, personally, find that what types of shoe work for me is much more dependent on the individual shoe than on any label of stability or neutral.

The Nike Zoom Structure is a fine running shoe! If you're still interested in trying similar models from other brands, check out the Brooks Ravenna, Saucony Guide, New Balance 870, Asics GT-2000, Mizuno Wave Inspire.

To illustrate how individual this is, though, I gave myself bad bad shin splints in the Brooks Ravenna and healed them with the Asics GT-2000 (and lots of toe walking and heel walking)--even though everyone will tell you those are nearly interchangeable shoes.&gt; I can't prove this about medieval period, but based upon the complaints of ministers and priest in the 1400s and later

Hey now, them's fighting words. :) 15th century is still medieval, especially concerning the end of your comment, on the relationship between profane and ecclesiastical authority. But yes, even Bernard of Clairvaux in the 12th century complains about nonattention to his (typically wildly popular) crusade sermons. I talked earlier in this thread about the sermon and literary use of the demon Titivillus and his predecessors who punish people gossiping during religious events elsewhere in this thread--that tradition also stretches back to the high Middle Ages.

&gt; The church also stood somewhat as a buffer between peasantry and the aristocracy.

Ehhh...the word "somewhat" is carrying a lot of weight in that sentence. The Church often sought to portray itself as concerned with the common people, but you can't get away from the fact that the Church often *was* the aristocracy, sometimes even with the bishop-lord or abbot-lord (in the high Middle Ages, perhaps an abbess-lord) as the local ruler. There are a *lot* of complaints from peasants--Iberia has been studied the most closely here, I think--about local priests as well as religious orders abusing their authority, cheating people, committing crimes and getting away with it. When Church synods address the violence of lords against peasants, they come down much more harshly on non-clerical princes than on ecclesiastical ones.

That's not to say religious orders and quasi-orders didn't run the medieval equivalent of homeless shelters, and "pre-Reformation" scholarship is quite clear that the vast, vast majority of the laity were deeply "ecclesiastically pious" [right up until they suddenly weren't](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3m0bej/if_i_was_active_in_church_life_in_the_hre_around/cvazi8f)--but medieval people's relationship with "the Church" is as multifaceted as the medieval Church itself.&gt;  Most notably, I would point out St. Francis and the entire Franciscan order. 

The Franciscans were subject to exactly the same "for every P, a Q" as the rest of the medieval Church (which I think you know perfectly well ;) ). Apostolic poverty and sometimes "poverty" did not always translate to a *practical* concern for the actual poor, although sometimes they did.

The point is simply that the medieval Church was a diverse creature, and it's hard to talk about a "peasants' relationship with the Church" instead of people's experiences with specific parts of it in different times and places.Fortunately, in my experience the medievalists of /r/AskHistorians have been quite skilled at presenting the medieval Church in its vices *and* virtues, as good historians ought. :)A second vote for /u/idjet's [epic 4-comment answer](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qyw8y/how_exactly_did_the_papalmedieval_inquisition/cwjh6b6) on inquisition in medieval Europe, which unites knowledge of secondary scholarship with original research. It's one of if not *the* best descriptions of medieval inquisition and its genesis that I've ever read. Please don't miss that one this week.

/u/XenophonTheAthenthian is a philosopher-king among mortals for describing the [political, legal, and social aspects of exile in ancient Rome]
(https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qyb9e/how_exactly_did_exile_work_in_the_ancient_world/cwjirig) and then giving me a crash course in Roman private law.

/u/alricofgar puts medieval archaeology to possibly its best use ever to answer ["Didst thou even hoist, fra?"](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qs3at/how_fit_was_the_average_person_in_the_middle_ages/cwi86uv)

And in case you missed it, I thought our special guest /u/Kathryn_Gin_Lum did an amazing job fielding some really fascinating questions [in her AMA](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qo1tm/ama_damned_nation_hell_in_america_from_the/) this week.Thank you and /u/The_Alaskan for the shoutout! :) I'm honored to be mentioned in such fine company.tl;dr - No.

Medieval lords had nothing to gain and a lot to lose from a smaller peasant population. They were not responsible for feeding and sheltering their serfs. They *did* collect taxes from them, and likewise many serfs also owed their lord a certain number of days of direct service (fixing up the castle or something) per year.

The best comparison I can think of is the situation after the Black Death of 1346-1351. The population of Europe dropped so dramatically that labor was at a premium. Wages *skyrocketed* between 1350 and 1400. And when lords tried to push back, most famously in England circa 1381, the result could be massive, violent peasant revolt.No, why would I? ;)

Ruth Mazo Karras, *Common Women: Prostitution and Sexuality in Medieval England*

To you, I would also strongly recommend her *Sexuality in Medieval Europe: Doing Unto Others* and perhaps *Unmarriages: Women, Men, and Sexual Unions in the Middle Ages*I BQed. Plenty of room to spare. I ain't afraid of no offset...The ecumenical status of the synod you have cited elsewhere is disputed. If you have a citation to Gratian I would appreciate it.

In the later Middle Ages, local synods issue decree after decree regulating how often people receive the sacrament. They are not as concerned from *legal* (canon law) standpoing about Sunday Mass. That is not to say they didn't try to get people into churches. The theatrics surrounding consecration and the efforts to make liturgical sermons more interesting (cf central and northern Italy in the 15th century) are strong evidence that people were "supposed" to be in church on Sunday. But required? The *medieval* evidence that I've seen is very ambiguous.

If people *were* "legally required" to attend more frequently, they may or may not have known it. They *definitely* knew about sacramental reception.I agree it was common for people to attend Church every Sunday and feast day. I have never said otherwise.  The guidelines for confession that are *everywhere* in the fifteenth century, and tell us *the things priests teach people about religion*, seem to imply that overall it was strongly recommended ("skipping without a good excuse is a sin").Quick clarification:

&gt; To my knowledge, there was no cross-over between being a barber and being a doctor in Roman times. That was an 18th century thing.

It's actually medieval. Barbers were in charge of basic surgical practices, including leeching and amputations, and they were legally obligated to stick around and treat people during outbreaks of plague. (Physicians were not).

Really interesting answer!How much should you let cooler weather affect training paces? At what increase in speed or min/mile are your legs not ready to keep up with the easier time your heart and lungs are having?

Bit too sore after my long run yesterday, and I'm not sure whether it was the faster pace or it being the first time I've done a long run on rolling hills in six weeks (taper + marathon recovery).Yes, this. All of the other things listed are wonderful, but they are things I would save up for, for myself. Sports massage for most runners is a True luxury--the thing you want, but you always need or "need" something else.Yup, Dominik Gro\u00df has written quite a bit about barber-surgeons well into the 19th century in Germany! And at least in the Middle Ages, some of them traveled with armies, so it would make sense to me that they'd be with navies, too. I just meant, they existed during the Middle Ages, too. :)In a historiography paper, your goal is to look at what previous scholars have written on a specific subject. You identify what are considered the most important books and articles on the topic. Ideally, you will be able to identify specific sub-topics that scholars have focused on. You might look at how what scholars have said or what they are interested in changes over time.

John Van Engen's 1986 article "The Christian Middle Ages as an Historiographical Problem" (*American Historical Review* 91, no. 3) is considered a seminal work of medieval historiography. You might look at it as a guideline.

Your own focus for your paper will be *much* more specific than "the entire Middle Ages." I've written historiography papers on topics like "women in the German Reformation" and "Hildegard of Bingen."

[This webpage](https://www.trentu.ca/history/workbook/historiography.php) includes excerpts from two historiography papers explaining what the elements are.This is terrific; thank you and /u/grantimatter so much! I'd never thought about the impact of mosquitos on clothing before.

You even inadvertently answered my immediate follow-up question, did colonial fashion influence European trends at all, with the Marie Antoinette example.Celsus, [*De Medicina*](http://penelope.uchicago.edu/Thayer/E/Roman/Texts/Celsus/home.html), Latin and LCL English translation (public domain)Like /u/ecatt alluded, I'd highly recommend getting some *actual lights*. You can get slap bracelet-like arm and ankle banks with flashing LEDs, or clip-on lights that you can attach to your jacket pockets, headband/hat, or a running belt of some sort.

With reflective gear, your visibility is passive. You depend on cars, cyclists, and other runners to have their own lights that will light you up. However, headlights go out. Cyclists' headlights can be narrow-beam. Runners are frequently more concerned with their own visibility (wearing blinkies) than lighting a path--I know my headlamp is perfect for even trail running in pitch black conditions, but it doesn't add all that much to streetlights, so I don't wear it if all I'm running is neighborhood road. If all you have is reflective striping, to me on the sidewalk you might as well be in flat gray, i.e. black.Paradoxically, people can only ask questions about what they know. This can happen through knowledge of past persons or events, such as asking why Rome fell; or it can come by extrapolating from their own life, such as asking how homosexuality was viewed in a specific time and place.

If it seems like most people have the same questions about Jesus, American slavery, and Hitler, it means historians need to get better at letting the world in on the awesome "secrets" that we shouldn't be keeping!...Unless it's your take-home essay question and no one answered it when you posted it 4 hours earlier. ;)

The worst is when I *know* it's a straight-up school assignment, but it's a really juicy question and I want to answer it anyway for everyone else's benefit.In all seriousness--if someone's flair strikes your fancy, it's a terrific idea to first of all see if they have a [user profile](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/wiki/profiles) with links to some questions they've answered. Some flairs have more FAQ-type stuff listed, but others also choose the questions and answers they have liked the most, which can lead to some really cool, in-depth things I *never* would have thought to ask about.

The other thing to do is PM! If, say, you're interested in 20th century Middle Eastern history but all you know is vaguely "didn't Israel happen", PM someone flaired in Islamic Studies or Modern Middle East or something (or PM someone without flair who you've seen answer questions in that field, of course!). Ask them if they can help you think of a question on a subtopic you're interested in. For example, they can help you get from "Tell me something about women in Islam" to a good, post-able AH question like "how did Ataturk's reforms affect women's lives outside the home?"

And finally, whatever the actual *subject* of the posts linked in the Sunday Digests and under the "gilded" tab, the answers that people tend to really really like are usually (though not always) ones that throw in delicious examples or details as illustration of whatever question. So even a question that seems at first to unite everything someone might roll their eyes at like ["How fit was Hitler"](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qat0p/how_fit_was_hitler/cwduf3x?context=3) gets an answer from in this case /u/Astrogator, who ends up teaching you by implication a *ton* about personal medicine, perceptions of disease and disability, and prescription drug abuse in the mid-20th century--not just about Hitler.I don't know when book titles shifted. However, long titles in the early modern era were a marketing device! They informed the reader of the contents of the text. Sort of how today we might read the publisher's blurb on the back of the book or as the description on Amazon or Google Books.

This was helpful in cases where a book or pamphlet was *one* text by one author, but even more useful when a printer published an edition that combined several texts or excerpts from them.It's a variation on the Templar flag, the red cross on a white field. (And specifically, the variation used by the Portuguese Order of Christ, subsequently adopted by the Kongolese nobility). I had noticed it on banners depicted in a painting (which I can't find on the Internet). [Here's a modern illustration](http://api.ning.com/files/xuMwKMTkGS1TNsU7aN6prOhLUWSsyxPySJ4xPbTmpZXMv9Hwwk9LmIac85dxSi5PijdLSJLqIo1ppQyonBJ62MjlwYY7uXLE/CapuchinMissionaryandhisEntouragebeingGreetedinFrontofVillageSognoKingdomofKongo1740sPaolaColloandSilviaBensoSognoBambaPembaOvandoMilan1986.jpg?width=750). In her book, Fromont discusses finding the cross [on Kongolese gravestones](https://books.google.com/books?id=Ax8VBQAAQBAJ&amp;pg=PA80&amp;lpg=PA80&amp;dq=templar+cecile+fromont&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=nkW8e1RlYO&amp;sig=4Rq66W1Z4t9rlE1qbHLbazZ9bPM&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CEUQ6AEwCWoVChMI9M7Dnf30yAIVAd9jCh3l-giZ#v=onepage&amp;q&amp;f=False) as well.&gt; One from a few years ago that I particularly cherish began "What was High School like in ancient Greece?" and included sub-questions about how lockers were secured before the invention of padlocks, and how teachers co-ordinated lesson times without clocks.

The best part of this is that [the ancient Greeks actually did have locks](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3qubs9/since_mechanical_locks_werent_perfected_until_the/cwippe6).

Which we can all agree they used to secure their lockers in their high schools.I'm not sure how this is supposed to be a robot or relate to magnetic philosophy or science. In medieval and early modern Christianity, the lobster is a symbol of resurrection. Pliny the Elder observes that the lobster molts every year--sheds its shell and acquires a new one. In Christianity, this symbolizes resurrection, especially of Jesus.

This particular image is *very* clearly Eucharistic, hence the chalice. You see lobsters and grapes--another Eucharistic symbol--with some frequency in early modern Low Countries art. If the image features a decapitated (?) lobster bleeding, it is instructional. The lobster's blood is the blood of Jesus is the consecrated Communion wine.

On the other hand, if the lobster is not bleeding but actually vomiting, the image is satirical: the lobster came to *satirize* the Jesuits by the later early modern period. The image would then mean that the Jesuits desecrate Communion wine somehow, probably by being Jesuits. They were not always so popular in early modern times.

Being unable to tell the difference is why I am not an art historian.

Do you have a source for the image?WAIT! I think I was wrong before. I mean, I'm right about the lobster being a symbol of resurrection, and I still think the impact of that particular image is Eucharistic because of the chalice (unless that's just what cups looked like then?), but I tracked down the fascination with--yes--vomiting lobster. It's not that the lobster itself is a robot; it's that the lobster is *acting like* a basic machine: a siphon.

A cooked lobster, laid with its tail in a vat of liquid but the majority of the lobster hanging over the side, will siphon up the liquid through capillary action and "vomit" it into a second dish--the lobster acts as a straw or siphon. [Here you can see](https://books.google.com/books?id=8LtPeLH3iHYC&amp;pg=PA200&amp;lpg=PA200&amp;dq=lobster+resurrection+symbolism&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=dYnfjiiBK4&amp;sig=OzWUTq86WweaMY6qsDHhGMezQdE&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CDQQ6AEwBGoVChMIzqrV1d_1yAIVCNgeCh1o-QoD#v=onepage&amp;q=lobster%20resurrection%20symbolism&amp;f=False) the lobster, symbolizing the resurrection next to Eucharistic symbols (the grapes), but positioned to act like a siphon as well.

Are you perhaps at Princeton? Because based on what you said, your professor's lecture tracked very closely with [this lecture](http://www.sil.si.edu/silpublications/dibner-library-lectures/2002-Grafton/Grafton_2002.pdf) (ETA: PDF warning) Anthony Grafton (of Princeton) presented in 2002.I am not that familiar with the Wattasids and Saadians of Morocco, but I can talk a little about the Ottomans. The most important thing to keep in mind is that in the 16th and 17th centuries, the Ottoman Empire is not some separate "Islamic world" off to the southeast. It is a *major player* in European politics and warfare. 

In spring of 1529, a group of gospel-minded German princes is drawing up the document of *protest* that will ultimately yield their ideology the label Protestant. At the same time, an Ottoman army is preparing to march on Vienna. Their mutual target? The Hapsburg Holy Roman Empire.

While Ottoman and Western navies fought for control of various Mediterranean islands, coastlines and shipping routes (the famous Battle of Lepanto is 1571), the Hungarian frontier was *the* front line for Ottoman ambition in Europe. Due to the decentralized nature of the HRE, that meant the Habsburgs were their primary target. At the dawn of the Reformation, the Habsburgs under Charles V pretty much directly controlled Austria, Spain and some of the Netherlands. This political situation shapes the Ottoman reaction to the Reformation.

To be clear, the German Protestants made no attempt to endear themselves to the Ottomans. In 1528, Luther himself published a treatise "On the War Against the Turks," in which he gave up on the idea of converting *Muslims* to *Christianity* and focused instead on defending *Western Europe* from the *Turks*.  And indeed, it was to Catholic France--sworn enemies of the very Catholic Habsburgs--to whom the Ottomans reached out first.

This decision benefited everyone except Charles. As rumors of a True Franco-OE alliance (which may or may not have resulted from their diplomatic efforts) helped distract some Hapsburg attention, Lutheranism in German gained a lasting foothold. When Protestant princes took up arms against Catholic in the Schmalkaldic Wars, the Ottomans got to take a necessary breather. (Since the Protestants actually *lost* the SW wars, the HRE's Ottoman-aided weakness that allowed them to gain a foothold ended up being crucial for Prot's long-term success: a *minor* Prot. victory after the initial peace treaty forced the eventual Peace of Augsburg, establishing that the religion of an HRE territory would be the religion of its prince, so long as that religion was Lutheranism or Catholicism.

Around this time, the Ottomans made diplomatic inroads with other enemies of the Habsburgs, namely Protestants in Elizabethan England and Calvinists in the Netherlands. Letter exchanges reveal a diplomatic emphasis on religious mutual ground, especially a common rejection of "idols" (Catholic veneration of images). This is diplomacy, not a real effort at interreligious dialogue--the periods of Byzantine iconoclasm centuries of earlier had dont nothing to endear Christianity and Islam. Instead, the diplomacy opened the door to an Ottoman-Dutch alliance that, again, aided both parties tremendously.

Initially, of course, Ottoman promises of aid to Dutch Protestants were mostly lip service, and a few waves of the Dutch Revolt failed. But the ongoing skirmishes between Spain and the OE diverted Iberian resources away from the Low Countries, eventually allowed the 1570s wave of rebellion to stick its landing. For their part, the Ottomans gained crucial diplomatic and trade ties with a rising world power.

Transylvanian Hungary hosted the only sizable Western Christian population under Muslim control. Here, the Ottomans extended their recognition of (Catholic) Christians as dhimmis or people of the book to Protestants as well. As the Reformation in Hungary tinged Calvinist, the Ottomans proved great supporters of that church in their territory, again seeing it as a weapon against Habsburg Vienna. They were also happy to continue extending the same status to Catholics. Refugees of inter-Christian conflict as well as problems within a branch of Christianity or even a specific Catholic order all took shelter in Ottoman territory. And under the crescent, which permitted religious *practices* but not religious *construction* by non-Muslims, diverse Christian populations across the OE ended up rotating holy services in the same church buildings.

So overall, this is a political story much more than a religious one. The diplomatic ties tentatively established through initial epistolary diplomacy and eventual ambassadorships did not prove completely reliable under duress. Nevertheless, Western and Eastern parties alike--Protestant, Muslim, and sometimes even Catholic--found it useful to keep the possibility of alliance alive.

God save the king (and his useful army), they could all agree, as long as that king was not also Emperor.Thank you and Prof. Johns! I (obviously, hehe) thought this was absolutely fascinating.Well, the Reichsapfel is the imperial orb or the orb topped with a cross that gets worked into royal regalia all over Europe; it originally stood for Jesus'/Christianity's domination over the world but came to just mean empire or kingdom, sort of. According to Richard Kreutel, the Ottomans used the specific golden orb and cross atop one of the towers of St. Stephen's Cathedral in Vienna as sort of a synechdoche for the city, especially in the sense of a major goal of conquest to achieve. I can't comment on the religious versus geopolitical/expansionist connotations, however.Officially, the OE pursued a policy of neutrality. They had signed a 20-year peace treaty with the Hapsburgs in 1606 and continued to renew it for decades, somewhat distracted by their wars with Safavid Persia to the east. The extent to which that policy reflected reality is a topic of some debate. I am by no means any kind of expert by the time we get to the 17th century, but, it seems like a continuation of the 16th century pattern. The Ottomans and various Western forces opened diplomatic ties and *discussed* providing aid--there is some evidence for this with respect to the Bohemian forces, at least--but it was never deployed. The Habsburgs, for their part, put a great deal of effort into continuing the renewals of that 1606 Peace of Zsitvatorok.

If you're interested, Maria Baramova has a short but balanced chapter on the Ottomans and the 30 Y.W. in the *Ashgate Research Companion to the Thirty Years' War*. Setton's *Venice, Austria, and the Turks in the Seventeenth Century* is mostly about the Venetian side of things, but talks a little about the 30 Y.W. in the background.The earliest entry the [OED Science Fiction Citations Project](http://www.jessesword.com/sf/list/?page=2) has verified firsthand is from 1937, the serialized publication of E.E. Smith's "Galactic Patrol" (novel 1950).

John W. Campbell himself [used the term](https://books.google.com/books?id=D1E0AgAAQBAJ&amp;pg=PT101&amp;lpg=PT101&amp;dq=john+campbell+%22mightiest+machine%22&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=1d-62sgWRo&amp;sig=l9mE5hvuTtFoheuSUHaX9_gWMNo&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CFQQ6AEwDWoVChMIvb67xNz2yAIVzOkmCh3AiwAw#v=onepage&amp;q=credits&amp;f=False) in his 1947 novel *The Mightiest Machine*--but that was published as a serial starting in 1934, so that might actually represent the earliest use of "credit" as currency.Ooh, thanks! Yeah, the Grafton lecture I linked in my second post argues that the lobster's importance was a natural creature *acting like* a machine, not being a manmade automaton.

"Cancer Vomitor." Sometimes I can appreciate Latin.Um, as a historian I wouldn't recommend that particular book; it tends to do things like "In the East, this means..." Um, what? I was mostly using it here for an online example. I generally stay away from specifically art history even in the Middle Ages, so unfortunately I don't even know where to start with recommendations. I always feel like, "But can't grapes ever just be *grapes*? Does *everything* (except peacocks) always mean Jesus?"...Where were you during my quals orals? ;)

At least I got the name of the treaty right this time.I am American. I was in Berlin for a work conference and went for a run around the Brandenburg Gate, weaving through the Tiergarten, and finishing down the embassy row on its other side. I should not have been running. The gray, damp, cold weather was unmotivating. By the end of the run, my hands were so red and raw I had to sit on them in the lobby until they were not-numb enough to fumble for my room keycard. I didn't have time to eat breakfast before the first session that day. Most importantly, I had recently come back from a calf strain WAY too aggressively and given myself *massive* shin splints in my left leg, which I was monitoring *hourly* to check whether the pain was localizing into a small enough area to be concerned about stress fractures. Every single step hurt. 

Every single step was *awesome*.

As I was cooling down, I got asked for directions by two different people, one American (who wanted to find Starbucks; we are not stereotypical at *all*...) and one German!

It was just so cool and special. And yes, I stopped for a running-gear selfie with the Brandenburger Tor in the background. How could I not?Batsignal /u/itsalrightwithme?How cool!

I wonder if there was some influence? Wells was very familiar with Bellamy and his works imply a general zeitgeisty awareness in the decades before Campbell, but I can't think of much that is less Campbell than soft utopian socialism.Even just looking at pictures of the Berlin Marathon make me happy now. I'm like, THERE! I RAN *THERE*! I can't imagine the emotions of running in the race itself (or *any* race in Berlin). Congratulations on the finish and the PR!&gt; I ended up getting a hold of the 4th and 6th place finishers and letting them know that they had actually won and sent them discount coupons to the LRS that we work closely with.

That's really awesome of you. As a runner completely uninvolved in that situation, thank you....Do you ever have those moments where you read something on here, sit back and think, How the (#$@ does someone know that? How could anyone possibly put all that together, think of looking at not just those sources but those *types* of sources, and ask all those related questions that go into a good answer?

Thank you so much!It means that if you find it in a source earlier than the 1922 NYT, you should submit it to them.

Since this is the Oxford *English* Dictionary's project, it will only recognize the use of the word in an English text. Although the play itself was performed in the U.S. in autumn 1922, the English translation was published in 1923. The actual OED cites the NYT article in 1922, a later 1922 newspaper article from Utah, and then the 1923 R.U.R. translation. The OED does note that the "etymology" is the 1920 Czech play.This isn't quite what you're looking for, but you might be interested in the *Gynecology* of Soranus of Ephesus. He was a Greek doctor active in the beginning of the 2nd century AD. The *Gynecology* is a scientific/medical text, not really a late antique "What to Expect When You're Expecting"-type guide, but it contains passages on things like:

+ how to swaddle a newborn

+ how hard a surface to place it on (not too hard, which will dent the soft back of the skull; but also not too soft, which can prevent the backbone and muscles from strengthening)

+ advises on selection of nurses--when the mother should nurse her own child, what to look for in a wet nurse, etc

+ teething, learning to walk, dealing with childhood illnesses

[The table of contents in English is available online here](http://quod.lib.umich.edu/cgi/t/text/text-idx?c=acls;cc=acls;view=toc;idno=heb04290.0001.001), but unfortunately you'll need access to ACLS (probably through a university) to read the actual text.
You might consider the different roles within the Church played by various pilgrims on the trip to Canterbury. Which characters does Chaucer portray favorably; which does he portray negatively? Which characters live up to the standards of holiness or piety that "should" go along with a role in the Church, and which ones fall very short of that?

Then ask yourself, are these characters *individual characters*, or do they represent *that entire group* within the Church? How might you argue your viewpoint of that one way or another, based on the text itself and what you find out about medieval literature from reading an introductory work like the Cambridge Companion to Chaucer or some "Introduction to Medieval Literature" (pick one; if they talk about England, they talk about Chaucer) from your library?When the armies of the First and Second Crusades arrived in the Near East, they came to a region deeply divided among bickering (warring) city-states that, initially, could not mount a united response. For example, facing the very real spectre of revolt from his people in 1135, the very unpopular emir of Damascus reached out for aid to the governor of Aleppo. Rather than watch the city come under outside control, *Ismail's own mother murdered him.* Right. 

And for their parts, the crusaders (though lumped together as "Franks" in Arabic sources) could splinter among themselves, too, especially when a few Europeans set up their own so-called 'crusader states' after the First Crusade.

So yes, individual groups of Arabs and Franks did occasionally find it useful to make very fragile and temporary alliances with each other. I'll discuss one example here. Imad al-Din Zengi, the ambitious governor of Aleppo I mentioned above, spent the 1120s and 1130s consolidating his power across *quite* a wide base, becoming governor of several more cities. The one that got away was always Damascus, and the Damascenes knew it. Zengi worked both politically and militarily through the late 1130s to position himself to take over, and in the chaos following the Damascus ruler's assassination in 1139, he seized his chance.

The powerful crusader Kingdom of Jerusalem likewise did not love the thought of a united Arab power base so nearby. So Damascus and Jerusalem signed a truce with an agreement of mutual aid. They actually united to lay siege to Zengi's stronghold at Baniyas, distracting him from his own besieging of Damascus. Faced with the strength of this alliance, Zengi temporarily shifted his efforts to the north.

So in this case, Franks and Arabs fought together for mutual political gain. Of course, the Europeans shattered that truce less than a decade later, and quite disastrously for themselves at that, but it did happen.The term "12th century renaissance" originally referred to a massive flowering of intellectual life in medieval western Europe, particularly in the cathedral schools of Paris. It was a reaction against the "Dark Ages" trope that for so long referred to *all* the Middle Ages, not just the early ones. The idea of a twelfth century renaissance was an important effort to push back against it for the high Middle Ages, although it sort of had the side effect of making the early Middle Ages seem darker.

Haskins did not invent the term--in his introduction, he talks about the different medieval renaissances already recognized by scholars before 1927!--but he certainly popularized it.

For him, "twelfth century renaissance" was really a forerunner of The Renaissance: the revival of classical antiquity, 'secular' learning, philosophy, Latin, natural philosophy/theology (the forerunner of science), written law. One contributor to this effort was the translation of ancient Greek works into Latin--not from Greek, but from *Arabic*, in the schools of Spain and Norman Italy as well as Paris.

There is little doubt that the 12th century indeed witnessed *massive* change in medieval Europe--cultural/intellectual, social, economic, political. In the near-century since Haskins' still-relevant work, scholars have put forth an ENORMOUS body of research that has pretty much exploded our understanding of a twelfth-century "renaissance" into an earthquake that stretched across all aspects of society, resonated far beyond the halls of elite Paris, and indeed bled backwards into the eleventh and forwards into the thirteenth century.

Giles Constable (*The Reformation of the Twelfth Century*) and Jean LeClerq (*Love of Learning and the Desire for God*) broadened the 'secular' renaissance to religious learning and religious institutions--the twelfth century is the real birth of different religious orders and ways of life, not just same old Benedictine monasticism.

Some scholars have emphasized the role that monastic women played in religious and intellectual developments--check out John Van Engen, ed., *Voice of the Living Light: Hildegard of Bingen and Her World*; Fiona Griffiths, *The Garden of Delights: Reform and Renaissance for Women in the Twelfth Century*; Alison Beach, *Women As Scribes*.

Stephen Jaeger has shown the real roots of the "twelfth-century" renaissance in the schools of the eleventh century (*Envy of Angels: Cathedral Schools and Social Ideals in Medieval Europe*).

Anna Sapir Abulafia has published extensively on Christian-Jewish relations and how they both reflected and helped shape the course of the century.

**A really nice overview of sort of the state of scholarship on the twelfth century right now is the essay collection *European Transformations* edited by Thomas Noble and John Van Engen. Pretty much THE top people on the century.** Basically you should read this.

As to a "crisis of the late Middle Ages" bringing the twelfth century renaissance to an end...well, late medievalists are currently working on overturning the idea of our era as a period of endless catastrophe, because it wasn't. It's our version of the Dark Ages--another effect of stressing the splendor of the twelfth century (which was great, don't get me wrong) at the cost of what came before and after.Historical linguists can do amazing things with oral language that I can't begin to understand *how* it's even possible, just marvel at the results. But I can talk a little about ways we can see in literature some developments that probably reflected spoken language.

Like one I have just come across in Middle High German, the language spoken (in various dialect forms) across much of the southern Holy Roman Empire in the later Middle Ages. "Schlepsack" refers to a sack carried by day laborers, especially fishermen, to haul their catch around. We have a couple of sources, however, that apply a second, colloquial meaning: adulterer. You can pretty much tell that a meaning like that evolved out of people's everyday use of it, rather than an author getting inventive.

Or take Shakespeare. *Much Ado About Nothing* is not much ado about *nothing*, it is much ado about genitalia. "Get thee to a nunnery" doesn't refer to chaste nuns, if you take my meaning.

It's probably harder to extrapolate from abbreviations and acronyms whether people were talking like that or just writing, because written shorthand was *so* common before print (and those abbreviations continued into the era of early print).

I will say that one thing I'm *extremely* curious about whether people said the acronym aloud is EFG/SFG in Middle German. It's "euer furstliche gnad"/"sein furstliche gnad"--Your Princely Grade/His Princely Grace. It is THE common shorthand to refer to people of that rank in the early 16th century sources I read. It wouldn't surprise me at *all* if people spoke those initials, but obviously I can't prove it.

Another thing people did in the Middle Ages was blend languages! Although real knowledge of Latin was very rare, most Christians would have picked up a bit of it hearing the liturgy in Church every week. So you get poets who will throw in random Latin words at the end of a line in German or French or whatever to make the rhyming couplet and meter work. That too seems like a thing people would do in everyday speaking.

Arguably, the entire development of the western European Romance vernaculars out of Latin reflects spoken slang, as would Middle English's union of Anglo-Saxon/Germanic, straight-up Latin, and Norman influence. Classical Latin itself was a formal written language; people *spoke* many many variations on it we call Vulgar Latin. (/u/XenophonTheAthenian is our resident expert; [this thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/29w496/who_spoke_classical_latin_how_far_down_the_social/) has some great discussion).I've talked about why we can't really talk about a single "average age" for marriage in later medieval Europe [in this thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3pafst/what_was_the_average_marriage_age_for_people/cw4w6vb). For upper class people in Italy, yes, you find a *stark* disparity between 12-13 year old girls marrying 30+ year old men. The further north you go, and the lower down the social ladder, marriage ages converge. That answer goes into detail on the specific situations--it's not a blanket answer like "patriarchy," although medieval Europe was certainly a heavily sexist society.It's been awhile since I've read *World Without End*, so I can't comment on Follett's portrayal of his characters' understanding of the plague. (Don't get me wrong here--*Pillars of the Earth* is probably my favorite non-science fiction book--but when it comes to medieval, he tends to get things fairly right or VERY VERY WRONG. Did you know 12th century gilds were modern trade unions? Me neither.)

It's True the Middle Ages had no concept of germ theory. It's also True that a very dominant interpretation of the great mortality was that God was punishing Christians for their sins. As late as the 15th century, medical texts prescribing ways to combat plague include disclaimers advising their readers not to listen to people who say that pestilence is God's wrath and so should not be defended against nor fled from--no, you listen to this author, you buy this book.

But. They *absolutely* understood that proximity mattered. Our most important source for discussing plague's *arrival in Europe*, Gabriele de Mussis, writes:

&gt; Moreover, one infected man could carry the poison to others [...]

&gt; When the sailors reached these places and mixed with the people there, it was as if they had brough evil spirits with them...and their inhabitants, both men and women, died suddenly. And when one person had contracted the illness, he poisoned his whole family even as he fell and died, so that those preparing to bury his body were seized by death in the same way. (Horrox, ed., *The Black Death*, p. 17 and 19)

Quarantines, sealing off houses with a known sick person (with all the still-healthy people in there, too), fleeing the city (a la Boccaccio's *Decameron* storytellers)...they understood, all right. Priests' refusal to hear last confession from plague victims was a real problem. Cities passed law after law requiring lower-scale medical practitioners (never the university-trained physicians, of course) to remain in pestilence-stricken cities to treat the sick, because *everyone knew* you got sick from being around sick people and dead bodies.

In lieu of germ theory, the most common explanation was that sick people and dead bodies poisoned the air around them. Thus people started carrying around strong and nice-smelling spices and flowers to create a buffer zone against "evil air."

Additionally, *news* of the great mortality traveled ahead of the pandemic itself. The Bishop of Rochester worried himself half to death about the oncoming plague during winter 1348, even though it didn't show up in Kent until the next spring. English archbishops in particular were quite active at arranging penitential processions and organizing local monasteries to say Masses and special prayers in attempt to prevent pestilence from decimating their dioceses.

Proximity mattered, and people knew it.&gt; I'm interested to hear what people with actual credentials say about the historiography of slavery.

Yes, this is a necessary step of any historical research project! Ideally, a major history paper (although I don't know about the specifics of your particular assignment) includes a section at the beginning that discusses what earlier scholarship has said about the topic of your paper, or about things related to your topic. So you might have a section about "what scholars think about Europeans describing the early modern Atlantic slave trade" and one about "what scholars think about Arab Muslims describing the medieval/early modern trans-Saharan slave trade"--unless you can find a good amount of comparative work. (Which--maybe that *is* out there; you'd have to find it).

To find previous works of scholarship with "actual credentials"--that is, books and articles that have gone through a peer review process to ensure the authors have some basis in source material and have put forth a logical argument based on them--you would use your school library and online databases/search engines like Google Scholar, JSTOR, ProQuest, depending on what your school has access to. (JSTOR seems to be pretty standard in the U.S. now, but I don't know about elsewhere). Then you would read the books and articles that look promising.

What databases and searches have you tried, that haven't been productive for you yet?And isn't that another legacy of the original "12th century renaissance" idea and its earliest developments? The privileging of a very narrow segment of medieval culture over, well, everything else?

I wish we got as many "crisis of the late Middle Ages" questions as we do ones about the "Dark Ages"!Thrilled I could help!A great answer there and here! Thank you!Wow, that's a terrific metaphor! Thanks!

And, to tangent ridiculously, it's hilarious to me as a medievalist. Late medieval bathhouse culture was all about the luxury of relaxation and visiting--people used to eat elaborate gourmet meals while bathing!By golly, history is the best.What was the English pamphlet scene like at that time? Hill talks about the "end of censorship" and then its revival, but that is basically all I know. What was the likelihood of multiple editions, was it a Wildwuchs where printers published whatever they thought was profitable and could get their hands on? Did Winstanley work with a particular printer repeatedly? How widely read was he in his own time?&gt; an inventory done of Elizabeth I's wardrobe around the time of her death

Yes! I was hoping that by the early modern era there would be sources like this. From War of the Roses-era Europe we start to have account rolls from queens' households, but those are more concerned with income and household members.

&gt; because the former could include clothing that's been saved for Reasons as well as what Elizabeth had been wearing more recently

I don't know, I think clothing that's hanging around but not being worn is just as relevant as what's in the standard rota! We could, after all, ask the same questions about the books in people's or monasteries' libraries. I guess mostly it's just too bad we can't subdivide either type of list.

&gt; they so often gave them away, especially to servants who worked in their wardrobes or dressed them, as did non-royal and non-titled women. Though "servant" in the case of queens encompasses ladies-in-waiting...it was important to be seen at one's peak at court

Were people not worried about upstaging the queen/duchess? Or was this just not a possibility simply "because queen"? (One of my authors was a l-i-w to the wife of one of the most important HRE electors, and reading around the edges I'm not sure that duchess would have been a fan of being upstaged.)In reverse order: Brooks Ravenna, Brooks Ghost, Brooks Launch, Nike Pegasus, predecessor to the Asics GT-1000, predecessor to the Asics GT-2000.

Ironically for OP, right now I am really enjoying the current GT-2000 (and race in the current Asics DS Trainer, also mentioned in this thread!) and am going to buy very very many of them. Because nobody but me likes the new one, and with my *proven history* they will change back.

I did have to go another half size up in the Asics from where I used to be, but that is better than the full size in other brands. Why did all the running companies suddenly decide we have narrow mid- and forefeet? My dress shoe size has gone *down* 1/2 to 1 full size with some weight loss, but my running shoe size has gone *up* 1-1 1/2?!

ETA: Also, I am someone who generally likes the bright colors and tacky shoes, and WTF BROOKS IS YOUR NEW WOMEN'S [GHOST](http://www.runningwarehouse.com/Brooks_Ghost_8/descpage-BGH8WJW.html). I am glad I am done with you.Sure, I picked (what I think is) the ugliest on purpose. ;) Wouldn't you?

In all seriousness, though, with the various 2014-15 models Brooks put out a TON of different color options for their big models (Adrenaline, Ravenna, Ghost, etc), over the course of the model year. I wish they had spent less time on prettifying them, and more time avoiding manufacturing errors in e.g. the women's Adrenaline.

The Ravenna is still my all-time favorite shoe--it's *incredibly* versatile--and I wish they hadn't changed the last so it doesn't fit me anymore.Oh, I know. A Brooks rep told me the 15 had a manufacturing error in the line that they expected to be fixed by the 16. (It's just not my favorite shoe, is all). And like I said earlier, I'm very happy with the current Asics GT-2000, which *nobody else likes*. I have weird feet, apparently.

I'm fine changing sizes, I think the number shift is more funny than anything else. I'm less fine when they change the last so the shoe that fits in the forefoot is 2 sizes too big in the heel, or when the cut around the opening for the foot angles in too much and is stabby on my ankle.Yay, another fan! I'm surprised you found it narrow, though. Being wide enough in the fore/midfoot is why I switched to it in the first place!

You're right about the negativity, of course.Ah, [I think Joan of Arc is just terrific](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3mi0tk/a_lot_of_pictures_depict_joan_of_arc_clad_in/cvf7lqq).

I will always recommend first of all Dan Hobbins, ed. and trans., *The Trial of Joan of Arc*. This is one case where reading the primary source itself is both illuminating and *accessible* (medieval sources can be weird and hard, but this one makes sense, and makes you fall in love with Joan.)

Besides that, I'd probably start with Regine Pernoud and Marie-Veronique Clin's *Joan of Arc: Her Story.* I like the focus on both the historical context and the issues surrounding modern interpretations of Joan. (But then, I'm a historian, so this is what you might expect.)

For a popular biography? Hm. They so frequently have a clear agenda. (To be fair, so do a lot of the scholarly works on her!) Probably I'd recommend Frances Gies, *Joan of Arc: The Legend and the Reality*, if you can find it.

Helen Castor's new book looks promising, but obviously I can't recommend it before I've read it.The legends of this "silent trade" in writing go back to Herodotus (!), who writes:

&gt; Another story is told by the Carthaginians. There is a place in Libya, they say, where men live beyond the Pillars of Heracles; they come here and unload their cargo; then, having laid it in order along the beach, they go aboard their ships and light a smoking fire. The people of the country see the smoke, and, coming to the sea, they lay down gold to pay for the cargo, and withdraw from the wares. Then the Carthaginians disembark and examine the gold; if it seems to them a fair price for their cargo, they take it and go away; but if not, they go back aboard and wait, and the people come back and add more gold until the sailors are satisfied. In this transaction, it is said, neither party defrauds the other: the Carthaginians do not touch the gold until it equals the value of their cargo, nor do the people touch the cargo until the sailors have taken the gold. ([*Histories* 4.196](http://perseus.uchicago.edu/perseus-cgi/citequery3.pl?dbname=GreekFeb2011&amp;getid=1&amp;query=Hdt.%204.196.2))

You can read this passage a couple ways. One, Libya is the standard term for Africa and the Pillars of Herakles is the Strait of Gibraltar, so Herodotus is relaying the actual method of trade between Carthage in North Africa and some civilization perhaps on the northwest coast. Two, ancient Carthage had the reputation of shrouding its trade partnerships and commercial activity in pitch-black secrecy, especially the source of some of their trade goods outside the Mediterranean ring, so fanciful legends develop around it.

In the Middle Ages, the trans-Saharan gold trade gives rise to similar secrecy and a similar desire to *know* where that gold is coming from. (I mean, if you were the Ghana Empire, wouldn't you want to protect the location of your gold mine from northern traders, so you could continue to profit as miners and mediators?) Perhaps inspired by Herodotus, several Muslim scholars pick up the silent trade legend.

The earliest reference to drums, specifically, that I'm aware of is Yaqut al-Rumi in the 13th century ("Yaqut the Greek," actually born in Constantinople!), who writes:

&gt; They stop here [in Ghana] and recover...and recruit locals for their negotiations with the owners of the gold. They proceed until they arrive at the place that divides them from the owners of the gold. There they beat the big drums that they have brought...When the traders know that the owners of the gold have heard the drums they produce whatever they have brought of the goods. Then they withdraw to a distance equivalent to one traveling stage. Then the others come out and put certain amounts of gold beside each ware, and leave. The traders come again and each of them takes the gold found beside his merchandise, which he leaves there. Then they beat their drums and depart.

But already Yaqut's account doesn't make sense: the outsiders *recruit middlemen to negotiate*, and then engage in a method of trade that very explicitly cuts out middlemen.

In fact, among the Arabic sources for the west African gold trade in the Middle Ages, the writers who *actually visited West Africa* like ibn Battuta describe much more standard trade practices of meeting merchants in cities to conduct the exchange. Yes, the gold suppliers were very keen to keep their sources a secret (later empires controlled three gold mines, not just one). But the people who witnessed the exchanges firsthand did not observe the silent trade.

It's a tantalizing legend, of course. Europeans in the late Middle Ages and early modern era picked it up, and even applied it to other areas of Africa (Axum/classical Ethiopia, for example). You can even find scholars repeating it as truth today. The explanation usually runs that silent trade allows people who don't speak the same language to participate in exchange, and allows the suppliers of the tin, gold, salt, etc. to keep the origin of their goods a secret. But you can see how that's an ex post facto explanation that doesn't really hold up (above all to Occam's Razor, but also to the rest of the historical evidence).

Mauny, Sundstrom, and Farias have probably been the most important scholars in critiquing widespread modern acceptance of the "silent trade."

Meanwhile, is *Scales of Gold* any good? I didn't love the Baroque Cycle (too bad; Stephenson is one of my favorite authors when he sticks to sci-fi), but I've had my eye on the other series for awhile now.Thanks for the heads up!**2015: The Great Shoe Experiment Year**

Triggered by the Ravenna 6 changing the last so it didn't fit me anymore. :(

Asics GT-2000 3. Pros: cushioned, comfortable, *great* cure for shin splints, a good shoe for pounding out distance on roads. More durable than most shoes for me. Cons: Retains water, particularly SWEAT, so is very uncomfortably squishy at end of runs. Does not dry quickly if worn in rain, either.

Asics DS Gel Trainer 20. Pros: Fits me like the GT-2000, but noticeably lighter, more "road feel", a rare find in a stability shoe. Great for racing--doesn't hold sweat. Marathon PR shoe! Cons: I probably wouldn't want these off-road. Less durable. 

Skechers GoRun Ride 4: Pros: Terrifically comfortable, shoe is made to be worn with or without included insole to let you change from 4mm to 8mm drop at will. Cons: HOLDS SWEAT. And WEARS OUT FAST. Cheaper than the major running brands, but not cheap enough to outlast the lack of durability yet.

Various Brooks: Just did not fit my foot this year.

Mizuno Wave Sayonara 3. My first Mizunos, and I think the "Mizuno wave plate" is something everyone should at least try out for themselves rather than taking another's opinion. The WSayonara feels like a layer of cushioning over stiffness, which is definitely a different feeling and something I'd have to get used to. I actually really like these for doing a spin class/treadmill brick at the gym.

Various Saucony: Stability or neutral, my feet just kept rolling inward at the ankles in these. With one exception: the Gore-Tex version of the Ride (neutral, even), which will be my snow/wind shoe this winter. Without getting to run in them, I liked the initial feel of the Kinvara, and the Zealot reminded me of the GT-2000. (It has a lower drop, though, so maybe running in them would feel different.)

New Balance 890. Now replaced by their Fresh Foam line, so. Reminded me of the DS Trainer, but even less durable.

New Balance 870. Very similar to the GT-2000, except even more cushioned. Too much for me, I thought. (As you can see I am not a Hoka/Altra gal.)The Ghost were too narrow in the forefoot, the Adrenalines were just...bad (which was a manufacturing error in the 15, per a Brooks rep, but that's not my favorite shoe anyway), the Ravenna and the Launch were a little too narrow in the fore/midfoot and dug in on the sides of my ankle--they came up too high, or something. Apparently the Ravenna 7 is going to be more like the 5, though, so we'll see. Happy with the two Asics models for now.Running stores have nice return policies, especially if you never wear the shoes out of your house! (Basically, I have kept the two Asics, the Mizunos that I wear for spin class, and I wore out the Skechers and NB 890, both of which I got cheap through 6pm.com. Running Warehouse very kindly assured me that I am free to order and return as many pairs of shoes as I want as long as they're never used! They eventually set a limit on how many shoes you can use-and-exchange, but I've only done that once.)

I am very happy with the Asics GT-2000; I'm on my second pair. I PRed a marathon in the DS Trainer, so obviously I like that one, too.

I don't mind spending money to find running shoes that will not result in shin splints and foot stress fractures. It's sort of the one place where I'll spend money on myself. :)&gt; Unfortunately the ASICS 2000 3 seems to have taken on a lot more cushioning. They feel like mattresses, so I have switched to the Mizuno Wave Inspire. Only one run so far, but I am liking them.

Proof that shoes are individual...I tried on the Wave Inspires and thought they were very similar to the 2000 3's!

I'm team cheap earbuds, too, by the way. :)Okay, I did the thing historians do and did my own research. And while this is possibly against the spirit of the sub, I'm going to post it anyway, because the answer is money, magic, paranoia, and the Dutch.

Background: Catholic Christianity had long been a stronger component of Spanish political and imperial ideology than elsewhere, dating back to the Reconquista. Non-Christians were cast as an existential threat to the empire itself. In 1492, Isabella and Ferdinand infamously forced the Jewish population of Spain to convert or flee. But the *conversos* or New Christians who stayed behind never shook the air of suspicion. Indeed, one of the foundational targets of the Spanish Inquisition was the (generally) mythical "crypto-Jew": typically, someone with *converso* ancestry who was accused of practicing Judaism in secret. The threat was not simply divergent religious belief, but that she or he was actively working to convert others away from Christianity and Spain.

In the early 17th century Spanish colonies, three trends converged to ramp up paranoia over crypto-Jews to a level unprecedented in the New World.

First, in the 1610s and 1620s, missionaries finally had enough manpower in the colonies to pay more attention to the daily lives of indigenous converts, and they did not love what they saw. People had integrated traditional religious practices with their Christianity, such as making traditional offerings to their gods and spirits alongside celebration of key saints' days. Zealous missionary campaigns to extirpate this idolatry raged across the Andes. The friars perceived the Christianity of their new converts was hanging by the flimsiest thread.

Second, from 1580 to 1640 Spain and Portugal were united under one crown. Much of Portugal's New Christian community took the chance to flee to Spain, where--really--they enjoyed a bit more tolerance from the "Old Christians." As erstwhile citizens of the Spanish *Empire*, they also had free reign to travel overseas. Many with the financial wherewithal to do so headed for New Spain (Mexico) and the Andes, and set themselves up quite profitably in the trade/merchant community there. These are *Christians*, recall--but Christians with a taint of Jewish ancestry, Christians always perceived at risk of sliding back to Judaism and spreading the poison.

And third, the Dutch.

The early modern Netherlands, or at least part of it, was an early experiment in a certain degree of religious toleration. While Jews had spent the preceding centuries being progressively kicked out of more and more of western Europe, they were actually able to practice their religion openly in the Netherlands--and its colonies. Perhaps even more so in its colonies. And as I have just learned, for a quarter of the 17th century the Dutch actually controlled a sliver of Brazil. Specifically, the one bordering the Peru-Colombia crescent.

There were Jews on the border, and Christians perceived as teetering on the edge of relapse into Judaism within the borders, and a Spanish colonial leadership paranoid about the susceptibility of their population to everything against Christianity.

The stories they told--the stories they believed--are wild. The Jews used a "secret language" hidden within everyday words to reactivate the crypto-Judaism of the New Christians, and also to convert the impressionable, weak indigenous people away from True faith. The friars watched their congregations' everyday rituals and social lives, and decreed their activities to be clearly Jewish practices. You know, those ancient Near Eastern traditions of smoking tobacco and drinking cocoa.

It was the latter that got the colonial New Christians into trouble. Everyone was smoking tobacco and drinking cocoa. Boom, you have Jewish ancestry; boom, you're a Jew.

The Inquisition in Latin America orchestrated far fewer *executions* for crypto-Judaism than Spain itself, but there were still a few (of course the Church could not kill, but the inquisitors handed their prey over to the secular authorities to finish the job). Forced confession, public repentance and shaming, and subsequent loss of stature in the community was more common. Seizure of property frequently accompanied suspicion and arrest, regardless of guilt or innocence.

Right. Seizure of property. It turns out colonial authorities gathered very detailed records of the financial assets of many of the people they arrested and accused of crypto-Judaism. It also turns out the authorities were not so reliable in passing on those records to their superiors back in Madrid, and somehow emerged from each set of accusations rather enriched.

The tension settled down in the second half of the 17th century. The Dutch left Brazil in 1654, the main promoter of the idolatry extirpation campaigns in Peru died in 1671, and a massive auto-da-fe in 1642-1649 Mexico eliminated most of the prime 'suspects'. Still, while it lasted, the Spanish colonial campaign against Judaism in the New World united religious, political, and economic motivations within a hurricane of paranoia.Medieval Islam and later medieval Christianity have fundamentally different political structures. Simply put, there is no Islamic equivalent to the Latin Church. In the high and late Middle Ages, the Church is sort of a transnational government. Its laws govern marriage; its inquisitors have the ability to investigate and prosecute heresy. Doctrine is defined by this centralized Church and its one sanctioned body of canon law; heresy is a deviation from it. A scholar in a university who writes a treatise in Latin interpreted to counter dogma will be censured, his work banned. A participant in a popular movement seen as a religious or political threat might be tortured to induce a confession (real or faked), then allowed to repent. (Typically, execution was for relapsed heretics, and note that torture was not a *punishment*, it was a tool).

Medieval Islam had no centralized governing body. That's certainly not to say the young religion and its scholars (theologians, lawyers, preachers) had no opinions on steering a right direction! There is in fact a massive body of medieval Arabic literature on "correct" and "erring" beliefs and practices. (Heresiographer al-Shahrastani, d. 1153, cites a hadith that after the Prophet's death, the Muslim community will eventually split into 72 groups of which only one will enter heaven). The various schools of law and theology sometimes spat bitterly at each other's erring (mis)use of haith and sura. Preachers and storytellers outside the academic tradition, too, could attract the enmity of the religious elite in their city. And occasionally, entire sects like the Kharijis (or Khawarij) would splinter off from others, to mutual accusations of various errors.

But with just a handful of exceptions, like the mihna under Abbasid caliph al-Mah'mun that OP mentions, "heresy" persecutions tended to be very contextual. They targeted religious individuals who were politically or socially troublesome in some way, always within the ever-shifting power matrix of the city or region. Crucially, they were carried out by the sultan in consultation with the local qadis, *who had no direct power of their own*. This was the mitigating factor, and it is why the mihna was different.

The mihna was the creation of the caliph against what Hurwitz (and probably others) calls the traditionalist faction within Baghdad's ulema, community of scholars, probably when he realized that extension and revocation of his financial support was not an effective method of control over them. This is a rare time in post-Umayyad medieval Islamic history when a caliph sought to intervene directly in religious affairs, and indeed, was known to imprison the scholars who countered his authority and have them brutually beaten. (Apparently popular outcry led to the release of at least some of them, though--reinforcing the argument that "heresy" and "persecution of heretics" within medieval Islam were always questions of maintaining a balance of power).

The mihna settled down when the caliph's successor had other preoccupations, and spheres of religious and political authority grew more defined (in no small part due to the work of Muslim legal scholars). Future caliphs had less interest in, or less room to, exert control over religion.

But issues still arose. In addition to the endless feuding among scholars, popular preachers and storytellers could provoke quite a fuss due to their influence over the wider population and, sometimes though not always, less developed knowledge of Islamic teachings than the ulema enjoyed. Most of the cases that Berkey investigated result in censure, first and foremost. Local *qadis* would consult with the sultan over a controversial or troublesome preacher, perhaps someone like Salah al-Kalla'i who was accused of mispronouncing the Qur'an, interpreting it wrong, and deceiving his audiences. Religious authorities could prohibit a preacher from preaching by issuing a *fatwa*, a personal legal ruling. The sultan would be more likely to exile him from the city, eliminating the immediate threat to social order without the danger of provoking public outcries like followed the torture of Hanbal during the *mihna*. (Of course, due to the ever-shifting fortunes of the different theological and legal schools, an exile would often find a comfortable reception one or two cities over.)

Indeed, political leaders tended towards not making a fuss. And so by the 15th century, Jalal al-Suyuti could only lament the (probably mythical) days when sultans whipped offenders and could threaten even worse punishments for those who erred.

Sources: Jonathan Berkey, *Popular Preaching and Religious Authority in the Medieval Islamic Near East*; N. B. Hurwitz, *The Formation of Hanbalism: Piety in Power, Culture, and Civilization in the Middle East*; Alexander Knysh, "'Orthodoxy' and 'Heresy' in Medieval Islam: An Essay in Reassessment," *The Muslim World* 83 (1993).&gt; In some cases the camped army would actual undertake the job of farming the surrounding region to not lose that seasons crops, to either feed their armies come Fall if the siege had lasted that long, or to not starve the people in their, soon to be, new city.

This is an optimistic spin on it. (Not saying it didn't happen, mind you.) To fill in the glaring gap:

Frequently, restless and hungry armies would be permitted by their leaders to plunder and pillage nearby villages and fields for food. If they managed to acquire more than they could consume or carry, they would sell it back to the people they stole it from, and use the money to purchase food from elsewhere.

They might also spend some time with the prostitutes who traveled with the army. In late medieval and early modern campaigns within Europe, you run across armies that assigned 3-8 prostitutes per regiment. Married men might also spend some time with their wives, if their wives had traveled in the army's "baggage train" to work as washers, clothesmakers, suppliers and nurses.

(Okay, yeah, I study mostly women, not armies, and I certainly wasn't going to give a top-level answer in this thread...but one can read around the edges.)Welcome, Professors! Thank you for sitting for this AMA! I hope you don't mind if I post my questions a bit too early.

1. Your book title says *faith*, the AMA title reads *religion*, and the blurb-comment mentions *church*. Are these terms interchangeable in early America? Would understanding the difference among them back then help untangle modern misconceptions about the time?

2. How did morality relate to "religion"--and is it fair to define religion in their eyes specifically as Christianity? 

3. Did the concurrence of multiple Christian traditions (Puritanism, Anglicanism, Catholicism (?), Quakers, perhaps Christian deism) affect how the founders talked about religion, especially in official documents? 

4. Is there any evidence to suggest how the founders' wives did/didn't influence their religious sentiments?And I was very happy for both the opening, and that you talked about siegecraft so I didn't have to! :)According to Hale and White, respectively, the 15th-16th century Spanish army was allowed 5-8 prostitutes per 200 men when campaigning outside the Iberian peninsula, and 3-8 per 200 when in Iberia itself.

I think "company" would have been the better term for me to use than regiment there, also. (...I am *really* not a military historian, sorry!)This would be an amazing question for someone whose flair doesn't say "Medieval Europe"! :D But there were certainly women who traveled with, for example, Washington's army in 18th century America. (There is the usual polemic against women corrupting the men, and also warnings to laundresses--not a euphemism in this case--not to charge too much for their services.)

Accompanying an army was by *no* means risk-free, which was a major source of concern for writers concerned about camp followers. Warfare could *easily* spill that far back from the front lines, you could have guerilla-type attacks, and of course the problems of disease and starvation were rampant. The problem was, until the institutionalization within the army structure (if not the military itself) of services like food procurement, laundering, clothing replacement, and nursing, camp followers were pretty darn important.I'm allergic to wool. I swear by [Drymax Cold Weather Run](http://www.runningwarehouse.com/Drymax_Cold_Weather_Run_Crew/descpage-DMCWRC.html) socks.

I do have Reynaud's syndrome (I lose circulation to my fingers and toes starting around 50F), and so deeper in winter I will wear two pairs of thinner socks, and tape a hand warmer over my toes between the two layers. Yes, they do sell dedicated foot warmers, but they are more expensive per unit.Aw, don't apologize! I'm just teasing you and making fun of my own limitations. I don't know much about the Mongols, either, unfortunately.

The nature of the Crusades, especially the early ones, made it a special case. The Europeans incubated and *marketed* crusade as first and foremost a pilgrimage: a holy journal to the most sacred of cities (Jerusalem), unfairly snatched from Christian hands. Along with the traditional camp followers, from prostitutes (yes, on a pilgrimage...and no, monk-chroniclers were not happy about this) on up to the Countess of Toulouse!, the crusader army was followed by *masses* of "pauperes" or "peregrini" (pilgrims/travelers).

You might know this story hazily, even, from within Europe: the first First Crusade, or the pre-Crusade, was a mass of humanity (probably including nobles as well as the traditional view of peasants) behind Peter the Hermit, a French priest. In fact, there is some evidence to suggest Peter's message particularly appealed to marginalized (poor and/or too-old-to-be-unmarried women), or possibly he worked to appeal to them as a way to build up his "army." They stormed through France and Germany and never quite made it to the Near East, but they did unleash the first major pogroms against Jews in Europe on their way to failure.

The pauperes that accompanied actual crusader armies, as in, to the Near East, seem to have been responsible for much or most of the looting and pillaging of cities and towns along the way. Perhaps not a surprise--they had to eat, too, and generally do not seem to have done as well as the soldiers. Epidemics and starvation are noted to have killed women in disproportionate numbers, and a disproportionate number of the women on the way were among the pauperes rather than more traditional camp-follower type.

As for "how," well, organization and lack thereof. One of the First Crusade's chronicler, Albert of Aachen, describes how the *parvi* and *magni* (small and great) alike massed at Civetot, on foot and on horseback, to *carry the boats overland that they would need once they reached the lake at Nicea*. There are also references to pauperes being killed in the Near East while out pasturing their *oxen*, so clearly, there is quite a bit of logistics that we mostly can't see.&gt; Speaking of whom, rather than speak of "new Christians" you should distinguish between Conversos and Moriscos because their nature and their treatments were very different.

I was following my very very secondary sources; do you know what label the primary on a case like Manuel Bautista Perez (converso executed as a crypto-Jew in Lima 1639) would use?

Were there extra restrictions on who could go to Mexico? It seems like the Portuguese connection was stronger there than to the south.Yeah, sorry, I meant specifically the period of the anti-Jewish inquistorial activities, 1620-1650, which overlaps when the two crowns were united.There are a couple things going on here. First, scholars--good ones--have used "anxiety" as a blanket, uncritical explanation for all sorts of social development and change, *especially* in the late Middle Ages. The fifteenth century is a prime example. The Reformation happened in the sixteenth, so clearly, the *entire population* must have been desperately anxious over having to "work for" salvation (bit o' projection from a particular portion of the life of a single Augustinian monk) and thus they fled eagerly to the Lutheran message when it was proclaimed. First problem here: large chunks of Europe, including areas very much exposed to Luther's preaching, stayed Catholic. Second problem: More recent research has shown that 15th century Christians were pretty happy with their religion, if not always with individual clerics in specific times and places.

Second, we need to be *really* cautious about projecting backwards--or sideways--a "simpler life" idealism. I think *holy crap how do I feed my family when the crops haven't grown for three years and shit the English are torching our fields* is as legitimate a source of bad feelings as technolust, Facebook competition, etc. Jewish legal decisions and decrees from medieval Ashkenaz (ETA: northeastern France/German Rhineland) are filled with exhortations to parents to stop grieving their dead children so loudly and so publicly for so long--they have other children to attend to! The pressures may be different, or not, but it's not our place to judge whether they are *less*.

Finally, as a historian, I'll say: mental illnesses are very culturally conditioned and constructed, and it's sometimes possible to identify, in medieval sources, patterns of symptoms that we today would recognize as similar to what we call a distinct disorder. This can be a dangerous path, though--looking for symptoms from a checklist is an imposition of modern ideas onto a past. It's much more helpful to investigate how medieval people understood the world.

With all that background, there are certain things in the Middle Ages that can seem to overlap with our modern idea of depression. I mean, *melancholia* goes back to Hippocrates! One particularly medieval example is the sin of acedia or accedia, precursor to "sloth" in the Seven Deadly Sins hierarchy. While sloth typically gets interpreted as laziness today, acedia is more like "listlessness of the spirit". Late antique monk-author John Cassian describes it thus:

&gt; He looks about anxiously this way and that, and sighs that none of the brethren come to see him, and often goes in and out of his cell, and frequently gazes up at the sun, as if it was too slow in setting, and so a kind of unreasonable confusion of mind takes possession of him like some foul darkness.

Polymath nun Hildegard of Bingen was sort of the Dear Abby of the 12th century. While she wrote and answered a lot of letters advising and exhorting kings and bishops, she also responded to hundreds from monks and nuns across Europe, struggling to choose a religious direction (frequently, wishing to shun the position of abbess or abbot to which they had been elected for fear of giving in to vanity and the duties distracting them from prayer). She answered lay people worried about whether their dead spouses and, heartbreakingly, children were in heaven, hell or purgatory.

Intriguingly, a whole complex of outward symptoms that we might relate to particular expressions of mental illness became linked to a very female idea of *holiness* in the late Middle Ages. The extreme food asceticism to the point of starving to death is the most famous (cf. Caroline Walker Bynum, *Holy Feast and Holy Fast*), but digging into the hagiographies that don't read like straight-up copies of another, you can see the edges of something like acedia: inability to drag themselves out of bed, not bathing, isolating from their monastic sisters even more than their community Rule mandated silence. But if we can take the personal account of Margaretha Ebner as reflecting her mental, not just spiritual, state, even some of those women perceived their experience as beneficial if painful ("suffering" is a common theme, but it's not always clear what exactly that means).

Seriously, if you're interested in this topic, I can't recommend Bynum's book highly enough. She's a genuinely compelling writer, the book has some really good introductory sections for non-specialist readers, and it's a great tool to learn how to deal with a phenomenon *historically* instead of projecting modernity onto the past.Hale, *War and Society in Renaissance Europe* (1985), 162.

White, "The Experience of Spain's Early Modern Soldiers," *War in History* 9, no. 1 (2002): 29.

I did all this awesome research for the question you asked in panel sub ABOUT WOMEN AND GENDER, and now I'm blowing it on a thread about siege warfare... ;)I don't know about avoiding a battle, but there are plenty of cases of fighting spilling behind the "front lines." It's one of the big concerns expressed over soldiers' wives coming along.

In the Crusades, one really interesting thing you see is the difference in the portrayal of European women in European vs Arab chronicles. The Arab authors have a vested interest in portraying the "Franks" as utter barbarians, so they describe women in armor, fighting with swords, because what is this world coming to that women fight. The Europeans, probably more realistically, describe women behind the army OR bringing water to the soldiers (carrying water is a big deal in Crusade chronicles and popular literature) armed with only knives but still able to deal significant blows to defend themselves when attacked.

Which brings up an interesting point. *The* Arab party line on Frankish success in individual battles in the First Crusade was that they were actually terrible fighters with no skill, but they had good weapons and armor. So, is attributing good weapons and armor to women a tacit acknowledgement that the ladies had some skills? Draw your own conclusions.I won't say no definitively, but: early modern, at least, chroniclers and letter writers generally make a sharp distinction between married women and unmarried women among camp followers. With married women, they acknowledge their importance in providing their husbands with clothes, food, "etc", and in helping gather food or doing laundry for unmarried soldiers as well. The writers are concerned primarily with the dangers the women face. Across the board, they accept the idea that married women are under their husbands' control, as was the *legal* (meaning, in courts of law) norm at the time. With unmarried women, there's MUCH less concentration on the useful services, and much more hand-wringing about moral corruption. They permitted prostitutes in large part to try to keep unmarried soldiers from raping and/or kidnapping women from towns they conquered or pillaged, although we know from accounts by a few rapist-soldiers themselves (!) that this was not always successful.Oh, I have my fair share of historical "conspiracy theories," none of which I will talk about publicly. But honestly, mental illness is one area where I try *not* to speculate even in the looniest of looney zones. I don't, personally, see modern conceptions of mental illness as a historical tool. I can get a reasonable idea from modern sources how our particular iterations of depression, schizophrenia, anorexia etc affect a person's thought patterns, but I don't know if they would have had the same impact on a medieval person's. (Margaretha Ebner's *Revelations* are particularly instructive for me in this case. That's not what the "inner account" of someone with depression or anorexia today would look like, at ALL--whether from a pro-eating disorder site or a memoir of coping with depression--even if there is overlap in outward symptoms.)Haha, yes, I do like to ask questions. Thank you so much for your reply! I am going to check out Gelles' article, too.Thanks for great questions. :)

I don't have direct evidence to answer this, but I can talk about a parallel situation. Besieging forces might offer the women and children in a town the chance to flee first, especially if they foresaw a looming showdown. But. If women stayed behind--and frequently, some or all did--they were completely fair game, so to speak. *Whether or not they directly engaged in combat* (and many did--one-on-one fighting or throwing down rocks or a myriad of other ways), simply by existing in a town under siege they were combatants. By extrapolation, their support role in an army would have made them combatants in one perspective, even if their technical noncombatant status allowed them more leeway to travel to nearby towns to purchase supplies.According to Olivia Remie Constable's *Trade and Traders in Muslim Spain: The Commercial Realignment of the Iberian Peninsula, 900-1500*, the VIP Iberian ports were Seville, Valencia, Almeria, and Cartagena. The key factor was control of Mallorca and the other Balearic islands, since basically all sea trade had to pass through there. In the era of al-Andalus and the taifa kingdoms, these ports were crucial for Mediterranean trade. Intriguingly, as Christians conquered more and more of the peninsula, the same ports became key staging points for connecting the Mediterranean trade centered around Italy up north to the British Isles (and eventually south to the Canaries).

The fastest way to Rome was the easiest: by ship.Visibility. Even if you're running during the day, cloudy days around the lakes can be pretty dim to dark. I have blinkies on anytime the clouds are out. Also bright colors help stand out against snow. Since once the snow gets to the point where it sticks around for the whole winter, you'll have less room to dodge cars. They need to see you sooner than in the summer.

The treadmill sucks, but it can be a useful and necessary tool on some days if you have access to one.

It's winter; embrace it. Build in some cross-training days every once in awhile to take advantage of winter--cross-country skiing, Michigan's version of skiing, sledding the Indiana dunes (walking back up is your workout, trust me).I've done some night trail races. Basically everyone has a Black Diamond or a Petzl. I have a Black Diamond Storm and I love it. The strap is elasticy and doesn't slip down at all.

You can probably score a good discount on a headlamp this month from some outdoor site or other's (REI, Backcountry, Moosejaw, even Running Warehouse) pre-Black Friday rotating sales.Batsignal /u/Mictlantecuhtli, /u/Cozijo, please? (I am informed username pings do not work in OP.)Think of yourself as a detective. Instead of seeking The One Answer Already Assembled, you must find pieces of evidence: bits of the  of the past and pieces of historical scholarship, to build your "case."

If you truly have plenty of books on the subject, and they are good academic books, you will find the evidence to build answers to both your questions in them!


First, historians are the authors of those books, so reading the books will let you know what those particular historians think. If you're lucky, the introduction or even some of the chapters will also directly discuss what other historians have thought of the topic.

Second, the back of the book should have a bibliography. In it, you will find many other books and, yup, journal articles. Look at the titles. Which ones look like they might offer good evidence to help you build your case?To be clear: *I* am the moron here, not my question. :)

I am running a marathon in a couple weeks 100% for the swag. (The half filled up before I could register, unfortunately.) This is not a PR race for me; I will be using it as a too-long training run. What's a good pace relative to my usual long run: the same? :15/mile slower? Taper a week and go a little faster to be on my feet for less time?I'm not worried about the distance. I PRed in mid-October and have been taking Pfitz's "multiple marathons" schedules in *Advanced Marathoning* a bit easier than written (no speedwork, dropping some miles...I didn't think I needed a 70/wk with no time goals whatsoever). Had a very nice 20-miler on Saturday.

I expect to get *all* of me kicked anyway, not just my ass. :D It's still 26.2 miles, even if I'm not racing it.In 1794, the township of Kendal-Kirkland in England had a population of around 8100.

According to the [excise books](https://books.google.com/books?id=IVNHAAAAYAAJ&amp;q=gallons#v=snippet&amp;q=gallons&amp;f=False), that year they drank 225,080 gallons of ale (4.62L/ale gal).

That's to say nothing of the malt liquor.That's just the amount they drank when out carousing with their friends. Apparently mostly on Sundays.

Oh, audiences loved the Weird Sisters of *Macbeth*. Couldn't get enough of them.

So Shakespeare seems to have drawn the plot for "the Scottish play" from a popular history of Britain called *Holinshed's Chronicles*. (In fact, the *Chronicles* are the source for the name Weird Sisters--the First Folio edition of *Macbeth* names them "weyward.") The sisters of the *Chronicles* give their Macbeth the same prophecies as Shakespeare's version. But they are goddesses of destiny, nymphs or fairies. It is Shakespeare who turned them into the ugly old hags we know them as, derived from the popular witchcraft mythology of his own time.

And Shakespeare knew what he was doing. He was well versed in working magicians into his plays, from portraying pretty young Joan of Arc as a witch in *Henry VI Part 1* (because French) to Oberon and Titania of *Midsummer Night's Dream* to the grand educated sorcery of Prospero in *The Tempest*. He could have done anything with the *Chronicles*' Weird Sisters, or rather, he could very easily have done nothing, just kept them the same fairies they already were.

But Shakespeare lived in a day when Reginald Scot's *The Discoverie of Witchcraft*, a book intended to show how *silly* the superstitious belief in witches was and how witches were just con artists fooling people for money or jest, ended up as a bestseller **as a source of information on witches and spells**. He played directly on those stereotypes in revising his version of the sisters. He was catering to his audience.

We know it worked, too. In fact--he hadn't gone far enough. *Macbeth* is usually dated to the middle of the first decade of the 1600s. Our surviving original copy is from the 1623 First Folio, and appears to be a copy of a performed (so slightly abbreviated) version of the play. And in this 1623 edition, several scenes have been added *from an entirely different play*: Thomas Middleton's *The Witch*. 

As you might expect, these scenes feature the witches. They included an extended sequence where Hecate, Queen of the Witches, instructs the sisters; and a couple of songs the witches sing. Why did these scenes make their way into the version of *Macbeth* performed? Because they were the popular, populist scenes extracted from a play that garnered little contemporary attention otherwise (though there is some question whether that was due to poor audience reception overall, or official censorship).

Shakespeare's adaptation of the *Chronicles*' nymphs into night-hags stirring their cauldrons, and then ramping up the witches' presence in the play between the original version and the version being performed by 1623, show that the witches of *Macbeth* succeeded in their goal of alluring audiences. In fact, even more than Shakespeare originally thought they would.Honestly, if you can get ahold of the *Oxford Handbook of Witchcraft in Early Modern Europe and Colonial America*, ed. Brian Levack, you'll find two great chapters on "The Witch in Early Modern Literature" (Diane Purkiss)  and "Images of Witchcraft in Early Modern Europe" (Charles Zika). Both topics have had different interpretations over the years/been studied from various angles. Purkiss and Zika absolutely have dogs in their respective games, but both present a nice view of the historiography. And, importantly, give good "further reading" suggestions from which you can pick as your interests lie. I do hope you're interested in England, though. (It's Oxford Press, after all.)There was no "postal service" in the European Middle Ages. Letters were individually delivered by messengers. Frequently, the physical letter itself would only convey part of the message. The sender would tell the messenger the rest of it, to be delivered in person to the intended recipient.

The earliest organized mail service in Western Europe is under Maximilian I in the Holy Roman Empire at the turn of the 16th century, mostly for use by delegates to meetings of the Reichstag (imperial parliament).

[This recent thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3tax9v/i_am_the_lord_of_castle_1_wanting_to_talk_with/) has some great information on medieval letters!Congratulations on breaking 30 minutes! That's awesome!

There are a couple of ways to adapt to warmer weather. First: run in it every chance you get once the weather turns in the spring. "They say" it takes about 2 weeks of running to adjust. You'll still be slower than you would in cooler weather, but it won't feel as bad. 

Second, the advice elsewhere in this thread to do some of your runs on a treadmill is actually pretty solid. Not only is the gym warmer than outside, but the lack of breeze/wind in your face will make you even hotter. Some people *while hydrating very very well* run inside in tights and a T-shirt to simulate warm weather. (I'd caution against running *only* inside on the treadmill unless you have no other option: because the belt moves on its own, you are doing less work than outside, so it is physically easier. Mentally...that's another story.)

Third, you can ape some of the blood oxygen level gains that are the physiological marker of adapting to hot weather running, by sitting in a sauna for 15-30 minutes after a run. This probably requires membership at a gym or YMCA that has a functional and non-sketchy dry sauna, but if you've got one, go for it.Matthew Kapell and Andrew Elliott, eds., *Representations of History in Video Games* (2013)

Here is its [table of contents](http://playingwiththepast.com/contents/) with links to websites of the chapter authorsThe worse the taper, the better the race.Aw, I ran Space Coast this year and actually liked the out-and-back format. Especially the second half, where there were *always* people going in the opposite direction. I get a boost from periodically cheering on other runners.

Of course I run 80% of my outdoor miles on the same ~2 square miles of rural road which are the only "hills" in my town. So you could have plopped a treadmill next to the Indian River under the palm trees and I probably would have enjoyed Space Coast. :)Depends on the conditions. In rain or through creekbeds, normal shoes (Brooks Ravenna 5--I'm hoarding them for their quickdry properties) and thick, quick-dry socks. I can't do wool, but [Drymax Cold Weather socks](http://www.runningwarehouse.com/Drymax_Cold_Weather_Run_Crew/descpage-DMCWRC.html) work amazingly for me. I am known to carry a second pair of them if I think I will be out long enough or will soak through the pair on my feet.

If it's snowing or I'm trudging through snow/puddles/frosty or wet grass, Gore-Tex shoes. I'm using the Saucony Ride GTX this winter after not loving the Brooks Ghost GTX last year. But warning: don't wear Gore-Tex shoes in the rain. Because once the water gets in through the top around your ankle, it ain't coming back out.IME, Gore-Tex shoes are actually best for protection against dry wind and cold. It's nice that they keep out snow or save you from the accidental puddle/snowpile misstep, but quite frankly, even a solid regular shoe + thick socks will do most of that for a decent amount of time. (Puddles, maybe not.)Does anyone have suggestions on a run/walk strategy for a flat 6-hour timed race? I am in solid marathon (running) shape and I walk-commute, so run/walk seems like it would work the best.&gt; https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3r5eqc/if_we_were_to_step_into_an_ancient_roman_surgery/

For what it's worth, this was a really cool question and answer. Thanks.Thank you so much! And also /u/b1uepenguin for the reading recommendation. I've had my eye on that section of the AH booklist but didn't have a clue where to start digging in, so this is just perfect!

&gt; In cases of severe devastation, those same high island-low island relationships might come into play again -- with high islanders moving out to the low island to help them repopulate.

This is fascinating. I *definitely* need to start reading!&gt; I'm reading The Red Queen by Matt Ridley, which is about evolutionary psychology and sexual selection.

And apparently not at all about the actual Middle Ages.

[I've talked before](https://redd.it/3pafst) about the complications of talking about a broad "marriage age" in the European Middle Ages. But tl;dr, really the only case you're talking about men *systematically* not marrying until their early thirties is *upper class men in Renaissance Italian cities.* This was due in part to the structure of Italian extended families and inheritance. It was beneficial to the paterfamilias to keep their sons unmarried as long as possible, to hold the family's wealth in one place. Even after marriage, the new wife tended to move in with her husband *and his parents* (and possibly brother and sister-in-law). This is not "evolutionary psychology." It's specifically related to the demographics and laws of late medieval Italian city-states. Even in the Italian countryside, men tend to marry in their twenties and women in their later teens. In northwest Europe, both women and men are getting married probably in their twenties, thanks especially to young women spending time in so-called life-cycle work as domestic servants to earn their dowry, and the raising of the age of journeyman status in the artisan guilds.

As for sex? Medieval people had tons of sex. We know about this in particular from late medieval canon (Church--the Church regulated marriage law in the late MA) courts. See, canon law had a weird almost-double standard, where *legal* (but not "licit"--approved) marriage only required consent between the involved parties, with consummation a bonus; the 'reading of the bans' or public pronouncement of the marriage made it licit/approved. So there are ALL SORTS of court cases of the medieval he said/she said (or more typically, one said/the other's parents said) variety, where one party claims there was consent followed by some time in the haystacks; the other claims there was never an agreement to marry.

The question of favoring girl babies versus boy babies is *really* contentious. After first having to prove (really) that yes, medieval parents cared about their children, scholars have tried very hard to prove (a) medieval parents favored sons (b) medieval parents loved sons and daughters equally. The same evidence gets used to argue both sides, too. (If daughters are sent to a wet nurse to breastfeed for longer than sons in a given urban setting, is this because their parents don't love them, or because they love them more and want them to have better food for longer? What do we think when this situation is reversed in the next town over?) There is of course zero doubt that the Middle Ages were *heavily* misogynist, but we have an abundance of evidence that shows medieval parents did love their daughters.

For example, modern (American, at least) parents start paying into a college fund when their kids are born, investing in their future, right? Renaissance Italian fathers started paying into a fund set up by the city to help build a sufficient dowry for their daughters, to ensure they had a big enough one to secure the best marriage and future life they could. Italian dads lied flagrantly about their daughers' age to get them better marriage deals. Princess Kunigunde, daughter of the Holy Roman Emperor (and later Duchess of Bavaria), was one of her father's close counselors and, according to her contemporary biographer, regularly received envoys to him and conveyed their messages favorably to her father. In 16th and 17th century German cities that adopted Protestantism, aristocratic fathers actually fought the city councils and local churches to *keep a few convents open* so their daughters could have an option for an adult life besides marriage.

It's True that sons generally inherited much more than daughters, and higher up the social scale had better access to formal education. On the other hand, the driving force of vernacular literacy in the Middle Ages isn't men of any class, it's *aristocratic women* (nobility and urban gentry).

All of these developments are *historicized*. That is, whatever the genetic and epigenetic and hormonal underpinnings of love and devotion and parenthood, the specifics of marriage age, education patterns, and inheritance laws must be studied *in their different historical contexts* to understand why they developed the way they did.Avec plaisir!

First of all, peasant literacy throughout the Middle Ages and well into the early modern era remains rock bottom low. Peasants rarely had the need or opportunity to learn to read. And books were *expensive*. For most of the Middle Ages, book material was parchment a.k.a. vellum (animal skin), so even small scribbly books were really a luxury object. The introduction of paper from the Arab world in the late Middle Ages helped make broadsheets and pamphlets more affordable, but still mostly to the urban middle class and nobility. So, onward.

In the Middle Ages, to be *literatus*, literate, meant *Latin*. Latin was the official language of the Church and of medieval governance (with a handful of exceptions--f.e. late Anglo-Saxon England, some 15th century German city records). But well before the year 1000, people weren't speaking it as their normal childhood language, and quite frankly, Latin is a *beast* to learn. (FIGHT ME, CLASSICISTS. YOU ARE WRONG AND I AM RIGHT.)

So men being educated for the upper levels of the clergy/prestigious (income attached) ecclesiastical positions, or to work as "clerks" in the developing royal bureaucracies, learn to read and write Latin. Novice monks and nuns learn to read Latin, too, because reading is a fundamental component of Western monastic devotion.

We have some vernacular literature from the tenth and eleventh centuries, of course. Scholars generally posit a primarily male authorship and target audience for these texts. For example, female characters in works like Beowulf, the Song of Roland, etc. are pretty much background. And the topics are the province of men: war, thrones, athletic competitions.

But something really interesting happens in C12-13. First, the amount of surviving vernacular literature increases *substantially*. Second, the genre of medieval romance Happens. For pretty much the first time, women are real characters. Certainly not always treated well, and of course there are *heavy* double standards for the characters in love and lust. But medieval romances are discussing topics generally perceived as more female-friendly, or at least more directly relevant to women's lives: relationships, marriage, lives. And female characters get to exercise agency.

Look, I'm a ladynerd, I grew up reading books where boys and men fly starships and shoot laserguns. *I know* I'm talking about stereotypes here. Medievalists know. But we also know that even today, more men than women read sci-fi. More women than men read (modern-style) supermarket romance. Medieval romance is a rather different genre, but some of the assumptions can still be drawn out. When women write romance--Marie de France, for example--they too write the love stories, and give women an active role.

And it's not just 'fiction' texts that are targeting women. Some of our earliest *religious* vernacular literature is clearly written for a female audience. The Ancrenne Wisse and the so-called Katherine Group of early Middle English texts, for example, offer guidance to (female) anchoresses and nuns. While there are some *extremely* skillful nuns writing in Latin throughout the Middle Ages, nuns are also taking up their pens to translate or compose new religious works in the vernacular--even though they and their sisters still know solid Latin. Barking Abbey in England produces quite a stash of vernacular literature, like Clemence of Barking's *Life* of Katherine of Alexandria.

Moving into the 13th century, male theologians at the new universities are writing epic works of theology (the *Summa Theologica* of Thomas Aquinas; a zillion commentaries on Lombard's *Sententiae*). Women? Religious women, inside and outside of monasteries, write gorgeous vernacular works of religious devotion and speculative theology from a mystical/personal perspective. My username comes from 13th century beguine (like a nun, but not living in a formal convent) Mechthild of Magdeburg: "You shine into my soul / like the sun against gold." You don't get that from Thomas.

By the 14th and 15th centuries, men recognize the power of vernacular literature. Literary circles surround Chaucer and Langland in England; Dante in Italy. On one hand, they're writing for an audience--a public--of each other. But from what we can reconstruct of manuscript ownership, women are purchasing and reading *Piers Plowman* in significant numbers. And everyone loves Chaucer's Wife of Bath, right?

Most late medieval vernacular literature is still religious, though, and over and over in sources, religious reading outside monasteries is more associated with women (especially widows) than men. Additionally, sermons assign mothers, specifically, the task of teaching basic catechism *including reading if they are able* to their children. While better-off urban boys attend Latin grammar schools in ever-increasing numbers, beguines and other independent religious women, or just a steadily-literate aristocratic women, teach vernacular literacy to girls in informal settings (at least in German cities). Scribes at women's convents produce a blend of Latin texts, vernacular original texts, and vernacular translations of Latin works for their own communities and to trade with sister convents.

In 15th century cities, reading and writing has become a near-necessary skill to run a household--the province of women. Writer-printer (barber, surgeon, poet, singer...Renaissance man) Hans Folz in Nuremberg writes:

&gt; Welch arm gsel stell in die ee / Mag er, so lerne voran / Schreiben und lesen. Wer das kan, / Dem get vil sach dest leichter zu.

&gt; You poor men, if you want to get married, first learn to read and write. It will make everything easier.

In context, the point is only partially that reading and writing (not automatically connected skills in the Middle Ages) are necessary to run an urban shop. As so often in Folz, the topic is the balance of power between husband and wife. The moral of the story is that women are on the verge of taking over and men need to catch up, quick. Vernacular literacy was still linked to women.

Throughout the high and later Middle Ages, Latin is increasingly the near-exclusive province of men. But women "take up and read" in the vernacular more than men.Even just within the 13th century, Hadewijch is *foundational* for the Dutch literary canon. We only have a short text from Beatrijs of Nazareth, but her hagiographer (who preserved the *Seven Manners*) mentions that she had written a whole lot more. Late 13th/early 14th century Marguerite Porete is writing in Old French, True, but she is from the Low Countries and the oldest surviving fragment of the *Mirror* is closer to Middle Dutch. Mechthild of Magdeburg's original Middle Low German *Flowing Light* comes out of the same literary/theological milieu as Hadewijch, and MLG is as close to Middle Dutch as it is to "medieval German (MHighG), maybe closer.

By the late fourteenth and fifteenth centuries, the sisters of the Devotio moderna are consuming and producing *gonzo* amounts of vernacular literature. Actually, the Devotio moderna, despite our Latinate name for it, is a *huge* driver of vernacular literacy in men's houses as well as women. Alijt Bake is probably the most important female author coming out of the Dm, but she is in no way alone.

But remember, we are talking about readers as much as writers. Individual women and women's convents owning texts is a major source for our knowledge of medieval literacy. And Dutch women were *huge* readers of the vernacular. The *Speculum virginum* is a fascinating case. Our 12th/13th century copies of the *Latin original text* are almost exclusively from men's convents. In the 15th century, its Dutch translation is massively popular among Devotio moderna *women*!&gt; The book makes it sounds like these women would have preferred working for wealthier men and serving as their concubines as this would have been preferable over living outside the castle and would have also meant a better future for the children that come out of those relationships ('bastards').

First of all, women working as domestic servants was not necessarily or even typically a "go to Elizabeth Bathory's castle" kind of situation. You're mostly talking girls from the country and city working in another city household for a few years. *To save up money for marriage*. Shacking up with a noble and churning out bastards is not exactly going to help their marriage prospects. Actually, rather the opposite. The Middle Ages are not exactly kind to unwed mothers or women with a, shall we say, dubious reputation. (Karras explores this topic in her book *Common Women* on medieval English prostitution).

Again, this is a case where you have to historicize. Late medieval women worked temporarily as servants to earn a bigger dowry to improve their marriage prospects. Why would they systematically engage in a practice (producing noble bastards) that will undermine the entire purpose for working?

We have some hints that, in some cases, domestic servants did end up having sexual relations with the father or older sons of the household (whatever the dynamics of the relationship were). A lot of this comes from legal opinions trying to regulate Christian and Jewish girls working in homes across religious lines.

In medieval Islamic lands, sure, a slave who bears a child to her owner becomes legally *umm-walad*, "mother of the child", and gains special protections and status. That's not typically the case in medieval Christian territories, though.Fathers would lie to make older daughters seem younger. (We are talking about making 16-year-olds into 13 and 14-year-olds, just to be clear here). We know that dowries increased *substantially* for girls as they got older, meaning older girls were less desirable as wives. There are some different theories floating around as to why--childbearing years, ties to natal vs marriage family, younger wives being more intimidated by the new family and thus more pliant, etc.YES. All is right with the world.

Granted, I would have said that for basically any combination of winners this month, but I loved both of those answers. AH is so awesome.Mutually stating to each other that they were in fact married. "Consent" is not related to sex in the Middle Ages like it is today. (Except insofar as the "marriage debt" was concerned: husbands and wives owed each other sex upon demand, according to canon law, as long as it was [within the rules](http://i.imgur.com/0hXDcua.png) that James Brundage has so helpfully delineated).The material book was highly prized, too.

When books were ordered "destroyed," like Thomas of Celano's *vitae* of Francis of Assisi once Bonaventure composed the official *Legenda maior*, they were very rarely actually destroyed. Instead, expert scribes actually scraped down the surface to remove as much of the original text as they possible could, so the physical book could be reused! Occasionally, when you read a medieval manuscript, you can see faint traces of the previous book underneath the one you're actually reading!

So when a book was genuinely, officially ordered *burned*--destroyed forever--it was a big, big deal. (And even then, typically one copy would be burned symbolically, and the others maybe destroyed, maybe just scraped down for other use depending on the thriftiness versus piety of the owner). Literally the next step was burning the author, as beguine author Marguerite Porete unfortunately discovered in 1310.And to add onto my previous post: when I am really struggling with a book, I read as many reviews as I can get my hands on. [It looks like with Arrighi](https://www.google.com/search?q=arrighi+%22long+twentieth+century%22+review&amp;oq=arrighi+%22long+twentieth+century%22+review&amp;aqs=chrome..69i57.6298j0j1&amp;sourceid=chrome&amp;es_sm=122&amp;ie=UTF-8), you're well supplied!Seriously, what century is *not* considered "long"? Do we have any periods of historical development that are couched entirely within the bonds of a century (but bigger than decade, I suppose) and thus get to be a "short" century?

Long eleventh, long twelfth, long thirteenth, I even took a *class* called English Literature in the Long Fourteenth Century, long fifteenth, long sixteenth...long nineteenth, now a thread about the long twentieth...really?  Haven't we longed a couple of those pretty much out of existence?You're very welcome! If you're interested, several of us had a brief discussion about parchment vs paper and luxury manuscripts in the age of print [on this thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3pjy9l/what_happened_to_the_scribes_and_monks_after_the/cw73ytt).By 1500, we're looking at a (wildly guesstimated, to be fair) urban literacy rate of 30-50%, at least in major English and German towns. So middle class, too. But yes, poor people are still generally excluded from even informal education.So this is not really my area, but I just finished Lisa Bitel's *Landscape with Two Saints: How Genovefa of Paris and Brigit of Kildare Built Christianity in Barbarian Europe.* The second half of the book focuses on Ireland, which is Bitel's original expertise.

It's a really neat and current take on Christianization in Ireland, focusing on architecture and sacred landscapes--the interaction of people with the environment. (Environmental studies is big in medieval lit and history right now.) [Here's a review](http://bmcr.brynmawr.edu/2010/2010-02-09.html), if you'd like to read a bit more about the book.

Bitel is a smooth enough writer, for an academic, and the book isn't weighed down with Theory or academic language. Overall, an enjoyable and fascinating way to look at the topic.This is actually really interesting for the Middle Ages.

See, there's this old, old historiographic notion known as the "Frauenfrage"--the 'woman question.' For a period in the later Middle Ages, our textual sources can be interpreted to imply an *overabundance* of women compared to men. (One basis of this question is, why does it seem like so many more women than men are drawn to independent/non-official religious movements). Whether or not this was actually the case, most recent historians don't really tangle with it because we can't use the sources we have to judge one way or the other. (And also, for its implications that "too many" women is a "problem".)

Another important angle, of course, are the remarriage and death in childbirth factors. It's not an accident that the medieval patron saint of childbirth is Margaret of Antioch, who kills a dragon (demon) after it eats her *by exploding out of its stomach*. Maternal mortality was sky high.

Additionally, both widows and widowers certainly remarried. However, while there was a lot of social and sometimes financial pressure on widows to remarry, there was also pushback. On one hand, from the Church in some cases, which preached a sort of secondary chastity or virginity. But on the other, widowhood provided a handful of women with their only real chance to exercise full autonomy. Where we see women as independent guild members and business owners, *usually* (not quite always, but usually) they are widows who inherited their husband's profession. In many cases, it was a woman's only real chance to end up in legal charge of her household. So while some women certainly remarried and even had more children, this was perhaps more frequently the case for men. So you would indeed have fewer men having children with more women.There are a handful of recorded historical exceptions. However, under Islamic law, the child is free!Scholars generally accept male authorship for *Cloud* and the other texts linked to the same (anonymous) author. 

Intended audience is an interesting question. *Cloud* and some of its sister-texts repeatedly refer to "men and wommen" and "bre\u00feren &amp; sistren." This type of language is much more heavily associated with texts written for individual women and women's communities. Some scholars have also pointed out that various prayers the *Cloud* author recommends throughout his texts are modeled closely after prayers prescribed elsewhere to (female) anchoresses. I'm not as convinced by that particular piece of evidence, since the overall mystical 'program' or path advised by the *Cloud* appropriates ideas cultivated above all by mystical female writers. There's no reason the *Cloud* author couldn't have used prayers linked to them, too. More indicative of an expected female audience, IMHO, is the fact that whenever the author quotes the Bible, he gives the Latin first, but then translates it into the vernacular. By the late fourteenth century, monks were still all learning good Latin (monks at this stage were also just about all consecrated priests). The Latinacy of *nuns* by this point, on the other hand, varied tremendously but was mostly limited. Giving the vernacular for *Bible verses* in the harshening religious climate of 14th-15th century England carries a lot of weight.

As far as actual readership, manuscripts of the *Cloud* have been linked to both men's and women's communities.Peasant men had lots of sex, too. 

They show up in "are too married/are not" court cases. Impotence was grounds for actual, legal divorce in the Middle Ages--they show up in court cases where their wives accuse them of infertility, or they accuse their wives of infertility. Especially since canon law recognized a "marriage debt," the belief that husbands and wives owed each other sex upon demand, courts would not even consider visiting a case like that if one party was just all, "Of course she thinks I'm infertile; she just rolls over and goes to sleep every night."

And, I mean, peasant men obviously had sex because peasant families had peasant kids.&gt; I have come across no mention of this in the context of medieval Europe. If you have, I'd love to see a cite.

David Herlihy, *Medieval Households*, 102-03 talks about some of the previous scholarship and matches it with his studies of late medieval Tuscany. (He, with Christine Klapisch-Zuber, is THE GUY on late medieval Italian demographics). MH 142, he mentions that rural peasant families had more kids (more sex?) than the urban gentry.

Martha Howell, *Women, Production, and Patriarchy in Medieval Cities* goes further in depth on the early, demographic studies, noting that the pattern appears solid but explanations of it are still lacking.

&gt; You need some other explanation to account for these things, the church won't do.

I am historicizing the facts: explaining how they functioned in a specific historical context. When we have transhistorical phenomena like the pathological underpinnings of a mental illness like depression or anorexia, that's what we as historians do. It's fruitless to search for "anorexia nervosa" in the Middle Ages, because our modern interpretation and presentation of a certain web of symptoms comes out of the modern world. Nevertheless, we can recognize much of the *underlying pathology* in medieval women, and look at how medieval people and institutions understood those symptoms (as bodily, mostly female sainthood, FWIW).I'm not trying to explain 10000 years of statistics. I'm saying it existed in the Middle Ages and this is what it looked like at this time.

I'm not gonna type the whole thing--the book is wonderfully available through interlibrary loan at your friendly neighborhood library--but here's an excerpt:

&gt; An English survey dated 1185, entitled Rotuli de dominabus, shows the distribution of sexes with a segment of the Anglo-Norman Nobility. The document lists the possessions and children of widows over whom the king, Henry II, exercises rights of wardship. The ages of the widows range from 18 to 70. Among the offpsring female outnumber males by 155 to 138. The reason for this seems apparent. In a social group made up of professional fights, young men faced greater risk of death than young women, who were excused from warfare under the code of chivalry.

&gt; Medieval society in the central Middle Ages was acquiring a marked plurality of women over men.

The 1328 *Corpus Documentorum Inquisitionis* from the Low Countries says:

&gt; Terra praedicta multum habundat mulieribus, quibus secundum conditiones earum et amicorum decentia matrimonia non paterent propter earum multitudinem

Haven't needed to read Latin? [Thank a medieval woman.](https://redd.it/3v9qxr) :)Oh yeah, absolutely! The thing you have to keep in mind--for manuscript *and* early print, in fact--is that individual broadsides and pamphlets weren't that likely to survive on their own. So where can we look for them?

Steven Justice, *Writing and Rebellion*, points out that several English chronicles seem to preserve the text of letters and broadsheets related to the 1381 Peasants' Revolt, even if the original pamphlets themselves are lost to the past.

Many medieval manuscripts aren't actually full books. Instead, they are miscellany--collections of multiple texts, usually in excerpts. These can come about in two basic ways, with both variations frequently combined in the same codex. First, different quires (groups of sheets) would be combined in the same volume. This is actually how a lot of our early printed pamphlets survive, too. Second, individual writers or scribes would copy bits and pieces of various texts into their own prayer book or commonplace book. It's pretty clear, for example, that one particular chapter of Henry Suso's *Little Book of Wisdom* enjoyed circulation independent of the (very very popular) full text. It's not that we have pamphlet-style copies of that chapter--instead, we see it alongside different sets of texts in many many individual prayerbooks and miscellanies.

The late 14th century poem *Christus und die minnende Seele* (Christ and the loving soul) is a lengthy text on its own, but it also circulated independently of that massive and rather disturbing chunk of text in broadside form, with a set of illustrations.

Letters are a fascinating case. While surviving medieval letters are typically gathered into "letter collections" which travel as a book or part of a book, many individual letters were used to send along a sermon or a prayer to the initial recipient or recipients (another fun phenomenon of medieval letters: their text was often re-used to send a letter to another reader. BCC before carbon copies, indeed). We don't have copies of Hildegard of Bingen's public sermons on their own, for example, but we have them sent as or with letters to particular clergy, copied into her book of letters. (We know they are sermons from the letters *to her* that she is responding to, also included in the collection).&gt; I still don't know what you cited.

I don't understand your confusion. I cited Herlihy who cites a survey from 12th century England. I cited Herlihy who quotes a chronicle from 14th century Belgium.

If you refuse to grok that, I'm done.1. Kathryn Kerby-Fulton, "The Women Readers in Langland's Earliest Audience: Some Codicological Evidence" ([academia.edu link](https://www.academia.edu/6707321/The_Women_Readers_in_Langlands_Earliest_Audience_Some_Codicological_Evidence)) - she and Steven Justice have published more on this together, too

2. David Sheffler, *Schools and Schooling in Late Medieval Germany, Regensburg 1250-1500*, pp. 71-79; Eva Schlotheuber has commented on *Winkelschule* in various works, too 

3. Judy Ann Ford, *John Mirk's Festial: Orthodoxy, Lollardy, and the Common People in 14th-Century England*; Euan Cameron, *The European Reformation*; various articles by Werner Williams-Krapp (please, take these and run; I've had a devil of a time tracking down guesstimated statistics)

&gt; What do you think contributed to this changing in the 12th century and not earlier?

I'd imagine it's connected to the overall epochal shifts of the twelfth century--increasing bureaucratization/textualization, increasing attention to education, interest in reading, interest in knowledge. And, I do think, more *attention* to women as a group or a class, at least in the sources. The Church's rising paranoia about heresy (whatever you want to say about the actual existence of an organized "Catharism", the ecclesiastical elite sure perceived a problem and saw women as majorly susceptible to it), but also the fact that women were turning out for the monastic foundations of the '12th century reformation' just like men. Outside the Church, this is also the era when the nobilities of western Europe are shaking out their boundaries, divisions, dealing with codified marriage canon law. 

It's a question of audience awareness as well as education of the author. Mechthild of Magdeburg says she doesn't know Latin and there's no real reason to disbelieve her, but then someone like Marguerite d'Oignt writes some works in Latin and some in the vernacular. Why would she choose to write a saint's Life--THE genre that needed Latin for veracity, basically--in Franco-Provencal unless she knew her audience wouldn't be as adept with the Latin?The two major works promoting "medieval parents didn't care about their kids" are Philippe Aries, *Centuries of Childhood*, and Lawrence Stone, *The Family, Sex, and Marriage in England, 1500-1700.* The gist of Aries' argument which is the foundation of the debate, is that because childhood mortality was so high, medieval parents couldn't emotionally afford to invest in their children before a certain age. As a result, there was no real medieval concept of childhood. I mentioned life-cycle domestic servitude elsewhere in this thread--for Aries, that's a sign that medieval parents didn't care about their kids; they didn't care if they left. (But as Barbara Hanawalt has since pointed out, in many cases these teenage servants were actually still living with their natal families! Live-in servitude, at least in England, was the exception rather than the rule. And as I've discussed elsewhere here, parents actually encouraged their children to find work to earn more money for a better dowry to marry better, but also to forge a bigger social network to find a better partner. Parents wanted their kids to have a good future.)

Stone goes further into "cold" and "harsh" intrafamily dynamics, arguing that parents saw children as inherently sinful and needing to be broken and remade. Basically every step that medieval and early modern parents took to protect their children, Stone interprets as uncaring, borderline abusive.

As I already discussed above, recent research has overturned these points. If you're interested in reading more, Elisheva Baumgarten, *Mothers and Children: Jewish Family Life in Medieval Europe* addresses Aries and to a lesser extent Stone directly, from a comparative Jewish-Christian perspective in medieval Ashkenaz (France-Germany). It's a terrific book.&gt; I'm a student so I can't really throw money around at more expensive books.

Well, sure--most of us can't; academic books can be crazy expensive (Brepols, I'm looking at you). That's why libraries exist! [Here's an awesome post](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3t1z25/monday_methodsfinding_and_understanding_sources/cx2d4ls) on how to get access to fancy academic literature even if you don't have privileges at a university library, at least for the U.S.

AskHistorians has a great booklist and the [medieval section] (https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/wiki/books/europe#wiki_middle_ages) is darn good. If you only want to read one book, I would recommend above all William Chester Jordan, *Europe in the High Middle Ages*. It's the Penguin History of Europe volume for that era, Jordan is a fluid and engaging writer, and you can get the book for $10 used, with shipping, off Amazon. Ideally, I would pair that with Peter Brown, *The Rise of Western Christendom*, which looks at the early Middle Ages. It will give you a solid setup.

If you're willing to give it a bit more effort (read: pages of reading) but with better payoff, I would pair Robert Bartlett, *The Making of Europe* and R.W. Southern, *The Making of the Middle Ages*.So I am pretty deep into the contemporary sources on Nikolaus von Fl\u00fce, or "Bruder Klaus"--the fifteenth-century hermit who will become the patron saint of Switzerland. Now, "living saints" in the Middle Ages who attract a lot of public attention not uncommonly draw criticism as well as admiration and wonder. Holy women and men get labeled frauds, witches, possessed, thieves, vagabonds, hysterical, deluded, heretics, miscreants in general.

Whether or not the word is just an anti-Swiss metaphor, this is still the first time I have seen a saint get called a cowf#cker.Historians and anthropologists are not too fond of GG&amp;S. /u/anthropology_nerd has done a [quick-and-dirty breakdown here](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/2mkcc3/how_do_modern_historians_and_history/cm577b4). Awesomely, the post includes several alternative book suggestions that you might be interested in instead!

I'd also suggest browsing the [Archaeology subsection](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskAnthropology/wiki/readinglist#wiki_archaeology) of /r/AskAnthropology's booklist--most of those look at prehistory/the emergence of civilizations, and you could target what sounds the most interesting to you.The relevant sections of the *Crowland Chronicle*, a long-running history or chronicle from Crowland Abbey, certainly do not love Richard. This is typically considered one of the more important sources for his reign, but (of course) problematic. The text, True to its genre, unites externally-verifiable facts with hearsay and *fama*. But it definitely has an opinion on Richard. He's "crafty", "haughty," he "wastes" the money and treasures his brother had carefully amassed to satisfy his pride. He's duplicitous:

&gt; The duke of Gloucester, however, who was the ringleader in this outbreak, did not omit or refuse to pay every mark of respect to the king, his nephew, in the way of uncovering the head, bending the knee, or other posture of the body required in a subject.

Definitely a usurper:

&gt; The colour for this act of usurpation, and his thus taking possession of the throne was the following: It was set forth, *by way of prayer*, in an address in a certain roll of parchment

He deserts God and God deserts him:

&gt;  It was fully seen how vain are the thoughts of a man who desires to establish his interests without the aid of God...At day-break on the Monday following there were no chaplains present to perform Divine service on behalf of king Richard...During the night he had seen dreadful visions, and had imagined himself surrounded by a multitude of demons

He deserts his wife on her deathbed...for a reason:

&gt; The king\u2019s purpose and intention of contracting a marriage with his niece Elizabeth being mentioned to some who were opposed thereto, the king was obliged, having called a council together, to excuse himself with many words and to assert that such a thing had never once entered his mind. There were some persons, however, present at that same council, who very well knew the contrary.

The chronicler goes to some lengths to show, again and again, how the people of London and all England turned against him:

&gt; A certain poet composed these lines:

&gt; *(Richards I and II)*

&gt; Edward\u2019s vast hoards of wealth consum\u2019d, the Third

&gt; Was not content therewith, but must destroy

&gt; His brother\u2019s progeny, and then proscribe

&gt; Their partisans. Two years had he usurp\u2019d

&gt; The throne, when, meeting these, he lost his life

&gt; And ill-gain\u2019d crown, upon the battle-field.

...although one must note, this "certain poet's" comments on Richard align directly with the previous comments of the chronicler.

And finally, the *Crowland Chronicle* gives us the famous line:

&gt; As it was never heard...that any other persons, after the termination of the warfare, were visited with similar punishments, but that, on the contrary, the new prince had shewn clemency to all, he began to receive the praises of all, *as though he had been an angel sent down from heaven*...

Again, the chronicler takes pains to show it's *fama*--common sentiment--that Henry is an avenging angel. But the emphasis on *fama* decreases the, shall we say, objective credibility of the work to some extent. Where the work tries to attribute motives to Richard's actions, or implicate him in conspiracies at different points, it's not presenting evidence: it's presenting after-the-fact reputation (above all in the chronicler's own opinion).

I do think it's well worth revisiting the source material on medieval figures that we've inherited a biased view of. Rereading inquisitorial reports, chronicles, letters, laws, and basically the entire medieval European corpus through critical eyes, instead of accepting everything at face value as Actually Happened or Good Judgment, has *revolutionized* our understanding of--for example--FIFTY PERCENT OF MEDIEVAL EUROPEANS. (That is, women). 

But the goal of a critical reassessment is *better understanding of the Middle Ages*. When we see powerful medieval women stomping on each other to hold onto their positions, reinforcing the "weak women/transcending her sex" trope, or just being average women living their lives in a sexist society, we have to accept that as much as we work to show how women writers worked with and against their social constraints to produce amazing (and decidedly un-amazing) literature. 

Whether or not this process means a rehabilitation of Richard III, or rather to what extent he can be rehabilitated from Shakespeare, is a matter of how you [choose](http://newr3.dreamhosters.com/?page_id=518) to [interpret](http://newr3.dreamhosters.com/?page_id=522) the [sources](http://newr3.dreamhosters.com/?page_id=526).This is a complicated question, because hagiographers start portraying him as the sort of "civic patron holy man" of the *liga antiqua* (nascent Swiss confederation) pretty much right away.

During his career as Desert Father mountain goat, Bruder Klaus is much more associated with efforts to hold the proto-Swiss cities/cantons together. That's what the hagiographical tradition is primarily interested in. Some accounts try to paint his prior military service, which did involve some warring against Austrian Habsburg forces, as a time when he exercised godly moderation and clemency even in combat. But mostly the sources admire him for giving spiritual and political advice (he'd also been a judge, after being an army captain), and for mediating in disputes among canton representatives.1. In the U.S., what kinds of support networks were available to, or developed by, families of soldiers of color?

2. How did women's movement into the industrialized workforce affect, both long-term and on a day-to-day interaction basis, relations between women of color and white women? Especially if we follow the typical line that poor women, especially black women, had "always" been working outside their own homes, including as domestic servants for richer white women? Can we trace any longish-term implications for the way second-wave feminism developed?*My answer concerns the Western literary tradition.*

Prior to 1700? Not really. Some important literary and especially philosophical groundwork for stories and worlds set in "the future" is laid in the 17th and even 15-16th centuries--but those new literary devices will eventually serve to *hinder* writers' ability to tell future tales once the philosophical maturity is there.

The crucial background here is that the Middle Ages didn't really have an ideology of progress. While medieval people themselves constantly (I mean *constantly*) worked to reform and improve existing social and political structures, they viewed themselves as living in a "world grown old"--that is, a world withering, dying, slumbering and agitating towards the birth of the Antichrist and the coming of Armageddon.

Apocalyptic prophecy is a mainstay of late medieval literature, especially popular pamphlets in the 15th century, but they don't really create full or really even partial visions of a future society. 12th-century renaissance woman Hildegard of Bingen foresees five coming ages of war before Judgment Day, but her point isn't what these wars will look like--it's that the apocalypse is *still far away*, so the need to reform the Church in the present is real. Hildegard and her 13th century heir Mechthild of Magdeburg both describe new religious orders that will arise in the days of the Antichrist. Hildegard describes the robes they will wear and how they will appear holy; Mechthild attempts to outline their daily schedule a la a monastic Rule. But these are throwaway mentions in an overall message that really has nothing to do with the future society and everything to do with reforming the Church *now*.

The 15th-century witnesses some more stirrings. The Middle Ages were NOT technologically stagnant. Innovations in agriculture, irrigation, weapons, and communications technology resulted from and further catalyzed sometimes-massive societal shifts. Medieval people were fascinated with the design and construction of automatons (basically mecha). But it's the 15th century that gives us the libri mechanorum, the "machine books" that consider contemporary technology and diagram out ways in which it might be developed and improved in the future.

In 1638-1640, English bishop/philosopher/Royal Society founder John Wilkins took the libri mechanorum tradition a step further with an extended look at how one particular technological development could be scientifically plausible and actually work. You could, I suppose, call his *The Discovery of a World in the Moone*, especially the 1640 continuation, an examination of a future world. He describes four ways in which a human might actually travel to the moon, dismissing angels and birds as implausibilities and ultimately settling on a "flying chariot"! This is an extended, in-depth look, attempting to be scientific (within the boundaries of 1638 knowledge, which is in its infancy), at a single technology of the future and its uses.

Wilkins' focus on the technology of travel, and specifically travel to the moon, is no accident. He's uniting the potential technology strand of the libri mechanorum with the tradition of utopian literature evolving in the 16th-17th centuries.

Utopian lit erected new, different, improved/idealized societies. Over and over, authors of utopias used the same literary device to describe them: the voyage of a hapless pilgrim from the 'real world.' These utopias remained strictly within the contemporary time frame, yet they projected a futuristic world of sorts. Most common were the moral, occasionally satirical utopias of a Thomas More or a Margaret Cavendish. But there were a couple that took up the mantle of scientific/technological development.

Francis Bacon's *New Atlantis* from 1620ish featured Salomon's House, a sort of futuristic university devoted to scientific experiments for the purpose of improving human society. Bacon goes into much detail about the organization and functioning of his idealized university, but he also lets its members [describe their society](https://books.google.com/books?id=wlvjDbzfT_0C&amp;pg=PA214&amp;lpg=PA214&amp;dq=we+represent+also+all+multiplications+of+light&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=6YDzyLXLEI&amp;sig=Q--x8TTLgZo6nJTOTNyBGz4DBZU&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0ahUKEwjR7-rfn8jJAhUi54MKHYJBAV8Q6AEIHzAB#v=onepage&amp;q=we%20represent%20also%20all%20multiplications%20of%20light&amp;f=False).

They have tall towers built upon mountains for observation of the heavens but also refrigeration of food; they turn saltwater into fresh for consumption. Prior to germ theory, a major explanation for transmission of disease was bad air, so Bensalem's scientists construct "chambers of health" with purified air as a sort of hospital. They raise animals to dissect them for medical research into what ails humanity. They have "sound houses" where they essentially create artificial music; they know how to manufacture artificial flavors so people will enjoy their food more. And my personal favorite, their powers over light and color:

&gt; Out of things uncoloured and transparent, we can represent unto you all several colors: not in rainbows, as it is in gems and prisms, but of themselves single...We represent also all multiplications of light, which we carry to great distance.

It becomes clear this is artificial light. Relatedly, they have telescopes and microscopes. But they also have "engines of all kinds," including instruments for war; they have invented some form of airplanes and submarines.

Basically, there's a reason Orphan Black gets its episode titles from Francis Bacon, is what I'm saying.

This tradition of traveling to a utopia and having a resident infodump the facts of society becomes a staple of 17th century utopian lit. But as Europeans map out more and more of the world, they lose the *terra incognita* which makes it possible for a Baconian narrator to end up on an unknown island like Bensalem. And so writers cast further afield for their worlds--occasionally, beneath the surface of the earth, but mainly into space. And so we get John Wilkins, discussing the technology needed to fly people to the moon! He's taking the voyage to utopia speculative tradition and uniting it with the glimmerings of a belief in technological progress for the sake of, well, technological progress.

But the dead end is already apparent. The concept of progress and a waiting future is being incubated and accepted, beyond the imminent apocalypse/world grown old of the Middle Ages. And yet--how can authors take a protagonist from the present, send him off to the *future* to see a new society--and then bring him back? The primary means of 'magical' transport had always been the Army of Darkness director's cut--I SLEPT TOO LONG.

So the 18th century finally gives us works depicting the future, but it's more of a False start than the birth of a genre or subgenre. (And to be clear, we are not at "science fiction" in any appreciable sense yet, not even "science romance." But I think we can consider it under the umbrella of speculative fiction, or at least speculative literature.)

Louis Sebastien-Mercier's *L'An 2440* of 1771 is the first real bestseller of the speculative future. It uses a utopian future Paris to shed light on the author's pre-Revolutionary context. His nameless (as always) protagonist falls asleep and wakes up in a Paris where the poor are less poor; there is no elevated religious caste; slavery has been abolished--at the hands of a black man! no White Savior complex here; the justice system and hospitals *actually work*. Bibliophiles take heart: the printed word, material books, are the metaphorical light of society to match the streetlights. But don't pack your bags too fast: [THEY BANNED COFFEE](https://books.google.com/books?id=RZm2hKo2OmQC&amp;pg=PA144&amp;lpg=PA144&amp;dq=louis+sebastien+mercier+coffee&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=wQopu7ci9e&amp;sig=b31TBocUeiiQ_N7vKk-PtfZGtgY&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0ahUKEwjQ9vbNpsjJAhXOoYMKHZlUAT4Q6AEIPjAF#v=onepage&amp;q=coffee&amp;f=False).

Cousin de Grainville's *Le Dernier Homme* (The Last Man) is the opposite of utopia: it's the end of the world. This is a Children of Men future where humanity has become sterile; the story focuses on the last child, Omegarus. As in that book/movie, he was a celebrity from birth. The story recounts his journey--via airship!--to find the rumored last fertile woman. This is much more of a fantasy than scientific speculation, though--de Grainville wants to recapitulate *Paradise Lost*, right down to the verse form. And so we learn of the story via spirit-world communication, and so forth.

So while people were sold on the idea of progress and thinking about the future by the 18th century, earlier literary conventions meant it would take some time before the idea of setting a story solely within the future, without a framing device of a contemporary narrator physically or metaphysically visiting the new world, led to a real literary tradition of futuristic fiction.Double double toil and trouble! Thanks for the shoutout!Late to the party (thanks for the heads up, AH Twitter!), and unfortunately with a really basic question:

&gt; how do we know when agriculture starts vs. when domestication occurred?

Uh...what's the difference? Is "agriculture" the organized planting of seeds for harvest, and "domestication" like, um, breeding plants? How can archaeologists/paleobotanists work backwards to date domestication?
Amazing reply--so much information, and complicated info at that, stated so clearly. Thank you! :)The Middle Ages inherit this idea above all from Augustine. *The* medieval worldview (well, among the educated elite) divides the history of the world into six ages. The Sixth, current, final age begins with the birth of Jesus, so you can see how from there it would be a downward slide.

But by the later Middle Ages--*after* the year 1000, so don't think about the symbolism of the round number here--there's a pretty big shift. See, the big innovation of Augustine and his followers had been "amillennialism." Whereas early Christianity had nurtured a heavy strain of imminent apocalypticism, the belief that Christ would come again basically tomorrow, early medieval theologians lived in a world that needed to continue. English monk-historian Bede, following Augustine, even emphasizes that the Seventh Age (of peace and justice in God's Kingdom) runs alongside all the other ages: it is not an eschatological future but a current and past reality.

So the apocalypse does not get a lot of airtime in the early Middle Ages, well into the 11th century. (The "year 1000" is *vastly* overblown as a significant, symbolic date, scholars now agree). It's only after that, that we start to see apocalypticism take root in medieval culture. Stuff like elite commentaries on the Book of Revelation. Preachers and theologians inveighing against new heretical movements (like Hildegard mentioned above) frame them as "forerunners of Antichrist" rather than just, you know, average heretics. Basically, big calamaties (plague, war...Islam) are still seen as God's punishment against sinful Christians, as in the early Middle Ages, but now they are also "signs of the times"--that is, the coming end of the world.

The reasons for the shift are complicated and sometimes contradictory, but it has a lot to do with more people (in basic population growth terms) paying more attention to organized Christianity, and the leaders of that organized religion paying more attention to the people they are supposed to be shepherding. The stakes feel higher.Heya, you might be interested in reading these answers about "[How did medieval people envision the future](https://redd.it/3qafud)" and "[Before 1700, is there any literature that predicts future developments? What did the future look like?](https://redd.it/3vovzs)"Ah, not really. There isn't really evidence of a belief that reforming the Church/society would delay the apocalypse. More like, God has set the time for the Antichrist's birth at some point in the future. Is that point tomorrow, or is that point after (f.e.) five entire ages of warfare? Since this prophecy predicts it's after five ages of warfare, we have every reason to reform. OR. Since it could be tomorrow, we must act immediately to reform so as many souls will be saved as possible.The "first science fiction" is going to depend 100% on one's definition of science fiction.

In any case, *Somnium* envisions a parallel lunar civilization to Earth, and attempts to be scientificially rigorous as far as describing the similarities and differences in the night sky between Earth and the moon, or applying the concept of inertia to the journey between the bodies. Once the humans get launched into their flight, they proceed as if of their own accord.

However, Kepler isn't really concerned with *technological* development. Plant life, hunting habits of the lunar population, sure. But that voyage which proceeds with inertia? Is launched by *spirits* pushing the travelers on their way. *Somnium* is an amazing example of worldbuilding, but it doesn't really fit the category of "predictions of the future."&gt; In the end the main goal of my question was to find out if there were moments when someone thought "wow, this invention is going to change world!" and goes on to envision in what way that might happen.

*Advance warning: I'm still talking about the literary end of things.*

In the second half of the 19th century--the rise of True popular literature--a split develops between European and American efforts to forecast futuristic technology in pop fiction. In addition to the ongoing voyage/travel tradition discussed in the [pre-1700 answer] (https://redd.it/3vovzs) (think Jules Verne!), a major subgenre of future warfare poured out of European presses. On one hand, the recognition of European nationalism and international antagonism heavily plays into this genre: Britain's invasion by Germany is a repeat fixture. On the other, should we be surprised to see a focus on military technology? War is instant drama, for fiction! (Of course, this will also lead to the genre's downfall once the reality of World War I interferes with the enchantment of war-as-fiction).

The anonymous 1859 *The Air Battle* gets credit as the forerunner. While not really *scientific* per se, it takes the fascinating with airships and air travel into the future. Floating ships that can carry thousands of people fight, well, air battles, but still basically using present *ground* tactics. (Also, in 6900 slavery and imperialism still exist but now black people subjugate white people, other races *what* other races, and most of England has sunk.) George Chesney's 1871 "Battle of Dorking" really makes the subgenre take off, and pretty soon you have authors deftly discussing advanced submarines, airships, explosives, the potential of nuclear weapons, and...disintegrator beams (well, they tried). One noteworthy example is Kurt Lasswitz's 1878 *Bilder aus der Zukunft*, Pictures from the Future. It's short, but he imagines how the use of electricity will be able to power airships much more effectively. (And his future world makes music out of smells, so, there is that.)

It's the dime novels of America, though, that really evoke the "what might be done with future technology" idea. While Europe concerned itself with the present and potential of warfare, the U.S. emerged from the Civil War with a zest for its frontier mythology (and, of course, imperialist wars safely stowed abroad). That's right, a century before George Lucas made *Star Wars*, the Western and proto-sci-fi genres were already intertwined. "Inventor novels" targeted above all a juvenile/YA market. And their preferred technology, in the century of *Pride and Prejudice* instead of *Pride and Prejudice and Zombies*, was steam.

To be clear, this isn't "steampunk" in any appreciable sense. These are ooh-ra U.S.A.! U.S.A.! get the girl, get the glory, escapist literature aimed at boys. (Girls had a "girl aviator" genre of their own, but boys got to be the inventors). But steam is frequently the root of the technological invention that either launches the story or allows the hero to save the day.

This subgenre is launched by, appropriately, Edward Ellis' *The Steam Man of the Prairies*, which features a [steam-powered, humanoid robot](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/8/8d/The_steam_man_of_the_prairies_%281868%29_big.jpg/220px-The_steam_man_of_the_prairies_%281868%29_big.jpg) who takes the place of horses in ferry the carriage of hero Johnny around the frontier. But Ellis and his novel were quickly overshadowed by *Frank Reade and His Steam Man of the Plains*, the first of the series of books starring inventor Frank Reade and eventually his teenage son Frank Reade, Jr. Eventually, the Frank Reade series will also introduce electricity as a means of powering futuristic/present technology: submarines, airships, helicopters, cars.

I shall cease my narrative here before discussing Verne and Wells--at that point, read the masters, not the redditors. :)I've been talking about the Western European Christian tradition, yes. Islamic eschatology has some theological parallels to Christianity (a messianic figure, a demonic figure, resurrection, Day of Judgment, "signs of the times," etc).

Scholars Mottahedeh and al-Sayyid describe an interesting development in their investigation of what *jihad* meant in the early Middle Ages. In legal sources that are debating whether jihad is military and/or spiritual, offensive and/or defensive, there's a strong apocalyptic tinge to the discussion. They argue that the early expansion of Islam, at least according to medieval Muslim scholars, occurred under the umbrella of an expectation of the imminent end. But as expansion slowed--and especially as Byzantium began to push back in the 8th-9th centuries, the Muslim worldview 'hardened' into a bilateral view of the "world of Islam" and "world of war." There could be some clashing and there is a lot of rhetorical hostility, but it represents a definite 'settling down' into the ideology of a *future* as opposed to next-Friday apocalypse. Mottahedeh and al-Sayyid show how medieval scholars used the idea of jihad to nurture apocalyptic expectation *overall*--basically, to keep hope of God's eventual justice alive--without relying on a "the world will end tomorrow, chin up one more day" refrain.&gt; At this point the adventures of Luke, Leia and Han Solo appear to be a self-sustaining organism

&gt; -Vincent Canby, *The New York Times*, 15 June 1980

*Star Wars* was always going to have a cinematic sequel. What that sequel would look like, however, was initially very much up in the air.

When Lucas hired popular SF author Alan Dean Foster to ghostwrite the novelization of *Star Wars*, the contract included a special stipulation. Foster would also write a spinoff novel, potentially to be filmed as a low-budget sequel if the initial film flopped. 

The resulting *Splinter of the Mind's Eye* of 1978 thus lets us see quite a bit of "what could have been"--the idea was that the potential film adaptation of that would re-use the props, costumes, settings of SW to save money, so Foster worked extensively from Lucas' notes and previous drafts. Han Solo is Sir Not Appearing In This Book, partially because the character was considered too awesome to play a peripheral role, partially because they worried about bringing Harrison Ford back for a B-flick in particular. And, weirdest of all for readers of today, Luke and Leia are everything but an official couple. Obviously the full story arc was...not yet in place.

But *Star Wars* turned out to be a huge hit, and so Lucas mobilized for making a True cinematic sequel. Non-movie sequels like Splinter of the Mind's Eye and, yes, the TV *Star Wars Holiday Special* showed that the public was primed for more adventures in a galaxy far, far away. Of course there was the tie-in merchandise (*...the kids love this one*), but I mention the book and now-anathemized Holiday Special because they furthered the nascent saga's central narrative, if not quite in its eventual direction.

In his review of ESB, *L.A. Times* movie critic Charles Champlin wrote,

&gt; There can have been very few sequels in history for which commercial and creative success could be so confidently predicted. 

But he also alluded to its naysayers:

&gt; You could argue that the spoilsports who resent all success would turn out in legions at the first whisper that \u201cEmpire\u201d might not be up to the original

Interestingly, the "spoilsports" who worried that ESB might not live up to the magic of SW included its director! Irvin Kershner originally turned down the job for fear that any sequel would inevitably fall short. Fortunately for posterity, he was persuaded otherwise and took up the job. The production process still didn't restore his faith, though--in interviews he's explained it was an extremely difficult shoot due to technical complexity and illness among the crew.

Despite the director's misgivings, as Champlin had foreseen, ESB was an enormous popular hit. Critical response was mixed. According to the [NY Times review](http://www.nytimes.com/library/film/061580empire.html) I quoted above, Harrison Ford is "cheerfully nondescript," Princess Leia is a "as sexlessly pretty as the base of a porcelain lamp", the movie itself is "nice and inoffensive," and *having to review ESB proves that movie critics are paid to write a lot of words about nothing.* On every level, according to Canby, ESB failed to muster up anything remotely as appealing as the original. But even he knew it would be a hit:

&gt; On the basis of the early receipts, "The Empire Strikes Back" could make more money than any other movie in history, except, maybe, "Star Wars." It is the second film in a projected series that may last longer than the civilization that produced it.

So overall, it's a positive picture but with some critical assessments mixed in. ESB's own director worried that his movie wouldn't live up to the first. Movie reviewers (Canby was NOT alone) initially agreed with him. But popular audiences had been primed by a vast explosion of tie-ins that included narrative sequels starring the movie's main cast. Even with the, um, sometimes dubious quality of said productions, ESB was an immediate hit--to no one's surprise.Yeah, the reviews were truly *mixed*. I didn't link Champlin's full review above, but [he LOVED the movie](http://herocomplex.latimes.com/movies/yoda-space-hefner-and-amorous-sweats-read-the-original-empire-strikes-back-review/).

&gt; What can you say about \u201cThe Empire Strikes Back\u201d that has not been said about the Acropolis, the cotton gin, Ella Fitzgerald\u2019s voice and \u201cStar Wars\u201d?Oh, yeah, there are tons of examples of the earthly/cosmic voyage to utopia(s) that I left off, and more social theorizing of possible developments, especially in the 18th century. And while a history of specifically utopian, travel, or reform lit would absolutely need to include the original *Utopia*, Gulliver and maybe Modest Proposal, I figure most redditors have enough of a passing awareness of those for me to focus more explicitly on the science/technology/daily functioning of futuristic/future societies depicted in texts.&gt; In Europe, until the 1800s and paper pulp paper, what you are writing on is vellum--thinly scrapped animal hide.

/u/ctesibius is quite right--paper arrives in Europe from the Arab world in the *fourteenth* century. And right away it starts to make books somewhat more affordable, although literacy rates are still extremely low and heavily biased towards cities and the middle/upper class. High-end luxury books continued to be written on parchment; even some of our earliest printed books are parchment! But the triumph of the printing press was its death knell as a book material: it was cost-prohibitive for True mass production.

It's True that there is a second 'price revolution' of sorts in the 1800s that makes books very affordable, coupled with efforts at mass literacy--hence the term "dime novels." But it is in NO way related to the parchment/paper divide.Lucas and Foster primarily discussed the difficulties of Han being too strong a character to continue meshing with Luke and Leia, thinking he needed an, ahem, solo focus.

But Foster wrote *Splinter* before the release and success of SW, and at the time Harrison Ford was refusing to sign a contract for the cinematic sequel. Probably he was mostly holding out for the possibility of a better deal if the movie was a success, but Lucas was apparently skeptical that he would come back at all.Um, dating as in calendars, or dating as in courtship?Oh, I agree on all counts! ESB opened in limited release (due to theater technology) in May; the review dates from the wider release in June. Canby opens his review by stating that the movie is already a box-office hit (to his disgust). But the quote was too awesome not to use. Feel free to submit me to /r/badhistoricalmethod. :)The question of how many movies there might be was in flux throughout production of ESB-ROTJ, with anywhere from 2 to 12 to...infinity, perhaps? envisioned (but 12 and 9 given official sanction in Lucasfilm's publicity materials).

After ROTJ, Lucas was completely burned out on Hollywood, in the midst of a divorce, and enchanted with his toddler daughter. He was still semi-promising nine movies, but really six. And he was clear that it would be quite awhile before they got made. From a May 1983 Time magazine interview publicizing ROTJ:

&gt; The films that record what went on in the beginning\u2014if they are ever made\u2014will be
altogether different in look and tone from the existing trilogy, says Lucas. They will be more
melodramatic, showing the political intrigue and machiavellian plotting that led to the
downfall of the once noble Republic. They will have only enough outward action to keep
the plot moving.&gt; How True the story is, it only ever seems to come up with regards to those two men, so I'm inclined to think that supports it (False stories often get all sorts of different names attached to them) and that it was a one-off or at least relatively rare occurrence. A suspicious Gestapo man thinking on his feet, rather than something in the Gestapo POW Recapture Manual, so to speak.

Well, that's the thing.

The book does say this is how Bushell and Scheidhauer were caught. But the circumstances of the reporting in this specific case are...murky. Bushell and Scheidhauer were among the fifty airmen murdered, so we don't have their testimony. Bowes, the British officer sent to investigate and reconstruct the escape's aftermath and murders after the war, identified the Gestapo chief who mediated between the local police who caught the two men and the  Gestapo general who ordered their execution. But he was dead, too. (Bowes got the story from Spann's accomplice shooter and driver). So maybe there were police records? The book unfortunately doesn't say.

Brickhill does, however, call the ruse of speaking English an "old trick." So maybe it *was* something the various airmen with escape experience had been through--or maybe it was just something they figured might happen, and tried to plan against it.Heya, you might be interested in reading the answer to ["During the Crusades, did Western Europeans settle in the Holy Land?"](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3toin6/during_the_crusade_would_individuals_from_western/cx8auco), which also gives some further reading recommendations on the topic.

An excerpt:

&gt; In order to help evoke the righteousness of the mission and the piety of its participants, the chroniclers paint a picture of the entire reach of society participating, from peasants to, yes, knights and petty nobles (as followers, that is, not as formal crusaders!).

&gt; But on the other hand, some supplied details don't really jive with the idea of Crusade being a pilgrimage and a mission of liberation. Ekkehard of Aura tells us that the *equites* and *pedites* (mounted and foot soldiers) were accompanied by enormous numbers of *ruricolae* (peasants), who brought along their wives and children and household goods. Guibert of Nogent says, "You would have seen remarkable things, most apt to be a joke. *Pauperes* whose oxen had been fitted to a two-wheel cart and iron-clad as though they were horses, so as to carry in the cart a few possessions together with small children."

&gt; This is a description of people who have no intention of returning. 

&gt;This is a description of people who want to transplant their lives.*I speak of the Middle Ages.*

Islam doesn't really have monasticism. Within Sufism, Islam's mystical tradition, we can see some parallels to Christian monasticism, but fundamental differences remain--they are, at heart, different institutions with different roles to play in their respective religions and societies.

According to Christian tradition, the roots of monasticism lie in the late antique Egyptian desert, where so-called Desert Fathers (and Mothers!) were inspired to (in theory) leave "the world" behind, and move into isolated (in theory) caves or rough buildings to focus on their spiritual lives and relationships with God. Two things happened: one, they were seen as holy and people from nearby villages/cities came to them seeking advice and consolation. Two, they started to form their own communities. First, communities of hermits who sometimes came together; eventually, communities who devoted as much time to seeking God *as a community* (in group prayer) as on their own. And, eventually, these communities developed formal Rules to regulate their daily lives.

That is what we typically mean by "monasticism" in Christianity: a group of people, typically single-sex (although "double-houses" of women and men, isolated from each other but living side-by-side, are a western medieval thing in certain times and places), who swear permanent vows of poverty, chastity, and obedience; wear a uniform; and follow a rigid daily schedule of group prayer, individual prayer, and some amount of time for work.  

As a social institution, monasteries own land, play power politics, are played with *in* power politics among bishops and secular lords (donating land to a monastery to keep it out of someone else's hands), offer a place for noble and royal widows to finish out their lives without needing to remarry (and thus preventing their lands from leaving the family), provide charity, and intercede between their patrons and God. In the early Middle Ages, monasteries were *crucial* in spreading and anchoring Christianity across pagan Europe. They were centers of learning, literacy, and libraries throughout the medieval world. As a religious institution, monasteries allow monks and nuns to nurture their inner spiritual lives--Christian mysticism largely, though not exclusively, comes out of the monastic tradition.

So in Christianity, mysticism tends to emerge from monasticism, or is just one part of it. Conversely, Sufism is the inner or mystical dimension of Islam, and in some cases, we can see some parallels to monasticism within that mysticism tradition.

The Sufi tradition generally consists of disciples or students under a leader. As you might expect, this idea of a teacher with a group of students, appointing one as their heir upon their death, does lead to the development of *tariqa* or orders of Sufism. 

Unlike the rigid, exclusive, vowed communities of monasticism, however, Sufi orders are fluid. People can join them, leave them, adhere to multiple traditions at the same time!  They are collective teachings of ways to build your individual relationship with God. The Christian monastic orders can also be seen that way, but they are exclusive, for-life, and consider the full way of life as part of building that relationship.

Adherence to Sufi orders can manifest in many different forms. In some cases, particularly in north and west Africa, where an entire people or branch of a people will follow Sufi principles. Some Sufis will live independently and come together or meet with the teacher. But in other cases, we do see Sufis living in community. I stress that this is not the formal vowed life under a Rule of Christian monasticism. Neverthless, *zawiya*/*tekke*/Sufi "lodges" of the Middle Ages resemble their Christian counterparts in some ways.

Structurally or architecturally, the zawiya complex provided lodging for their Sufis, a school (zawiya simply means madrasa/religious school in some parts of the Arab world), space for daily prayer, and sometimes institutions like lodging for visitors or hospitals for the sick and indigent. You would find equivalents for all of these in medieval Christian monasteries! Zawiyas, though, reflected Sufism's individualistic focus much more than their Christian counterparts tended to. While most Christian monastic traditions did not allow individual cells or space for private prayer until later in the Middle Ages (Christianity also has an eremetic or hermit tradition, though), Sufi zawiyas frequently offered both. And again, vows and the rigidity of monastic Rules were not part of life in a zawiya.

Sufi zawiyas did, however, mirror Christian monasteries in their missionary function. Both individual Sufis and established zawiyas played crucial roles in the expansion of both Islam and literacy in the early medieval (and also rather more modern) world.

Islam and eventually Sufism are born and cultivated partially in lands very familiar with either western or eastern forms of Christian monasticism--including, of course, the Egyptian desert itself. Were the Sufi zawiyas inspired by the Christian monastic communities their founders were well aware of? Was it simply the case that the medieval Mediterranean world shared enough circumstances that educated religious communities as beacons of charity and missionary work filled a necessary niche in both? Or was it a mix of the two? As you can imagine, influences between Christian monasticism, Sufi zawiyas, and the mystical tradition within the two religions (and Judaism as well) remains a rather hotly debated question.

Overall, it is wrong to say medieval Islam developed monasticism. But a closer look reveals that within Sufism, institutions did develop that paralleled contemporary Christian monasteries in several important respects.

*My apologies for not including the Buddhist, Hindu or Jain monastic traditions in this discussion.*Heya, this might be worth asking as a new thread. On one hand, sure, SW was a massive hit and every movie studio coveted its success (actually, they wanted to do a bit better than 20th Century Fox had--Lucas' contract reserved merchandising rights to him). But as far as studios wanting "their Star Wars" more specifically, SW and *Close Encounters of the Third Kind* (with 1978's *Superman* sometimes seen as a third representative) are widely understood as a pivot point in the history of sci-fi/American popular culture that goes much deeper than "sci-fi got popular." [I've addressed a related question here](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3sre15/what_characteristics_of_us_culture_enabled_star/), but if you're unsatisfied with that, feel free to post a fresh question. :)

P.S. Yes, John Williams wrote the score to all three of those.I can talk about England, and hopefully others will come along to compare. I'll give the estimated statistics, and then I'll discuss why we can trust them for the late Middle Ages.

Studies from the 1970s that looked at cities produced rates of 2-3%. Forbes and Wilson posited around 3% for London in the late 16th century, extrapolating from records from one hospital that put the mortality rate in live births around 2.3% and adjusting for the addition of stillbirth deaths. Dobbie saw 2.5% for Somerset. In 1986, Schofield's highly influential study reduced the number downward sharply, to 1-1.5%. Schofield brought two innovations. One, he studied rural parish (baptismal/funeral) records. Two, he found what are apparently considered better ways of calculating the impact of stillbirth occurrences on *maternal* mortality.

Scholfield had actually calculated a rate of 1% (or 10 in 1000) for the rural parishes, but it does seem to be a pattern that maternal mortality was higher in cities than in the country. Why? Cities were dirtier! So with a rate of 1% per birth for the countryside, the higher rate in the cities would raise the overall total a little bit.

Now, why can we trust these statistics for the late Middle Ages?

First, the numbers seem pretty constant over most of the early modern era. (There is some uptick in London in the late 17th century, I think because of increased pollution and dirt). They don't start to fall until rising literacy among midwives coincides with the dissemination of printed manuals of childbirth--midwives had better, more up-to-date training in what to do when things went wrong. So it seems fair to extrapolate backwards a century to ~1400.

Second, Schofield actually worked comparatively between England and Sweden, finding fairly consistent/matching mortality rates. If this is a European trend relating to education of midwives (surgeons were typically brought in only if something was already very seriously wrong and death was likely), as the falling rate towards the end of the early modern era seems to indicate, it was probably rather consistent over medieval Europe. Herlihy and Klapisch-Zuber calculate a maternal mortality rate of 1.15% for early 15th century Tuscany (Florence and surrounding towns/countryside).

As a final note, it's important to realize that this 1-1.5% mortality rate is *per birth*. Schofield asserts that the rate probably increased along with the mother's age at childbirth. Overall, scholars usually credit the average woman with 5 pregnancies (although I'm not entirely sure how this was calculated, sorry!), yielding the chances of an individual woman dying in childbirth over her lifetime at around 5-10%.

(ETA: I know, *math*, but 10% overall is the number frequently bantered about.)&gt; Who first branded it so negatively? When did this occur?

I am no scholar of the Quran or Bible, but I am a medieval historian, and the roots of Christians working very hard to associate Islam and specifically the Quran as advocating violence run deep.

The earliest Latin and Greek Christian awareness of Islam (or the movement coalescing into Islam), after all, was of a military expansion or invasion. The 630s *Doctrina Iacobi* from North Africa (which was meant to convince Jews who have just been forcibly converted to Christianity that, yup, Christianity is The Real Deal) drops in:

&gt; And when I arrived in Sykamina, I visited an old man who was learned in the scriptures, and I said to him, \u201cWhat can you tell me about the prophet who has appeared with the Saracens?\u201d And he said to me, groaning loudly, \u201cHe is False, for prophets do not come with a sword and a war-chariot.

This propaganda account is nevertheless fascinating for its recognition that the rising force is a religious/prophetic movement, not just a military invasion. In 8th century England, for example, Bede mentions the violence of the "Saracens" in Gaul as a reason they lost the territory, but he doesn't seem to grasp the religious dimension. (My understanding is that the earliest sources from conquered Syria and Spain follow a similar pattern, at first recognizing the military threat and only later seeing the conquerors-here-to-stay as threatening the religiosity of local Christians.)

But as far as the Quran goes, from the very first Latin translation of the text in the 12th century, Christian scholars strove to portray the text itself as exceptionally violent. Robert of Ketton's translation/paraphrasing of 1143, the *Lex Mahumet pseudoprophete*, acquires a gloss (notes in the margins that were considered an important part of the text, and copied by future scribes) most likely by another writer.

At some points, the gloss operates like a typical medieval scholastic gloss, wrestling with the meaning of difficult words and phrases! At others, though, it's quite polemic, stressing that Islam is a basket of lies and stressing, exaggerating, the violence advocated by the text. Written in the glow of the First Crusade's success and awareness of a rising Arab threat against the crusader states, is the tilt towards seeing violence in the text a surprise?

Ketton's translation is the most commonly copied and cited one throughout the Middle Ages. But it is not alone, and it is also not alone in trying to portray the Quran as violent. Egidio da Viterbo headed up the production of a 1518 bilingual (Latin/Arabic) translation whose linguistic choices and glosses served to portray the text as exceptionally violent (and, of course, religiously wrong). Note that this translation is produced in a world where the Ottomans are a major threat to Central Europe and the central Mediterranean.

Medieval translations of the Quran, in general, were produced with the primary purpose of allowing more Christian scholars to engage in anti-Islam polemic without having to learn Arabic. They are designed to let Christians "prove" their superiority in a world where Islam is seen as both a military and religious threat. The texts themselves travel in manuscripts with glosses that highlight Islam as a bad, alien, wrong, violent religion. I don't think it should be a surprise that the Middle Ages were already finding or inventing ways to associate Islam with violence, whatever Christians' own culpability.

Major sources: I highly recommend Thomas Burman's *Reading the Qur'an in Latin Christendom, 1140-1560.*Thanks for the shout-out. The story of Anna Laminit's rise and fall is absolutely one of my favorite from the Middle Ages. And to anyone reading this, I'd like to second the recommendation for /u/shlin28's answer about the [initial Arab Muslim expansion towards Byzantium/Persia](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3nvv8g/how_much_forewarning_did_the_byzantine_and/cvrtbni?context=3). That was absolutely my personal highlight of the week here.By "service language," do you mean the use of Latin during Mass (church service)? What do you mean by "how was it abused"?Any strategies on making your legs feel better, faster, after a marathon? I have to teach and be moving around the classroom like a normal human being by tomorrow...So, not so much with the seven hours cramped in a car seat, huh? Maybe I'll try walking around the rest areas. I honestly cannot fathom running a single step. You're a hero.Do you have a B race? I missed the last two peak weeks before taper for my original marathon, and DNSed it for a backup three weeks later. So my race ended up being little and local instead of one that frequently makes race bucket lists, but I'm positive that re-doing those two weeks and getting a full taper helped the result.RICH: Rest Ice Compression Heavy painkillers...Thanks!Yeah, get on runningintheusa.com or your non-US equivalent and see what you can find. Good luck either way!Latin!

Classical rhetoric, which forms one of the bases of modern academic work, recognizes a variety of verb tense known as the historic present or historical present. You see it all over the place--in discussing the events of a book or movie, talking about past events, or reading news headlines.

Its enduring popularity seems to stem from two roots. One, it keeps the reader or listener more engaged--the headline news example is particularly telling here. BREAKING NEWS is happening NOW and affects YOU. Versus something that happened and is over. Even though, well, the event probably did happen and may well be over, and might not actually affect your life at all. It's a rhetorical strategy (hence its roots in classical rhetoric).

Second, and most evident from the literature example, it reflects the ongoing process of experiencing a story--or a set of historical sources. The book *was* written, but we *are* reading it and can keep reading it. The *past* is past, but *history* is an evaluation of that past that we are constantly reevaluating.General advice is to do your last long run (16+ miles) 14-21 days out. A lot of plans have you do 8-10 the weekend before and 12-15 the weekend before that. The third week out is often your last 20 miler, if your plan goes that high.

I would not lift at all the week before a marathon--just rest those days. It takes 10 days to see an increase in fitness from a given workout, so *you cannot help yourself* doing extra in that time. Run just enough to keep yourself mentally sane and your legs loose.&gt; shin splints

1. Reduce mileage/number of runs per week. When I dealt with crazy shin splints coming back too fast from a calf strain this spring, I had to drop to 2x/week. It sucked, but I didn't stress fracture out.

2. Like the FAQ says, read [this comment](https://www.reddit.com/r/running/comments/y7l3f/the_ultimate_guide_to_shin_splints/c769a4d). Combined with reduced running, following this advice (daily) got me to the point where I *could* run more frequently.

3. I've never had success with compression sleeves one way or another.1548 - Whereas Henry's statutes had sought to limit the veneration of images (religious statues and painting) by, for example, prohibiting lighting candles in front of them or other signs of reverence, Edward (actually the Duke of Somerset as regent) ordered them removed from churches entirely

1549 - official replacement of Latin in church services with English (in practice there was some fluidity on both sides)

1552 - Act of Unity attempts again to implement liturgical reform a la the Book of Prayer, including completely revamping the structure of a church service

As for /u/ctesibius' comment--great observation! Thirty-eight of the Thirty-Nine Articles are 90.4% of the Forty-Two Articles passed under Edward. My understanding is that the sermons in the (First) Book of Homilies were different, shorter, and fewer than the ones in the Second. But it's the same basic idea of standarized sermons on specific topics to teach right (Anglican--not Catholic, not Anabaptist) doctrine.

Yes, Mary's ascension to the throne prevented the Forty-Two Articles from ever being enforced. Restoration of images was ordered, of course, but it could happen more slowly or quickly depending on whether a particular parish had sold their statues or just hidden them in the basement (really). Church services used the liturgy and structure of Mass again. The big change that Mary's rule did *not* reverse, of course, was the dissolution of monasteries and the abolition of chantries (the practice of paying a priest, er, donating money to the Church in exchange for a priest to say prayers for the donor's sould/donor's family members' souls). Well, a couple places attempted to revive monastic life, but even the Catholic government was not willing to fund their efforts. For example, the crown was happy to restore to the Church land that the government had seized earlier--but only if the Church paid for it.The European Middle Ages are jam-packed with attributing supernatural causes to events or just straight-up supernatural events--visions, miracles, devils. Medievalists tend to focus on why people might have been saying that and what the impact of that belief was. For example, we'll talk about Hildegard's visions not as though they factually, beyond a doubt *were* divine revelations, but from the standpoint that: at the time, they were just as good as divine revelations *regardless* of what they "actually" were, because *everyone then believed her*. And *that's* what influenced contemporary and future events.Go to a physio. I "couldn't run" for a decade because of knee issues that cranked up every time I got over a certain speed or distance. Started doing hip/core strength and flexibility work...finished my second marathon on Sunday.

Good luck!Woohoo, medieval versus Renaissance cagematch!

ETA tl;dr - Medieval universities and 'Renaissance' humanism within/growing out of them are both based in most of the same liberal arts, but with different interpretations and emphases.

~~

There is absolutely a distinction between what we think of as "medieval" and "Renaissance" higher education, but it's not quite liberal arts versus humanism. The key background points are: (1) Medieval and Renaissance approaches are rooted in overlapping classical sources (2) Renaissance humanism develops within the context of medieval education, and grows dominant within the structures of education established in medieval Europe.

In Western tradition, formal education in *liberalia studia* stretches back to ancient Rome (and of course the idea of a well-rounded education to ancient Greece). It's not until late antiquity, though, that the seven liberal *artes* get canonized: the trivium (grammar, logic,  rhetoric) and quadrivium (music, geometry, arithmetic, astronomy/astrology). These form the basis of education throughout the Middle Ages. 

Medieval education--including the birth of the modern university--is inseparable from the Church. The precursors to universities are called "cathedral schools" for a reason; *the* purpose of the first universities is to churn out licensed preachers, with just a bare handful of students staying on for further learning. The Church, and hence the clerics in its universities, are in the business of *making Christians*, including figuring out just what a Christian is and what he (always he) believes. This orientation shapes how the medieval trivium in particular develops over time.

The need to hammer out the specifics of doctrine, the desire to understand *why* Christians believed what they did, and the related goal of saying what was actually going on in all those rituals, lead to a reliance on logic--increasingly speculative over time, as the issues to focus on got more and more detail-oriented. The twelfth century figured out how it could resolve disagreements between key theologians of the early Church; the thirteenth century hashed out how the Eucharist could actually be the body and blood of Christ...the fourteenth century debated in what ways the Eucharist wafer after consecration resembled an actual human body and in what ways it didn't.

It's really with rhetoric, the third corner of the trivium, where we can see the medieval/Renaissance split. Classical rhetoric is the art of arguing well, yes but it's the art of arguing well *to build a virtuous society*. With the orientation of medieval education towards making good Christians, and a general belief that good Christians meant Christians who behaved, it's little surprise that medieval rhetorical education turned its focus towards sermons and religious instruction in practicing virtues and avoiding vices.

"The Renaissance" is less a distinct era, than a development within intellectual and artistic-literary culture that blossoms in different parts of Europe at different times. Without a descriptor, though, it usually refers to 14th-15th century Italy into laaate 15th-16th century Holy Roman Empire. (Sorry, France and England. Get your own AH shiller.) We tend to have this idea of the "Renaissance man" as the humanist writing and art-ing in his study and workshop, but it's important to remember that these scholars are coming out of the medieval education system--including the universities. They all have a background in the medieval liberal arts.

But they also all have a more classicizing orientation than "late medieval" thought (and I stick that in quotes because the Renaissance is itself a late medieval development, that takes classicizing in a different direction than parallel developments within medieval scholasticism and practical application a.k.a. preaching). They go back to sources like [Seneca](https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Moral_letters_to_Lucilius/Letter_88) and read that the liberal arts are supposed to have *practical* purpose in *creating virtue*, not endless speculation on "subtle" topics of little use. And for these Renaissance humanists in *urban* Italy and eventually Germany, that means *civic* virtue as much as religious.

So speculative logic for its own sake sees a dramatic drop in popularity, in favor of its use towards rhetoric, with an eye towards making better civic bodies as well as individuals. In conjunction with that movement, the Renaissance humanists revive the study of history (accompanying the general increased attention to the past, along with a newly critical attitude towards the authenticity of sources) ideally for the purpose, again, of building better *Christian citizens*, not just Christians.

And a central hallmark of Renaissance humanism, of course, is the revival of what they think is "pure" Latin and Greek, against the corrupting influences of medieval Latin whose sentence structure tended to evolve ("devolve," said the Renaissance men) along with the developing vernaculars. This is even reflected in formal handwriting: what we call ["humanist miniscule"](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/0/0d/Book_of_Hours_Bentivoglio.jpg/300px-Book_of_Hours_Bentivoglio.jpg) imitates what they believed to be the writing style of Roman times (which was actually the Carolingian interpretation of it, since Renaissance scholars were referring to 'Carolingian Renaissance'-era manuscripts), versus what they saw as the [ornate, decadent, obscuring medieval scripts.](http://isites.harvard.edu/fs/docs/icb.topic453618.files/Central/editions/images/anglicana.jpg) (I do have to add that casual-quick and political/secretary medieval and 'Renaissance' handwriting are equally terrible).

The insistence on re-doing Latin grammar and "ancient" handwriting leads to the final point. If our Renaissance humanists were trained in the same liberal arts and coming out of the same universities as the last of the scholastics, why the hostility? That comes from the humanists themselves. Like good classical rhetoricians, in order to implement the sweeping and gradual changes in education they wanted, they went over the top in denouncing the previous era as the "Middle" Ages, the "dark" time *in the middle* of shining Antiquity and shining Renaissance--rebirth. 

They absolutely knew they were drawing on the same subjects as their scholastic counterparts, but they were deeply insistent that the classics were superior to their immediate forerunners. And thus Lauro Quirini instructs Isotta Nogarola (who, as a woman, had no access to the university):

&gt; I absolutely insist, and I place the weight of my authority behind this, that you avoid and shun the new [medieval] philosophers and new dialecticians as men minimally schooled in True philosophy and True dialectic...They obscure the clear and lucid path of this study with goodness know what childish quibbles. They are unable to aspire to the True philosophy. Now, let me instruct you which authors you *should* follow...Wow, what a terrific demonstration of the impact of "clickbait culture." Thanks for the reference to Paoletti's work!Stress injuries are a continuum, from varying severity of stress reaction/bone marrow edema all the way to the point where the pressure from the interior swelling is so great the bone actually cracks from the inside out (stress fracture).

Because they scan everything, MRIs are great at picking up various stages of bone marrow edema. They aren't as sensitive as a CT scan at picking up the finest of hairline fractures, though.

Personal experience: I've had shin splints that I've run through with drastically reduced mileage/frequency--while monitoring them VERY VERY CLOSELY to make sure the pain was still diffuse, not coalescing into a small pointed area. I've also had a stress reaction in my foot that never fractured out, somehow. I could run through that in the beginning stages, but when it popped up at mile 21 of my first marathon, it got bad enough by 25 that I walked most of the rest of the way, and ran down the finishing chute (because cameras and crowd, of course) *bawling* from the pain. Walking was not pleasant for at least two weeks after that. I started running again without pain 3 weeks afterwards, *right* on the schedule my sports doc had told me for a metatarsal stress reaction. I never used a boot as I found the pressure from it on the top of my foot was far too painful to tolerate.

So basically, it sounds to me like you are pretty far along the stress injury spectrum, regardless of whether or not it's actually fractured out. Baby the crap out of that leg, and build back up *slowly.*The standard starter reference is probably Robert Bartlett, *The Making of Europe*. Unfortunately I don't think it's been translated into German. You will almost certainly find some German in his bibliography, though!

Lisa Wolverton and Jan Piskowski are two other important scholars who have discussed this topic, also in English.&gt; based off of the information in the book "Before European Hegemony,"

What other resources have you consulted? You've run against the main reason it's not a great idea to use only one source when researching a question: you depend *entirely* on what that one author thinks is important about the subject, and how that author has interpreted the primary sources and earlier scholarship. Might I suggest picking up a book more focused on Timurlane or Central Asia, for some new information and an additional perspective to Abu-Lughod's particular version of a world historical view?Cool!

Unfortunately I'm going to be just as West-centric...

+ Queen Elizabeth I's [Spanish Armada speech](http://www.historylearningsite.co.uk/tudor-england/queen-elizabeths-tilbury-speech/) (at Tilbury) is famous

+ Hildegard of Bingen (d 1179) was a nun, visionary, author, and public preacher (!) who excorciated the clergy and nobility of her day for wars surrounding a schism in the Church. From her we mostly have full texts, but a few of her letters note that they were originally delivered as sermons. In the translations by Baird and Ehrman, it's 15r (vol 1), 149r (Vol 2), and 223r (Vol 3).

+ Emma Goldman's 1917 [address to the jury](http://www.lib.berkeley.edu/goldman/Features/unitedstatesvsemmagoldman.html) from her trial for opposing military conscriptionWait, *I'm* confused. You are supposed to write a paper on a question the book *doesn't* answer, using only that book as a source?

I mean, if that's really the assignment, then asking us here for further information is also consulting outside sources. You'd have to work with the evidence in Abu-Lughod and Panorama, and just align it differently. Like, you said you're only seeing massacres and wholesale destruction from Timurlane's *direct* actions. So what long-term consequences might that destruction have? Like, he wiped out nearly the whole Church of the East. (That *must* be in your notes somewhere.) What immediate and future impact would that have on the religious slant of the region? How has *that* affected world history going forward? He wiped out huge swathes of population. How might that affect a region in the medium and long term?Did you do speedwork during this training cycle?

You are talking about doubling your weekly mileage, increasing the frequency of your runs, AND adding speedwork (increasing intensity), *all at the same time*. That's a recipe for injury.

Honestly, at this point you will see huge benefits from simply increasing easy mileage. Why take the risk of speedwork?Happy Wednesday, Runnit!

Uncle Pete has the first post-marathon shakeout run Wednesday for a Sunday race (i.e. today). My quads are sore but manageable; my RHR this morning was 2-3 bpm above normal. Do I jog the easy 5K? Jog/walk it? Or wait to do anything until morning heart rate is baseline again?

(I am not good at "listen to your body," hencing needing to keep track of RHR to monitor for overtraining).I mean...technically, yes. You'll be a little off balance and might hurt your shoulder from keeping your arm at a weird angle, but it's possible.

Two things.

One, tripping and falling runs the risk of breaking it again, *worse*, with an even longer recovery.

Two, sweating under a cast is terrible. First, it will reek to high heaven. Second, it will ITCH LIKE CRAZY.

When I broke my wrist, I walked 4-5 miles a day outdoors in the winter, slowly, because that's all I could handle without sweating. I had been in decent shape beforehand; I'd say it took probably 1-2 months to get it back once the cast came off. Not terrible. Of course the better shape he's in, the farther he has to fall. But--it's not permanent. I promise.TEMPORARY setback. It's TEMPORARY.

One thing he might *try* (and likely fail--I understand, trust me) to keep in mind: long-term, endurance athletes do better taking a month-ish off every year. The downtime lets your heart truly recover from all the stress.

I did get by without weight gain, because I was *really* careful about what I ate (and also I was not hungry, without exercise). It sucked not to dive into comfort food, but it was worth it afterwards. Not much to be done about the loss of muscle tone, though. Especially arms for swimming. :(

Does he have the full-blown plaster cast yet, or just the temporary splint while the swelling goes down? Is one of those [nifty plasticy 3D printed ones] (http://cdni.wired.co.uk/620x413/a_c/cast1.jpg) so sweating stops being a problem, an option at his ortho?Yeah, that's the kind I had, 'cept purple.

One thing I forgot to mention. After *scouring* the Internet and failing to find any resources for "how to cope with a sports injury without losing my bananas," I dragged myself to therapy for just those six weeks. It helped a little--I was falling into a real funk of "if I can't run, I can't do anything and the whole world is worthless and I want to be depressed and *not being depressed will mean I'm not a runner."* Which is, of course, terrific depression logic. Therapy helped a little with that.*tl;dr We don't know for sure because historical epidemiology is hard, but there are some good guesses.*

"Decline" is the right word. Outbreaks of pestilence after the initial 1346-1351 continued to be catastrophic for centuries, but never quite reached the apocalyptic proportions of what we call the Black Death.

The first time around, the outbreak burned itself out as it killed off the people most susceptible, and (probably) the pest carriers of the germ. Paleoclimatologists have recently been arguing that the waves of plague arising in Asia, then travelling to Europe and the Near East, were the result of swelling gerbil populations in the wake of a wet spring plus warm summer. The usual thought from the European perspective is that these subsequent waves of pestilence from outside would coincide with times of increased vulnerability in the population.

Within Europe, particular outbreaks often seem to coincide with periods of notable increased vulnerability: a new generation without immunity from exposure; wars and temporarily swelling urban populations (like a German city when the Reichstag met in town--lots of localized plague outbreaks surrounding these) bringing people into closer contact and hurting sanitation; periods of famine and reduced access to food weakening people's resilience.

We can't say for sure why it started to taper off even before the widespread use of antibiotics, but good guesses track along the same lines. Better ideas of nutrition and fewer famines. More systematic approaches to sanitation and quarantine. (They had no real concept of germ theory, but knew that being near infected people often went poorly). The U.S. in particular got pretty good at turning away possibly plague-ridden ships, although we had our outbreaks and a few scary near misses.I have to say I opted for the "binge watch TV shows where people are very definitely having a much worse time than me, like apocalypse-bad" strategy. But if comedy floats your boat, DO IT.

I am so, so sorry for your injury. I *swear* time will pass, and you will get back to where you were quickly, and then get even better. :)Think I'll take my Garmin to record how slow I go, for posterity. :)So first, you might need more than 2-3 weeks off to give your bones time to heal for *real*. All you're doing right now is giving the edema time to reduce to a level that's not painful. So you don't have that much breathing room to re-stress the bones once you start running again.

Probably try the toe walks/heel walks in that time.

I actually ran through *wicked* shin splints (coming off a major injury too fast). I reduced frequency to 2x/week and did toe/heel walks daily. It took I guess 1.5-2 months before I started adding in days of running.

Now, shin twingies are generally the first sign that I need to replace my shoes--I overpronate wildly.It's convenience.

One thing, though--depending on run length, you don't want to run your longest runs back-to-back or even within just a couple days of each other. (Unless you're far enough into Pfitz 18/70 and he's built you up to the point of running 15-5-20 or whatever that week is). Make sure to give your body time to recover in between the hard/long workouts.I modified Higdon Novice 2 for my first half. The key that made the race go so well for me was that I increased the length of one of the midweek runs, building up to 9 miles (I have a great 3 mile loop). That made a big difference in my endurance on race day.

Indy is *such* a terrific city to run in. You're going to have a blast!Yes, because what "pestilence" actually was is sometimes still debated (but we're pretty sure it was Y. pestis, probably with bubonic and pneumonic variants), I wanted to keep that out of my answer.

The long-term genetic or epigenetic immunity factor is really intriguing!

&gt; As hygiene, nutrition, and quarantine improved, the disease spread more to the vermin. 

Isn't the point here more, as sanitation improves, there are fewer rodents around to transmit it to people?That--unlike the way we usually talk about every other subject in school--having a bad history teacher doesn't mean you had a bad teacher, it means history is boring.That doesn't make sense to me. If the germ is limited to rodents, wouldn't becoming more deadly to the rodents be an evolutionary (literal) dead end? It might become more *infectious* (I think that's the word for "easily transmitted"), but not more severe in impact, right?

I mean, I sort of see that you're going down the line of "pestilence has less reason to maintain its infectious nature WRT humans," but I didn't think evolution worked that way...?I am explicitly referring to [this article](http://foxtrotalpha.jalopnik.com/the-secret-story-of-how-bubonic-plague-nearly-broke-out-1689284222) from that most scholarly of sources, Gawker Media (haters to the left--I read io9 sometimes). It's got a great account of how the author tracked down and verified his first source. Its link to [an article about the 1900 San Francisco outbreak](http://www.sfgate.com/bayarea/article/S-F-leaders-denied-concealed-major-plague-5768180.php) is also well worth reading.

ETA: All right, y'all don't like investigative journalism in lieu of peer-reviewed historiography (which is fair, given my source), try this on for size:

Caten and Kartman, "Human Plague in the United States 1900-1966," *JAMA* 205 no. 6 (Aug. 1968):

&gt; Humans with plague were found on incoming ships in New York and San Francisco in 1899, Port Townsend, Wash in 1900; and New Orleans in 1924 and 1926.In that letter, Quirini specifically recommends Boethius, Aristotle, Cicero, various Roman histories, and medieval Muslim commentators (in Latin translation) on ancient Greek texts.

More generally: Cicero is, of course, the Renaissance saint par excellence. Neoplatonic authors like Porphyry, Plotinus, and Lactantius got a lot of airtime, too. Aristotle was rather divisive, due to how heavily the later Middle Ages were seen to rely on him. A lot of humanists wanted nothing to do with that, baby/bathwater-style. And a lot of humanist attention focused on religious sources. Starting in the late fourteenth into the fifteenth centuries, theologians relied more and more on patristic authors, especially Jerome and Augustine. They took a really intense interest in revisiting the Bible, debating the validity of new (better?) translations. But it's not a unified "curriculum" by any means--individual humanists are reading the authors that they're interested in on topics they're interested in.

In my experience, "humanist" as a personal label usually refers to one's ideological orientation. One of the things I'm interested in as a historian is "popular humanism"--ways in which formal humanist/classical ideas seeped out of elite circles into the populace. So you have authors like 15th century barber-surgeon Hans Folz, who had no university education, managing to obtain copies of the medical texts being read by university students training as doctors of medicine. "Jerome" (Hieronymus) skyrockets in popularity to become one of the most popular names for boys in 16th century Nuremberg. Those parents sure aren't reading Cicero in the original Latin or wrangling over the particular process Jerome used to translate the Vulgate with opinions on how to improve it, but they're absorbing something of a Renaissance-y ethos.You're welcome! It was a great question. How we talk about history is really important.Thanks for this explanation, and your patience in this thread. I'm going to do some further reading and get a handle on this (I obviously think it's interesting and just as obviously don't know what I'm talking about, hehe); I think the SIV/HIV case will be a great place to start.But that's just referring to genetic mutation, right? I was thinking more of epigenetics, the factors that influence whether a particular existing gene is expressed or not. Like how nutrition news keeps talking about how today's humans eat less and gain more weight than our pre-Depression/Dust Bowl ancestors, or even our 1980s peers.

I cannot stress enough how little I know what I am talking about here. ;)Later medieval England certainly recognized adolescence as a distinctive life stage in practice. Of course there were exceptions of kids having to "grow up too fast," but unfortunately those exist today, as well. To bust open one myth first: no, medieval kids weren't always married by age 12, although it occasionally happened. I talk more in-depth on this question [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/3pafst/what_was_the_average_marriage_age_for_people/cw4w6vb), but in short: girls tended to marry earlier than boys, upper class girls in particularly tended to marry earlier than lower and middle class ones, and marriage age crept upward over the course of the later Middle Ages. Urban Renaissance Italy is the most famous case of girls *systematically* marrying quite young. At the same time, it's important to recognize that medieval teenagehood was more akin to a blend of adulthood and childhood, and direct preparation for adult life, than we perhaps think of it in the modern West.

Among rural and urban peasants in late medieval England, there is ample evidence for teenagehood as a distinct life phase for girls and boys. Teenagers spent a lot of their time working alongside adults, but also some of their time working and playing with other children. For example, younger teenage boys did not compete in organized adult games like archery and wrestling. They spent time in the fields and workshops with their fathers, but unlike adult men, they continued to participate in fishing and gathering with younger children and teenage girls.

Especially towards the end of the Middle Ages into the early modern era, peasant girls in particular (to some extent boys as well) often spent their teenage years as domestic servants. On one hand, this was good training for their futures running their household; on the other, it helped girls build up a good dowry for their financial future after marriage.

For boys in particular intending to pursue a trade, the guild structure also created distinct social statuses that separated the men from the boys quite literally (and in a few cases girls, although women guild members were *most* often widows of deceased male members carrying on in their stead). One of the best demonstrations of the social aspects of this is actually university students (universitas originally referring not to the school but to the guild of its members). Urban chronicles often rail against the ruckus caused by student hooligans! (Sometimes they were exempt from civic regulations, even, thanks to the power of their *universitas*.)

The emotional aspects of adolescence weren't ignored, either. Some villages actually institutionalized flirting. Croscombe had a Maidens' Gild and their male counterpart Younglyngs as social-religious groups. On alternate celebration days, each gild would blockade part of the village and exact a toll from members of the other as a fundraiser.

For the nobility, I mostly know the female side of the story. Here, a *lot* of the emphasis was on parents and daughter cooperating (well, ideally) to secure her the best marriage possible. A lot of this involved helping the teenage daughter develop good social contacts through parties, court events, letter writing...and, like their peasant counterparts, frequently spending her teenage years away from her parents' home. 

In some cases, this ended up as varying degrees of domestic servitude; in others, girls ended up basically as surrogate daughters, or could even be formal ladies-in-waiting at a noble court. You might think of Anne Boleyn, who was offered a place in Margaret of Austria's court (in the Netherlands) in 1513 and then subsequently at the French royal court. Noble girls needed a different set of household management skills from their peasant counterparts, and they'd also spend these years learning and using courtly arts (dancing, fine sewing, manners).

As for the "end of adolescence," I think a fair case can be made for marriage as the chief marker. Looking at cases of moneyed orphans who were wards of the state, courts would grant them their inheritance, held in trust, *upon marriage*. In Renaissance-era Italy, the very few women whose fathers arranged a humanist education for them tended to be literary fountains during adolescence--and then shift their creative efforts upon marriage to writing letters to their adult children. (This is not a universal story, but it's sadly common.) One of the reasons the marriage age for men in late medieval Italy was so late, was their desire *not* to inherit money too early and risk breaking up the family patrimony.

One interesting note on that point. I mentioned earlier that the most entrenched case of early marriage for girls was urban Italy. Christine Klapisch-Zuber argues that a *big* effect of this practice was the new wife's lack of social power within her new family, since upper class women literally married *into* their husband's paterfamilias--frequently moving into her *father-in-law's* house. Thus, even a newly married teenage girl would have had a period of time learning the skills of urban household management before her husband came into his patrimony and his own household for her to run.Not all church buildings were as nice as Notre Dame, but yes, everyone after 1215 (well, Christians, which was almost everyone if you are talking about western Europe) was required to go to church at least twice a year: once to receive the Eucharist, usually on Easter, and once before that, to say confession and receive absolution so when they received the Eucharist it would not be a sin. In fact, the history of pastoral care (priests instructing average Christians) in the late Middle Ages is pretty much the story of priests trying to get people in church *more often*! Probably if you were poor you didn't get to sit down, but you were more than welcome inside.

Beggars in particular would often flock to the funerals of local glitterati and nobility, in hopes the deceased would have arranged to have money distributed as charity for the good of his soul. In some cases, in order to make sure enough people showed up for the deceased soul to receive the maximum benefit for his generosity, the amount to be distributed was announced in advance!You're welcome! Always happy to help out a fellow ASoIaF fan.

And I'll add with respect to the series: remember, it's taking place in a world ripped apart by war and eventually magic. *Ideally*, I think Martin set up a world where you would have seen even the noble characters have some kind of adolescence. *Ideally*, Sansa and Joffrey would have married and started trying to have children, but they also would have spent their teenage years watching Cersei run the Red Keep and Robert rule the realm. As we see in the very beginning of GoT (the book), Robb would have been spending some of his time sitting on councils with Ned, and some of it practicing archery with Jon, Theon and Bran. Arya would have been one of Sansa or Cersei's ladies-in-waiting at King's Landing, also learning courtly arts, household management, and making a name for herself as an attractive marriage prospect.

But, you know, winter came.This actually brings up a really important point about the Middle Ages (at least the later M.A.) Although it was a time when religion metaphorically and *literally* ruled in Europe, the actual religiosity of individual people varied just as much as today. Church councils passed resolution after resolution railing against the laity for only squeaking into confession at the *very* last minute instead of confessing several times throughout the year, while individual confessors admonished some of their penitents for being *too* eager to confess and receive penance/absolution *too often*. Some Christians turned up at Mass once a year to receive the Eucharist; some Christians turned up every Sunday to watch the consecration even if they weren't allowed to receive the sacrament. Some people went on monthly or yearly pilgrimages to a nearby saint's shrine to gain favor with the saint for purposes of intercession; some people went on those pilgrimages mainly to collect the pilgrimage badge as a souvenir to show off back home. Some townspeople were eager participants in their guild's religious activities, but tried to avoid standing through sermons at all costs. And any combination of the above!Long hair was a mark of female beauty, even femininity itself.

You see this play out *very* clearly in religious sources, of all places. In early medieval hagiography (stories of saints' lives), it's a common topos for parents to arrange a marriage for their daughter, who wishes to devote her life to God and remain a virgin. The future saint will take increasingly drastic measures to make herself ugly, including shearing off her hair.

The association between long hair and beauty also made it a *moral* issue: a symbol of vanity and worldliness. Most famously, when Clare of Assisi desired to follow Francis into a life of consecrated poverty, her hagiography makes a *big* deal not only that she chopped off her hair, but that Francis was the one who did it. (Second scene from the top on the left in [this 13th century altarpiece.](http://i.imgur.com/geoILek.png)) It was heavily symbolic of throwing off the burdens of beauty and worldly goods. Strikingly, in Clare's case it is distinctly *not* just a hagiographical topos. When she wrote the Rule (guidelines of life) for her Second Order Franciscans, she explicitly required women becoming novices in her order to have their hair "cut off all around her head" at the same time she trades worldly clothes for monastic habit.&gt; Having Muslims in German uniforms was useful from a propaganda perspective

Can you elaborate on this? Who would have been the target of this propaganda--other Muslims in Nazi territory? Is their evidence that "hey, we have Muslims!" was actually mobilized for propaganda purposes (surviving placards or whatnot), or would it have been a word-of-mouth kind of thing?The Eucharist was available to the public (i.e. not the priest performing the Mass or monks/nuns if the church had an attached cloister) on specific Sundays only. Absolute bog-standard for public reception was Easter Sunday. It got the laity into church on the most important feast day of the year. In Peter Browe's study of Eucharistic reception in fifteenth century HRE, the most frequent public distribution he found was five times a year. More typical was a town like Ingolstadt, where the sacrament was offered to everyone at Easter, and at Christmas only to women and university students; or Munster, where it was offered at Easter, Pentecost, and Corpus Christi--the latter being, of course, the actual feast day of Christ's body.

Monks (who were almost invariably priests by the late Middle Ages) and nuns received it more frequently, perhaps weekly in the case of nuns.

The Council of Trent in the mid-16th century declared that all Christians present at Mass should be allowed to receive the Eucharist, but I do not know how that rule played out on the ground. One might look here to Reformation Geneva under Calvin. As vehemently as he believed the Lord's Supper (in Protestant terms) should be celebrated every week, and even arguing a biblical case for it, the Genevan elders were unwilling to implement such a drastic change. They forced him down to a compromise of four times per year. &gt; Were there actually people who doubted the existence of a supreme deity?

Almost certainly not.

&gt; Or were they staunch believers but disillusioned by the clergy and it's rituals?

Interestingly, throughout the Middle Ages the pattern we see more often is that people who have problems with Church practices or the clergy *double down* on religiosity--perhaps they were the ones to point out the problems *because* they were so concerned with religious practice. Like, Reformation anticlericalism focuses on abolishing monasteries and convents as warehouses of sin and financial waste; medieval anticlericalism comes from lay people and other clerics alike, and focuses on *how to make clerics better*.

I honestly think religious people today are a good parallel in many ways, though not a perfect one (medieval popular culture overall was *heavily* religious in ways we probably can't even imagine). People were busy--they had better things to do--some people are more into "spirituality" and some people like the community aspects. I'm guessing there is a neuroscience component to this, but now we are a galaxy, two wormholes, and several dimensions away from things I can talk intelligently about.1. The lack of "well-reasoned, philosophical arguments against god(s)" even from the most educated, erudite theologians and philosophers.

2. We do see expressions of doubt, but not doubting God's existence--more like, "how can this be? let us figure this out." So, for example, the fifteenth century spills a *lot* of ink worrying about whether and under what conditions God can lie to humans.

3. Setting aside for a moment the question of belief, there was no way that *religion* could "simply [not be] part of their lives." You had to be right with the Church in order to get married, for starters. Public entertainment was overwhelmingly religious. Miracle plays, Meistersang, even pulpy Arthurian works are steeped in various degrees of religion. Guilds regulated a trade or a social group--and raised money for donations to their patron church, and organized processions on holy days, and met together for prayers. Heck, the very *calendar* was explicitly figured in religious terms: "Sunday after Pentecost" "St. Lucy's eve."

4. When we look to peasant protests, one of the few places we have access to peasant thought if not direct voices, religion is everywhere. The 1524-1525 Peasants' War in the HRE finds its legal basis in the peasants' appeal to "godly law" for their right to land use.  England's 1381 Peasants' Revolt talks in the language of "trewthe"--not the truth of peasant political supremacy, but the promise that "God will help you"--it is the truth of God's duty towards his creatures, and the peasants assert that that includes them.

5. In the sixteenth century, clashing religious beliefs ripped Europe to shreds. That doesn't happen in a world of wishy-washy people.&gt; Well, yes, but there is also an awful lot of spilled ink discussing proofs for god's existence, which would be unnecessary if there was no doubt. In at least some of these proofs (e.g. Anselm of Canterbury) they frame it as arguing against people who deny god's existence,

This is a misrepresentation of the two most famous cases (Anselm and Thomas), but it's not your fault. Anselm's *Proslogion* has been tagged probably permanently by modern philosophers as the first appearance of the "ontological argument," yes, but the text itself is in no way a polemic meant to "prove God's existence." It's a "rousing of the mind to God", as Anselm calls it: a *prayer*. He's meditating on the nature of God, starting with his greatness and progression through a series of seeming contradictions that, as he prays through them, only demonstrate God's greatness further.

Again, Thomas' "five ways" in the *Summa* get a lot of attention as "proofs of God's existence," but he actually introduces them in response to the objection *There is no reason to presume God's existence*, not *God doesn't exist*. (And meanwhile, the text's nature of talking in assertions, objections, and replies is genre convention.)

I think it's pretty telling that even in the hottest heat of medieval polemic, people don't tag their opponents as not believing in God. They'll call them Antichrist, say they deny the immortality of the soul (i.e. are not *Christian*), but won't say they deny God's existence.

&gt; why should we assume that lip service without belief was impossible then?

I don't really have a historical explanation for this one, but my *instinct* is that a lot of people were indeed like the "Cafeteria Catholics" referenced above--take what you want, leave the rest. Like how a lot of people today would vaguely say, 'Sure, God exists' or be wishy-washy, but then reproduce and suddenly find a desire to send their kids to Sunday School. Also, honestly, you don't even see the *concept* of "faith" or "belief" in the modern sense in medieval pastoral care. Like, it's a complete and utter non-issue. They simply didn't think in those terms.

&gt; Can you elaborate on this one? I studied religion and history but mostly more modern so I'm not familiar with these wars.

Uh...I don't think I can do a good job concisely, but I'll give it a go and then some further reading. The 1381 English case, the rhetoric of the revolt (we have a few surviving sermons and letters, preserved almost by accident) strongly appropriates the theology of John Wyclif and the characters/progresison of the (very religious) poem *Piers Plowman*, adapting their perspectives from dealing with clergy vs laity issues to rich vs poor. Although the main thrust of this revolt is unfair taxes and other economic policies, the entire thing is framed in heavily theological terms. Because that's how people saw the world. Those are the arguments that made sense to argue, and the arguments they believed would have made sense to their opponents. The 1525 German PW has a long post-history of Marxist historians viewing it as the great struggle of the working class. But then modern historians--secular and confessional (religious) alike--went at it and showed that those revolting peasants, too, were protesting against unjust economic conditions, but again framing their objections, justifications, and even their *demands* in religious terms. A good chunk of PW leaders and participants (so, including actual peasants) go on to become the first Anabaptists, the diehard (literally) of diehard early Reformers. Good sources: Steven Justice, *Writing and Rebellion*; James Stayer, *Peasants' War and the Anabaptist Community of Goods*.

&gt; But how much control did the general public have on those conflicts? Weren't those conflicts driven by the nobility with the common people just swept along by their liege lords?

This is one particular strain of interpretation of the early Reformation in England, popularized by Haigh and Duffy in particular. You can find a couple other cases of what appear to be "top-down" Reformations, for example, Scandinavia. Looking at Germany, the failed efforts in France, and even revisiting the early English case and especially later England, it's a *very* different story. Overall, though, Anabaptism--including in England--is a great example of the Reformation's impact at all levels of society. Anabaptists with their insistence on adult baptism instead of infant wound up persecuted unto martyrdom by Catholics, Lutherans and Calvinists alike. This was a new faith with mostly middle and lower class adherents that found NO official support or even *allowance* for decades and decades. Of course it was a tiny minority of people. But then you have cases like an individual town in the midst of Catholic territory that clung fast to Lutheran belief, or English political leaders very deliberately acting for show in ways to convince the public they were right.

From a modern perspective, I guess one might say in the face of plague and war, There can't be a God, God wouldn't do this--but nope, the response you see is, Why is God punishing us like this. Is this God stepping in to end the world. Again and again, the avalanche of evidence suggests that people simply did not think in terms of God's existence/non-existence. The evidence suggests that is a later development. Of course who's to say that no one ever had a moment, but the evidence that people even thought in ways that would lead to that kind of objection instead of a laundry list of other ways to think about spiritual ennui or "not feeling God" or catastrophes is just not there.Rapunzel itself is not a medieval Western story; it's later. The medieval Christian equivalent of maiden locked in a tower is the legend of St. Barbara, but she isn't really associated iconographically with hair. That's Mary Magdalene, and *her* long hair has iconographic and theological purpose. Medieval Mary Magdalene is a conflation of several biblical characters with a vastly expanded legend (...she evangelizes France), so she is a repentant prostitute who does her penance in the desert, naked. From an artistic standpoint, long hair allows her to be [naked but decent.](http://i.imgur.com/VDy4SR7.png) It's a very literal hairshirt, even hairsuit. From a theological one, long unkempt hair was a sign of, well, women's waywardness. Mary Magdalene's desert sojourn marks her True transition into someone who *can* evangelize a country (in legend); her hair is a reminder of her penance.

As to the fairy tale of Rapunzel itself, that is way outside my knowledge base, sorry!Do a PhD:

You can gain thirty pounds or

Run a marathonI required one

From my freshman seminar

Turns out, they can't countTo the best of my knowledge, this is a deeply ambiguous situation. Ideally, the Church wanted everyone attending Mass on Sundays and feast days. Miri Rubin's research on the Eucharist in the late Middle Ages uncovers a rich set of what I can only describe as *theatrics* surrounding the moment of consecration, along with various exempla the Church used to instruct the laity that merely *looking* at the consecrated Host conferred some of the benefits of actually receiving it. There's an increasing emphasis over the 14th-15th centuries on sermons, too--in particular, how to make sure people understand them (including repeating the Bible theme in the local vernacular). And yes, priests complain about their parishioners not showing up and not paying attention.

Looking at manuals for confession: Anthony of Florence wants priests to ask people if they've been skipping Mass, period, but the *very* popular Mirror of Sinners warns its readers that missing Mass on Sundays *without a good excuse* is a sin. Thirteenth-century nuns were warned not to skip Mass *to do embroidery*, but that's not really the same case as lay people on Sundays since they'd be attending Mass daily.

One way or another, you shouldn't get the idea that churches in the Middle Ages were empty except at Easter. The overwhelming evidence suggests that people really did go to Mass to watch the consecration and hear the sermons. In the 15th century, the increasingly literate urban gentry made books about how to attend Mass properly a hot ticket for the new printers. But in terms of *enforcement*? Synods passed ruling after ruling trying to get people into church for confession, and canon law was immovable on Eucharistic reception once a year. With Sunday masses, mostly we hear complaints from priests who wished their sermons were a bit more heavily attended.OP asked if long hair was a symbol of wealth; I thought a reply of what it *did* symbolize in the Middle Ages fit the standards of this sub better than "No."

Joan of Arc was a peasant. One of the indictments against her reads:

&gt; "She says...she has to wear men's clothes and have her hair cut round above her ears, **leaving nothing about her to indicate the female sex** except what nature gave to distinguish the sex."I'm going iconographically here. The idea of being naked in the desert doing penance is absorbed into the MM legend early on, with her hair covering (or not) nudity. By late medieval Germany, MM is sometimes depicted with ordinary (if a lot of) long hair on her head, but a full-body covering in short hair like animal fur/body hair. Apparently this comes out of religious drama costumes, but that's a big None spot in my knowledge. The images of MM actually wearing a hairshirt (or rather a hairdress, which is more visually distinctive) that I'm aware of start to appear after that.In the 1220s, Frederick II embarked on a program of forcibly transporting the Muslim population of Sicily to Lucera on the Italian mainland. It was part of an ongoing effort to preserve a Muslim population as Latin subordinates, not just to suppress rebellions. In Lucera, Muslims farmed very fertile fields (after all, Frederick wanted the benefits of taxation!) and were even allowed/encouraged to serve in Frederick's army. Julie Taylor even found a couple cases of Muslim soldiers who were knighted, owned land, and were exempt from paying the extra tax levied on non-Christians.

The Muslims of Lucera were allowed religious freedom and autonomy. Because they built their community from literally the ground up, we can assume that at least one mosque was built. Although there are few sources about religious life within the community, scattered references to *gymnasia* even suggest the presence of a formal madrasa or even a Quranic school that would have been attached to the mosque.

In 1274, the Muslim community of Huesca (Spain) was granted permission to quarry stones from old cemeteries for mosque construction, at the same time the local Dominicans received permission to quarry for a church. The source is not clear on whether "construction" means a new mosque, an expansion of an existing one, or simple repairs. We can't exclude construction of a new mosque: although the Church had banned building new synagogues (and by implication, mosques) earlier in the 13th century, the Spanish kingdoms continued to allow Jewish communities to build new synagogues.

Sources: Julie Taylor, *Muslims in Medieval Italy: The Colony at Lucera*; Alex Metcalfe, *The Muslims of Medieval Italy*; Brian Catlos, *The Victors and the Vanquished: Christians and Muslims of Catalonia and Aragon, 1050-1300* Unfortunately, the colony was destroyed in 1300.

Following some political intrigue and warfare in the wake of Frederick's death, Sicily and the southern tip of Italy--including Lucera--wound up under the control of Frederick's illegitimate son Manfred. But Manfred had made an enemy of the pope on all fronts. That, combined with a sharpening western attitude towards Muslims and Jews (Manfred was very popular with the Muslims of Lucera), caused the pope to cede the rights to Sicily to Charles of Anjou. He eventually conquered the region, killing Manfred. Charles gradually made life harder for the Muslims, who started to emigrate in droves, at the same time he worked to recruit Christian immigrants to take their place.

In 1300, Charles II's religious and financial motives combined into a perfect storm of pious greed. He seized the Muslim settlement and sold the vast majority of its inhabitants into slavery. He wanted the profit from the sale of slaves and from the possessions and property left behind; he wanted the spiritual benefit of crusading against the enemies of Christendom.

Later in the fourteenth century there are a handful of references to Muslims in Sicily and southern Italy, but nothing like the colony at Lucera. Even though it was forcibly established as an exile, its Muslims inhabitants--fighting side by side with some of the local CHristians--defended it fiercely until they were overwhelmed.

Running Warehouse keeps a list of [minimalist shoes](http://www.runningwarehouse.com/catpage-WRSMIN.html) and [maximalist shoes](http://www.runningwarehouse.com/catpage-WRSMAX.html). Presumably [the rest of them](http://www.runningwarehouse.com/catpage-WNRS.html) would be in the middle.I love the [Night Trail Marathon](http://wintertrailmarathon.com/) races in Indianapolis. They're nighttime trail runs in a mostly-wooded park--at night. A winter and summer edition. At one point you run across a causeway between two lakes, and if it is clear, you can see the last twinges of sunset on the first loop and gorgeous stars on later ones. The 10K is one loop, half marathon 2, and full marathon 4.

500-700 runners across all distances. Bib pickup right before the race. Great casual trail running atmosphere; the RD really tries to make it an event for first-timers in particular. It's a park path, so not very technical, but there are some fun loggy sections, short steep inclines, and creek hopping. As for the vacation part of it, Indianapolis is the best city you never think of.

What are you waiting for?Ooh, great question. Yes, intellectual/written "heresy" (as opposed to "popular" religious movements, although the Lollards in England are an interesting case of a mixture of the two) gets both written and censured throughout the later Middle Ages. Hans Thijssen literally wrote a book called *Censure and Heresy at the University of Paris, 1200-1400* where he discusses 30 such cases in 200 years at just one university. The most famous case, Paris 1277, centered around texts that even in the most doubt-friendly interpretation seemed to suggest there could be philosophical truth apart from God. (Many scholars today interpret the 1277 condemnations as part of a debate about happiness in this life versus the next, rather than anyone really supposing there was a purely philosophical, non-theological way to reach truth).

Outside the universities, too, writers were censured and occasionally executed for heresy. Here it's not really a question of denying faith in the "belief" sense, but a thwarting of Church authority combined with the fear that the text would lead other people down the same path. Marguerite Porete's *The Mirror of Simple Souls* (the text) was condemned and ordered destroyed first, on the idea that some of its teachings seemed to suggest the sacraments were not necessary for "advanced" Christians. Only when she *added more to the book* and *kept teaching* (and other political factors got in the way) was she executed.

This particular sense of heresy on the less academic level is reflected in handbooks for confession like the Speculum peccatoris. The priest should ask the penitent:

&gt; Have you had doubts about Scripture, the sacraments, the afterlife, the Last Judgment, or that God is the creator of all things?

The Church was concerned that people might question the *power* of God and the Church, particularly with respect to salvation, but the existence of God was never an issue.

Once the printing press was invented, scholars have shown the Church had very little control. In 1486, the archbishop of Mainz tried to ban printers from producing more German-language Bibles without ecclesiastical approval. Although *fewer* Bible were printed from 1486-1506 than 1466-1486, none of the ones that did emerge had official sanction. Koen Goudriaan, looking at early print in the Low Countries, argues that printers were basically printing whatever they thought people would buy--the role of the Church as a throttle on religious texts has been drastically overestimated.

Political (which could also be religious) censorship of the print market starts to happen, but in the case that has been studied in the most depth--Augsburg--it is a later development.I guess I'm not making my point the right way. What I'm trying to say is, the *existence* of god, in the Middle Ages, is a Fact. ALL the evidence suggests that the medieval European worldview simply did not have room for a universe without god. There was concern that people had or didn't have the *right understanding* of capital-G God, that they doubted God's power. But even the glimpses we get of people who worried that they weren't good Christians or weren't, well, "feeling it" (that is a modern anachronism, but it's a good summary of a complicated 15th century pattern), express a belief that the devil is blocking them from God, or they're worried about doubts because they intellectually know God exists and are worried that not "feeling it" will keep them out of heaven.

My understanding of current neuroscience research on religion is that we can identify patterns of meditation and spirituality/religiosity in terms of electrical activity. It seems to me that "theism" and "atheism" are concepts very rooted in particular cultures that could be one possible expression of tendencies to those patterns--but not the *only* one.To add: You're suggesting an "argument from silence," and those aren't unheard of in medieval history. But there has to be an opening for it. And medievalists have *tried* to find evidence of atheism, and *tried* to find that opening, and come up empty-handed. (Trust me. If you turned up evidence of atheism in the Middle Ages, you'd be on publishing that ish like ants on juice at a picnic.)So the Ecstasy of St. Teresa is a [sculpture of 16th-century reformer and mystic Teresa of Avila](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/6/6b/Ecstasy_of_Saint_Teresa_September_2015-2a.jpg/800px-Ecstasy_of_Saint_Teresa_September_2015-2a.jpg) inspired by an excerpt from her autobiographical *Life*:

&gt; I saw in his hand a long spear of gold, and at the iron's point there seemed to be a little fire. He appeared to me to be thrusting it at times into my heart, and to pierce my very entrails; when he drew it out, he seemed to draw them out also, and to leave me all on fire with a great love of God. The pain was so great, that it made me moan; and yet so surpassing was the sweetness of this excessive pain, that I could not wish to be rid of it. The soul is satisfied now with nothing less than God. The pain is not bodily, but spiritual; though the body has its share in it. It is a caressing of love so sweet which now takes place between the soul and God.

Teresa's language of ecstasy, piercing, pain/pleasure, body/spirit, and sweetness has a long history in Christian spiritual writing (and even a future--you may be familiar with John Donne's ["Batter my heart, three person'd God"](http://www.poetryfoundation.org/poem/173362)). Medievalists sometimes use the term "bridal mysticism" reflecting its theological roots in the biblical Song of Songs (a.k.a. Song of Solomon or Canticle) and the incredibly common medieval topos of nuns/holy women/"the soul" as the *sponsa Christi*--the bride of Christ.

By the twelfth century, an allegorical interpretation of the poem where the Lover is Christ and the Beloved is the soul (*anima* in Latin is female) becomes prominent, although earlier allegories of Christ and his Church, and Christ and Mary (yes, his virgin mother) remain active. VIP Cistercian monk Bernard of Clairvaux\u2019s sermons on the Song of Songs popularize the Christ/soul allegory as a model for how a Christian should seek to grow into mystical union with God. There are two things going on here. One is the \u201cfeeling it\u201d that we might describe today, or that Teresa describes in the excerpt above. But it also\u2014and for later women writers as well\u2014has a deeper theological meaning of bringing one\u2019s will into allegience with God\u2019s. You don\u2019t want what you want, you want what God wants.

But it\u2019s Augustinian canon Richard of St. Victor whose treatise \u201cThe Four Degrees of Violent Love\u201d really takes the allegory into the mystical and the erotic. Latin has several words for love, which medieval monks found helpful. \u201cCaritas\u201d was divine or pure love, utterly non-sexual, so Christ and Mary *could* share caritas if not diligo or amor. Richard switches back and forth between the different words, minimizing or erasing the difference. He describes the stages of love as:

&gt; In the first degree, the soul thirsts for God. In the second it thrists toward God. In the third the soul thirsts into God. In the fourth it thirsts in accordance with God.

or

&gt; In the first degree a betrothal is made, in the second a marriage, in the third sexual union, and in the fourth childbirth.

The real flowering of bridal mysticism, however, comes in the thirteenth century from the pens of some of our earliest writers of religious texts in the vernacular: religious women. Nuns and quasi-religious women (who live religious lives, but do not take formal vows in an order) had long been described as \u201cbrides of Christ\u201d; these writers found new meaning in that term. They\u2019re aided by the vernaculars\u2019 usual single word for \u201clove\u201d. They blended topoi from Bernard and Richard on one hand, and secular romance literature on the other, in some of the most gorgeous, disturbing, passionate, erotic texts that the Middle Ages have to author. Thus beguine Mechthild of Magdeburg (d. 1292) in German:

&gt; Lord, now I am a naked soul, and you in yourself are a well-adorned God.

&gt; Our shared lot is eternal life without death.

&gt; Then a blessed stillness that both desire comes over them.

&gt; He surrenders himself to her, and she surrenders herself to him.

&gt; What happens to her then\u2014she knows\u2014

&gt; And that is all right with me.

and Cistercian nun Beatrice of Nazareth (d. 1268) in Dutch:

&gt; When love acts in the heart so vehemently and riotously...the soul thinks that its veins are opened and its blood is boiling out, its marrow is withered and its legs are weak\u2026And the soul thus feel loves acting, sparing nothing, seizing and consuming everything within the soul like a devouring fire.

The writers are discussing spiritual ecstasy and spiritual pain: the process of subsuming themselves and their desires into God. To stress the all-consuming nature of this, they use very concrete, embodied language to describe it. When does a metaphor stop being a metaphor?

In the hands of male clergy, of course.

The same clerics who sought to rescue Mechthild\u2019s text from charges of heresy by translating it into Latin and toning down her criticism of the Church\u2014the same clerics who sought to secure Beatrice\u2019s sainthood by writing a hagiography and promoting her *cultus*--these clerics who were very much on the side of our writers nevertheless saw a danger in women writing theology in the vernacular (\u2026read mostly by women). The way Mechthild, Beatrice, and other women writers used ecstatic erotic union to describe alignment of the will with God *as just one stage* on the way to greater, settled, more comfortable, dissolving of the will into God was a deep threat. If one were so conformed to God in this life, she would have no need of the Church on Earth, they thought. Marguerite Porete died at the stake for this interpretation of *her* text.

So the Latin edition of Mechthild\u2019s text focuses on the bridal, erotic themes, not even including the final book where she has advanced beyond that metaphor. Beatrice\u2019s spiritual ecstasy/agony is rewritten as her actual, physical practices of self-flagellation. The theological danger\u2014but also the deeper theological meaning\u2014perhaps fades away.

So if you think of bridal mysticism as a triangle or trinity of spiritual-theological-physical, you can say that Mecthild and Beatrice have spiritual and theological at the top dipping down to physical below, whereas the late Middle Ages turned the triangle so theological points down and spiritual-physical are on top. Teresa inherits both of these traditions. The ambivalence of spiritual versus physical ecstasy, I think, is captured very well in both the passage from her Vida and in Bernini\u2019s sculpture.  tl;dr: You were right--you did solid research! :) 

The hopes and fears are very real, and ideas of demons present in the world are very concrete.

Medieval writing on the afterlife can seem very ambivalent on questions of physicality. Hell and purgatory are a great example of this. What does a soul look like, and how can it be punished? How can we as clergy communicate this to the laity? The most obvious way is using what people know: corporal punishments. So, while stressing that the damned souls are *souls*, writers frequently describe them as having the body of the soul; artists certainly depict [souls as bodies.] (http://2.bp.blogspot.com/__V2M5Hky_wI/THkCQkkg9cI/AAAAAAAAC6E/ptdQGOGtrEk/s1600/TaymouthHoursHellmouth.PNG) The concreteness with which people imagined the punishments of hell and purgatory is reflected in the evolution of punishments\u2019 depictions. Over the Middle Ages, the tortures described in the afterlife tend to wax and wane in accordance with both ascetical practices and actual punishments.

My favorite evidence for demons as a real, concrete entity is the amazing story of Sybilla of Marsal (near Metz in Germany). Sybilla built quite a reputation, even a career, for herself as a False holy woman. Imitating the practices attributed to \u201cliving saints,\u201d she faked days-long periods of rapture, conversations with angels, fights with demons, and prophecies from beyond. And\u2014both awesomely and on topic here\u2014she faked physical evidence of these occurrences. She sprinkled good-smelling spices around her room as evidence of angelic visitation (since heaven was thought to smell \u201cspicy\u201d), and\u2014best of all\u2014owned a hairy demon costume that she would don and walk around outside, not hurting people but railing against that holy Sybilla who thought she was so blessed and pious.

In a world where people thought of demons and angels as abstract, they would have laughed at a silly costume. In a world where hell *hurt* and demons walked the earth, they believed the devil himself was out to get their holy prophet.Thank *you*. Legit if I answer no other questions, this AMA was worth it. Even my reddit username is from Mechthild. :)To add a couple things:

The *big* development of the late Middle Ages and early modern period is the diabolization of magic. Early and high medieval people absolutely recognized that magic could be used for harm; what will become the key witchcraft word \u201cmaleficium\u201d (evildoing) pops up frequently in the twelfth-century. But it\u2019s not really until the fifteenth century that the devil becomes the driving force of magic, and *maleficium* becomes consorting with Satan for the purposes of inflicting harm on others. There isn\u2019t a scholarly consensus on how and why this happened, but we can point to a couple developments.

First, 13th and 14th century theologians had started to talk about demons and magic in abstract speculations that were really just *using* them to answer bigger theological questions. (For example, Can you use maleficia to reverse the effects of maleficia? is at first blush about witchcraft, but it really asking questions of whether sins are still sins if the result is a good thing.) Although initially symbolic, this \u201cthinking with demons\u201d grows stronger and less abstract over time. Second, *academic* (Latin) magical texts introduce *nigromancia* or necromancy: the practice of summoning and commanding demons. While this type of \u201clearned\u201d sorcery remained mostly Latinate and elite, it and its condemnations were nevertheless part of the intellectual milieu of the late Middle Ages.

This is important because our big anti-witchcraft writers and witch hunters come out of this academic background. (When you read witchcraft trial documents from early modern Germany, so many of the interrogators are \u201cDoctor\u201d\u2014they have advanced university training.) And while one illiterate villager might accuse another of one case of witchcraft, we can\u2019t ignore the role of texts in directly and indirectly promoting ideas of witchcraft (although the influence of the Malleus Malificarum in particular has probably been overstated due to how spectacular it is). And, especially in some cases, the role of witch hunters in fomenting and inflating outbreaks of trials and executions. Lawyers (\u201cdoctor\u201d) who specialized in witch interrogations would even travel from diocese to diocese to conduct \u2018questioning,\u2019 with the primary goals being to secure a confession *and a list of other local witches*. And yes, under torture, women and men would rattle off the names of everyone they could think of. (One interrogation record cites 237 other witches.) In a situation like this, there is no identifiable act of \u201cblack magic\u201d that needs to be fought against at the root.Chances of this question appearing in this AMA: 100%. Historians\u2019 ability to answer it definitively: 0%. I will talk about male and female [accused] witches here, since the legal charge is the same and the confessions use similar topoi. Also, \u201cwitch\u201d refers to someone accused and likely executed as a witch, not an actual magical practicioner.

Over all of Europe and all the witchcraft hysteria, approximately 75-80% of accused witches were female. That universal statistic needs to be qualified: the percentage of men increased over time in general, and in some times/places was significantly higher. For example, in Westphalia (HRE), men are 17% of the accused in the 16th century; 59% in the 17th. But\u2014and here we arrive at just why this is such a complicated question\u2014that wasn\u2019t always the case. In Finland, the gender proportion change is directly flipped from Westphalia. In some places, men are accused mainly during mass outbreaks of accusations/trials; in others, men are rarely implicated in outbreaks but are often targeted individually. In some places (Eichstatt, I\u2019m looking at you), men and women are equally named as potential witches by others under torture, but the witch hunters pursued only or primarily the named women. And so forth.

Still, 75-80% overall is a stunning statistic certainly reflected stereotypes of the witch: hence Malleus Malifc**A**rum is the \u201cHammer of [Exclusively Female] Witches.\u201d Since different types of both good and harmful magic in the high Middle Ages had been generally associated with male and female practicioners, there are two fundamental questions that have yet to be answered conclusively. Why were most witches female, and why were there still male witches? (And what on Earth do we do about male and female *child* witches?)

Historians generally agree that these questions need to be approached both globally and locally, that is, with reference to both changing ideas about \u201cthe witch\u201d and the specifics of individual accusations/outbreaks. Ideologically, there is no doubt that Middle Ages saw women as both spiritually-physically inferior to men yet closer to the spirit world. Medieval science inherited from the Greeks saw women\u2019s bodies as more porous, open to outside influence; medieval theology viewed women as more susceptible to temptation (see also: Eve) and more holy for thwarting it. While both male and female saints in late antiquity and the Middle Ages fight demons, the later we go, the more the appearance and defeat of physical demons is a topos of women\u2019s hagiography. Throughout the Middle Ages, women also make up a higher percentage of demoniacs, that is, people possessed by a demon (and thus not responsible for their actions).

These demonological factors are important because, as I mentioned above, the big late medieval development in *maleficium* is its new assocation with Satan. Witchcraft in the LMA and early modern era becomes a pact with Satan for the purpose of inflicting harm. Since women are more susceptible to the influence of demons from outside and inside, wouldn\u2019t they be the ones more likely to succumb to Satan\u2019s temptations to power?

And of course, fifteenth-century clerical writing on witches tends to be gendered and thus embodied. The sexual angle is perhaps easiest to understand. Most basically, Eve\u2019s temptation by the devil had long been understood as a *seduction* (thanks, Latin). Also, one of the medieval Church\u2019s biggest preoocuptions with magic was the use of spells to cause impotence or infertility, so there was already an intellectual tie between sex and magic. And thus, witch-hunting manuals describe the initial agreement between a witch and the devil as sealed by sex. The witch\u2019s mark or witch\u2019s teat is an unnatural addition to the body where demons suckle as if breastfeeding on the soul. Immediately, these are female, embodied ideas.

And yet.

Male witches under torture confess to sex with a beautiful female spirit, in some cases taking on the appearance of his wife. Men, too, suckle demons, which *might* be a perversion of the medieval topos of drinking from the Wounds of Christ.

One of the most promising lines of investigation into the increasing number of male witches concern the witches\u2019 sabbath idea. Peter Heuser has demonstrated that over time, written ideas about the witches\u2019 sabbath changed to align more closely with actual accounts of rural and town festivals\u2014festivals in which men played key roles both organizing and participating. Both he (looking at Westphalia) and Rita Voltmer (Meuse) have demonstrated how that particular development concretely impacted the types of people being accused in the territories they studied.

But then we also have to consider evidence on the ground\u2014particularly important due to the extreme diversity and changes in gendered witch accusations. Our modern stereotype of the accused witch is the elderly female outsider, perhaps an outcast, perhaps with one enemy but then scapegoated\u2014but certainly of no social or economic use to the community. There are certainly cases of this. On the other hand, power was no protection. Johannes Junius, the *mayor* of Bamberg, was [famously] (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Johannes_Junius#Letter_to_daughter) accused and executed as a witch.

One major way that authorities identified witches was through naming other while under torture. Since witches frequently shouted out any darn name they could think of, a female witch with mostly female acquaintances might name mostly women. (Again, this is not a universal pattern, and as mentioned above sometimes the interrogators chose to pursue accusations only against other women. Does this reflect the influence of stereotypes of the female witch?). William Smith found that witch accusations in Catholic Franconia often involved a male patriarch and then all the women in his family, a pattern reflected elsewhere in the idea of an \u201coccult family.\u201d 

The final factor I\u2019ll consider here\u2014by no means the final factor in the overall investigation\u2014is social power. Men were the legal apparatus, period. Women were the accused, occasionally the accuser/victim, and rarely brought in to ascertain the presence of a witch\u2019s teat or the female witch\u2019s virginity. An interesting development of the later Middle Ages is the prominent role of women in debunking the claims to holiness of False saints, like Kunigunde with Anna Laminit or Joan of Arc with Catherine de La Rochelle. Did women implicitly receive some kind of social reward for denouncing witches, specifically, accusations they understood had a higher likelihood of sticking (thus against other women)? Did accusers gain even the briefest social power or status in their accusations?

Looking at the male witch hunters is complicated. Johannes Nider and Heinrich Kramer are probably the two most famous anti-witch authors of the 15C today, yet under other circumstances they defended women accused of heresy and even witchcraft. Yet here, too, social power plays a factor. First, 15th and 16th century writing really doubles down on the idea of the patriarchal head of the family and society, the strong man/prince guiding his family/state through a world of good and evil. It is only the duty of the father to make sure his sons and especially his daughters are led to salvation (through accusation-confession-absolution-execution as penance if necessary, of course). Second, both writing witch treatises and serving as a professional witch-hunter became routes to advancement in both ecclesiastical and secular worlds. Like our early modern mean girls above, perhaps these men also implicitly understood that accusations against women were more likely to be accepted by their communities on account of the stereotypes, and thus they pursued female witches more zealously.

\u2026And I believe I have now succeeded adequately in offending nearly every scholar who has published on it\u2014because that is the nature of the historiography on the topic.Perhaps the Wheel of Fortune? (Not sure how much this qualifies as folklore...but I suppose /u/itsallfolklore, right?)

The *rota fortunae* of the ancient and medieval worlds is the idea of fate as a giant wheel spun by the goddess Fortuna, "Empress of the World." It's famously depicted as four stages or four kings: [I will reign, I reign, I have reigned, I have lost my crown.](http://i.imgur.com/GXSRzjA.jpg) In medieval literature, it appears everywhere from high philosophy to the Morte d'Artur.

The idea is essentially that fate is fickle, capricious, unpredictable, and above all uncontrollable. In the North Atlantic world today, it seems to me that we are much more likely to fall back on "everything happens for a reason", a balanced tally sheet, or our bastardization of karma to explain misfortune ranging from the loss of a child to hitting a red light.

Today, "Wheel of Fortune" is a somewhat passe game show and the [greatest medieval paean](https://youtu.be/Ty7J0IjF9NI?t=11s) to the concept is a cliche of movie trailers and sports commercials. To the best of my knowledge, archaeologists have not uncovered a rolled-up metal curse tablet in the Roman tradition that dates from the Middle Ages. But the tradition of giving curses physical form did evolve.

There is at least one case of a medieval "voodoo doll," in fact. A late 10th century legal document from England awards a plot of land to the bishop of Winchester because its former owners (a widow and her son/heir) "drove iron pins into an image of Wulfstan's father" and had been executed and outlawed respectively when the pinned image was discovered.

The major inheritance, though, is monastic and legal curses. Charters granting land and possessions sometimes lay a curse on anyone who breaks the terms of the document. For example, Anselm of Canterbury lays the fate of Judas on anyone who violates Henry I's confirmation of the privileges of the cathedral at Rochester. This relates to the curse tablets because medieval charters matter as physical objects as much as, sometimes more than, records of an agreement that exists independently of the material.All right, /u/thejukeboxhero, come on down.

Throughout the Middle Ages, women are consistently possessed by demons more frequently than men, and female saints fight against actual demons increasingly more often than male ones--although neither situation is exclusively female. Are there any broad demographical patterns, gendered or otherwise, in reports of who sees *ghosts* in the Middle Ages? How/does it change over time?

(Excluding visions of dead relatives in purgatory. I want revenants walking the Earth.)The British Isles give us a few examples of accused witches referring to "elf arrows." In Scotland, two women are accused of using arrows to "schute" their victims, and a male witch talks about diseases caused by "fairyes schot."

In Old English and Old Norse literature, elves/fairies, dwarves, and troll women shoot enchanted arrows or shoot regular arrows through enchanted/magical means.In late antiquity and the Middle Ages, long-distance religious pilgrimage very much took on trappings that we would recognize as tourism today. The underlying spiritual motive and meaning of those voyages remained paramount, but some version of "tour groups", "sightseeing", "publicity back home," and yes, "souvenirs" make an appearance.

The *Itinerarium Egeriae* is one of our earliest European texts by a female author, likely a noblewoman, possibly a nun, from Spain. She describes her trip throughout the Near East in the last years of the Roman Empire, very much on an organized trip with a tour guide of sorts:

&gt; We were also shown the place where Lot's wife had her memorial, as you read in the Bible. But what we saw, reverend ladies, was not the actual pillar, but only the place where it had once been. The pillar itself, they say, has been submerged in the Dead Sea --- at any rate we did not see it, and I cannot pretend we did.

But Egeria is not only interested in the holy sites:

&gt; I want you to be quite clear about these mountains, reverend ladies my sisters, which surrounded us as we stood beside the church looking down from the summit in the middle. They had been almost too much for us to climb, and I really do not think I had seen any that were higher (apart from the central one which is higher still) even though they only looked like little hillocks to us as we stood on the central mountain. From there we were able to see Egypt and Palestine, the Red Sea and the Parthenian Sea, as well as the vast lands of the Saracens---all unbelievably far below us.

Egeria signs off her text with her intention to pursue a pilgrimage further east, to Ephesus and into Asia. We do not hear from her again.

The Muslim conquest and post-Crusade reconquest of the Near East did not abolish European pilgrimage. Fifteenth-century laywoman Margery Kempe likewise visited Jerusalem with a tour group. In her *Book*, she describes having visions of the Passion actually taking place in the holy sites she visits. She is also concerned to establish her authority and knowledge of Christianity with the other (male?) pilgrims in her \u201ctour group.\u201d

The Church, of course, greatly promoted both local and long-distance pilgrimage throughout the Middle Ages. The pilgrim route to Santiago de Compostela in Spain is the most famous. Songs and entire liturgies (church service hymns and readings) formed around the \u201cCamino de Santiago\u201d. Handbooks or \u201ctravel guides\u201d discussing the best way to go about it were popular texts.

And, of course, if you went on pilgrimage, you needed a token to remember it by, right? Thus [pilgrimage badges](http://www.electricscotland.com/history/images/pilgrim_badges.jpg) became a popular commodity. These were little metal trinkets, often with holes so you could sew them to clothes or (frequently) felt hats. Their ubiquity took them to the point of being parodied. That\u2019s right. The Middle Ages not only had tour groups, travel guides, and postcards back home, it had \u201cMy brother went to Jerusalem and all I got was [this little sculpture](http://www.jalc.nl/j/jalc/images/vol01/nr02/0102a05fig20.jpg) that looks like genetalia.\u201dI am not sure retarded is a word people use anymore, but nerdy is what we do here.

The 15th-century witch-hunting treatise *Malleus Malificarum* has tales of enchanted arrows (see /u/MI13's question) and stolen penises that live in birds' nests eating oats and grass even though they aren't *really* stolen but the men *think* they are.

In the biblical, canonical Acts of the Apostles, Simon Magus sees the apostles healing via laying on of hands and inquires how can purchase this power with money. Peter reprimands him harshly and Simon begs forgiveness. In the apocryphal Acts of Peter, on the other hand, Peter is frustrated that Simon's sorcery is attracting followers and challenges him to a battle to prove whose miracles come from God and whose are just tricks. To display his powers, Simon levitates and starts to fly around the forum! Peter says a quick prayer that Simon only be harmed, not killed, and calls on God to strike him down out of midair. Simon shatters one of his legs and has to run-crawl-hobble out of the city as his former believers throw stones at him.

Proselytizing apostles Jude and Simon (different Simon) are in Persia when they attract the attention of the "duke of the kings of Babylon" (nice hierarchy, Jacobus de Voraigne). Called to account to him to prove their powers are legitimate, they tangle with sorcerers Zaroes and Arphaxat.  The False enchanters conjure up a multitude of snakes. Simon and Jude call upon the power of God to make the serpents *eat the sorcerers*! They then command the snakes to slither away into the desert.

Pure legend, right? Sure...except, of all the citations in all the world, *this* is the story that Thomas Aquinas chooses for his *Summa Theologica* to answer the question, "Can a person command irrational creatures." Yes, Thomas' justification for dog training and riding horses is getting God to have snakes eat people.Sure. The Middle Ages had a rich tradition of religious parody. Some of it is anticlerical (never anti-*religious*, but pointing out flaws of particular clergy or religous orders); some of it exaggerates tensions in religious practices and ideas. There is a lot of imagery in medieval Christianity as in modern that can be sexualized or eroticized. In particular, the Five Wounds of Christ in the late Middle Ages come to look like a vulva; monks and nuns alike report breastfeeding from Mary and drinking from Christ's side wound. Combine that with the general clerical attitude of sex being mostly very bad and people's attitudes...varying :), you have an atmosphere ripe for parody.

Pilgrimage of course had its detractors, especially later in the Middle Ages when indulgences get mixed up in it. Church communities that lacked saints' relics or a local holy site and so were excluded from pilgrimage traffic *and donations*, for example, might get envious of their shrine-hosting counterparts...I regret that I have but one upvote to give to your answer; thank you!

So I know basically nothing about accounts of revenants, which is why I asked. :) Like you, the "ghost stories" I'm familiar with are mostly monastic chronicles or exempla collections. (I have a couple female ghost references, if you want 'em, but they are later than I think you're interested--Caesarius of Heisterbach and the later books of Gertrude of Helfta's Herald of Divine Love are what I'm thinking of). 

The Thomas of Cantimpre reference is *really* interesting to me, though, because he's such a prominent confessor to and hagiographer of holy women--his vitae help cement the idea of what a late medieval holy woman should be, even. That exemplum strikes me as a corporealization of demonic attack with an implied threat to chastity, perhaps even using the embodiment to reiterate the importance of virginity. What I don't know (and *surely* someone has investigated this?) is how strongly the female demoniac&lt;=&gt;threat to virginity topos is in the high versus the late Middle Ages.

&gt; When women do appear as recipients (female ghosts are incredibly rare), it is often as widows who have received visions of their departed husbands, reminding them of the duties still owed to them in the next life.

Are these visions of their husbands in purgatory (or elsewhere), or do the husbands appear as ghosts in the physical location of the women? The first of those is *very* strongly feminized in hagiography at least--it's almost, not quite, a given in women's vitae, to the extent it becomes a necessary offhand comment rather than a full account to illustrate her sanctity. (Although since many of these saints are lifelong virgins, they are seeing the current fate of various dead ancestors and prominent people, not being told to arrange chantries for their husbands.)So I\u2019m going to talk about an exceptional case, because it\u2019s spectacular.

It\u2019s 1407. The queen of France was down in the dumps after losing her newborn son in childbirth. Louis, unpopular duke d\u2019Orleans and manipulative brother to King Charles\u2014and rumored to be the baby\u2019s father, just one of his many sexual dalliances\u2014had just paid the grieving queen a visit to console her. After their evening meal together, a messenger appeared: the king had urgent business for Louis. Accompanied by two squires and four valets, the duke hoisted himself onto his mule and set off into the dark streets of Paris. They turned down the Rue Vielle du Temple, the duke \u201chumming a tune\u201d in good spirits. Upstairs in one tenant house, Jacquette Griffard was folding her baby\u2019s diapers and watching out the window for her husband to come home. She paid little attention to the house across the street, which had stood empty for the past six months.

As Louis and his party drew even with the houses, the gates of the abandoned hotel burst open and a band of masked men suddenly swarmed the street in front of Louis. They carried torches. They carried axes and swords and maces studded with iron spikes. And they shouted, \u201cIt\u2019s him. Kill him! Kill him!\u201d

They fell upon the duke. The squires and two valets managed to flee. Two valets bravely sought to defend their duke, one dying for his valor and the other escaping, grievously wounded. The desecrated, mutilated bodies of Louis and Jacob de la Merre lay in the Paris street.

And the abandoned hotel was on fire.

Fire was a massive threat in any medieval or early modern city. Worried neighbors appeared in the street to investigate, and the cry of \u201cMurder\u201d went up.

The king charged Guillame de Tignonville, provost of Paris, with the pursuit of the perpetrators, affording him whatever manpower and powers he needed.

Tignonville did two things immediately. First, he ordered the gates of Paris shut, so the murderers would be trapped in the walled city. Second, he inspected the body. This was the necessary first step of any murder investigation: to ascertain that a murder had in fact been committed. In Tignonville\u2019s meticulous notes of the case (reflecting its importance\u2014the *prince* of *France* was dead), we see the language of investigatorial skepticism already: \u201cThe street where the crime is said to have been committed\u201d and \u201cit appeared that the wounds caused their deaths.\u201d (\u201c\u2026And the wounds were of such a kind,\u201d he writes, \u201cthat the head was all sliced up and the entire brain protruded.\u201d)

The provost\u2019s investigation itself followed two familiar paths: interviews of witnesses and examination of physical evidence. His *army* of clerics went door-to-door in the apartments and shops on the street. If someone admitted any knowledge, they were interviewed further with a scribe to record their words. In the abandoned hotel, he found various items left behind by the masked murderers. With those objects, he went from shop to shop in Paris, asking if the shopkeeper had sold them, and to whom. Witnesses misremembered and lied; evidence didn\u2019t pan out; Tignonville grew frustrated but perservered. Louis had had *so* many enemies, in low places and high; the list of suspects was endless.

Finally, he tracked down two key witnesses: the man who had arranged for the gang to occupy the house, and shopkeepers who recognized items they had sold. The problem: the conspirators behind the crime were as high placed as the royal family itself, and in the Middle Ages, obtaining a confession (by any means necessary) was essential.

So Guillame devised a trap.

It was not normally allowed, he admitted to the royal council, for an investigator to search the palaces of high lords. But surely they would be willing to submit to one, *if they had nothing to hide*...

And one of the dukes--a member of the royal family, even--confessed immediately. Tignonville never even had to search his residence for evidence (or rather "evidence"). Simply the *idea* that he might find something was enough to draw out the culprit. True to form for any modern crime drama, he had been spotted at Louis' funeral loudly proclaiming that never before had a more treacherous murder been committed in the streets of Paris.

My source on this is Eric Jager's fantastic *Blood Royal: A True Tale of Crime and Detection in Medieval Paris*, which I hope you will consider obtaining through your local or university library (a sentiment which I hope does not count as advertising).In literature and in witchcraft accusations, elf-arrows or fairy-arrows typically carry disease. I'm assuming the witchcraft accusations are mystical or magical arrows as the vehicle of harm rather than, you know, Katniss and an actual bow.Some canon lawyers specialized in finding and questioning witches. They'd travel from parish to parish, sometimes investigating an existing accusation, sometimes being in a town or village when an initial accusation--surprise!--happened. Medieval criminal investigations *required* a confession, by any means necessary. In some cases, accusations and executions were an individual event, or a handful. In others, which is what I've called "outbreaks" in this thread, questioning one or several witches would cascade into dozens or even hundreds of trials and executions. In cases like that, the investigators would torture an accused witch until she or he not only confessed to their own crime, but named all the other witches participating in their witches' sabbaths or whatnot. The witch-hunters then had the choice of which of those names to pursue (i.e. torture and possibly execute) further.Sappho's poetry seems to place her in a circle of women, but it's unclear what exactly the nature of that circle was.

Holt Parker's [1993 paper](http://mkatz.web.wesleyan.edu/Images2/cciv243.Parker.html) published in Transactions of the APA is available for free online. It's the most thorough investigation I've come across of the "Sappho ran a school" legend/interpretation.

(1993 is ancient in scholarly terms, of course. But while we've turned up entire new worlds of Sappho's own writing since then, the historical sources of biographical data are still the same, much later tales.)One of the earliest and certainly most famous examples is Johann Weyer, a 16th century Dutch physician and author. He certainly believed in the devil and the devil's role in magic, but for him, magic meant *nigromancia*--necromany, the conjuring of demons to do one's bidding with Latin spells and elaborate rituals. This sorcery was the province of the learned elite. Common *maleficia* to him was impossible. He postulated that "witches" were afflicted with melancholy and hysteria--in short, mentally ill, not evil.A good parallel is the medieval and early modern understanding of demon possession. God permits demons to possess people so that his power might be demonstrated in the performance of exorcisms. The emphasis is thus on *fighting* the evil. Witch hunters certainly viewed their task as a holy war. By extrapolation, witchcraft would be allowed *so it could be rooted out*, thus demonstrating God's triumph over Satan through human instruments on yet another front.How tight will it cinch--that is, how much room is there in the band that isn't lights/pouch? I'm female, not particularly hourglassy, and still any belt I wear will slide up to what little waist I have. My Spibelt is pulled as tight as it will go and is still a bit loose. Same story with the Amphipod. That's fine and I deal--I think I would mine much less if I didn't have to keep shifting it so the clip-on lights stay in front and in back, in fact--but if I *didn't*, that would be *awesome*.So the Knights Templar (Poor Soldiers of Christ and of the Temple of Solomon) were a monastic military order established in the 12th century to protect European pilgrims to the Near East during the Crusades, and intimately associated with the fight against Muslims. By the early 14th century when the Templars were condemned and disbanded, Europe had pretty much lost the Crusades. There wasn't really a use for crusading Templars in the Near East anymore.

But Iberia was still fighting the final remnants of the Reconquista. Five years after the formal abolition of the Templars at the Council of Vienne (1312), the King of Portugal founded a military monastic order to replace the Templars and won papal approval for them in 1319. In 1323, moreover, he obtained the lucrative deal from the pope for the Portuguese Templar assets to be turned over to his new Order of the Knights of Christ rather than the Hospitallers. As to the navy? The Templars did have a small fleet, but I don't believe anyone knows what happened to it when the order was condemned.

The new order adopted the imagery, possessions, and (properly adjusted for the times) mission of the Templars. The extent to which it was a direct continuation of the Templars in terms of *membership* will probably never be answered. By way of their monastic Rule, that is, the regulations governing daily life and the running of the order, the Order of Christ actually used the Rule of a Spanish order, the Order of Calatrava, which had not been suppressed at the time of the Templar condemnation.

But. Even the Reconquista, the last remnants of Europe's crusading past, eventually came to an end. The Order of Christ floundered about...until a certain Prince Henry became head of the order. Henry the *Navigator*. You may have heard of him? He mobilized the order in his exploring mission. He used the Order's coffers to fund his explorations, and Portuguese ships traveling the world flew the order's flag, a slightly modified version of the Templars' (which may be what your friend is thinking of). 

In fact, just as the Knights Templar had been military monks for abroad, service in Portuguese Africa in particular became a requirement for membership in the order (even as it lost its religious element to become simply a knightly order of noblemen). They even dubbed native Kongolese members and knights. The Kingdom of Kongo eventually established its own branch of the order, and its banner and other imagery--the same banner that had guided Europeans in the Near East so many centuries ago--became one of the most important symbols of the nobility of Kongo.

My source on this, of all things, is a fascinating book by African art historican Cecile Fromont, *The Art of Conversion: Christian Visual Culture in the Kingdom of Kongo.* (I had wanted to know why I was seeing Templar iconography in pre-colonial Africa.)As I said:

&gt; So I\u2019m going to talk about an exceptional case, because it\u2019s spectacular.

Dude was the duc d'Orleans, living in a major western city (the urban residence making him almost as unusual, by the way--even the murder of an urban shopkeeper or beggar would be "unusual"). I'm not even sure it describes how murder "in the higher classes" was investigated--at least in terms of things like sealing off Paris to prevent the attackers from escaping, and *certainly* the ruse Tignonville pulled at the end with the nobles of the royal court once he had some ideas of a suspect. On the other hand, the provost clearly didn't make up his methodology out of nowhere; the systematic nature of his investigation and his ability to launch into it immediately--also, the king's trusting him with the task--certainly suggest the outlines were well established: investigate the body, question witnesses, examine evidence, investigate the *fama* or reputation of potential suspects, obtain confession.

I really hope someone with firmer knowledge than me of murder investigations in late medieval England comes along to post--it's a complex system where the juries who decide cases do a lot of their own investigating and coroners have juries of their own. (In England, coroner is an official position from very early on.) You really see in those cases the importance of *fama* or reputation *as judicial evidence*, which is a fascinating topic to me. But I don't feel qualified to write a solid AH post about it yet.I mean, they have got to be mystical. Shooting physical, poisoned arrows at someone isn't maleficium, it's assault and murder. Remember that medieval/early modern *witchcraft* is almost always not a "real crime" in the sense of actual magical action. It's invented accusations from perceived misfortune, or an invented confession under torture. If an accused witch had a bow and arrows lying around his or her house, maybe an interrogator would get